NASA  AT  50:  PAST  ACCOMPLISHMENTS

AND  FUTURE  OPPORTUNITIES

AND  CHALLENGES

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JULY  30,  2008

Serial No. 110–118

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

43–687PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  30,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Chairman,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Ralph  M.  Hall,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .........
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Jerry F. Costello, Member, Committee
on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .............................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................
Prepared Statement by Representative Mark Udall, Chairman, Subcommittee
on  Space  and  Aeronautics,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Laura  Richardson,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Committee
on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .............................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Harry  E.  Mitchell,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................

Witnesses:

Hon. John H. Glenn, Jr., United States Senate (Retired)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Mr.  Norman  R.  Augustine,  Chairman  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  (Retired),

Lockheed Martin Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Dr.  Maria  T.  Zuber,  Department  Head  and  E.A.  Griswold  Professor  of  Geo-
physics, Department of Earth, Atmospheric, and Planetary Sciences, Massa-
chusetts Institute of Technology

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Page
2
3

14
15

16
18

19

20

20

21

21

22

22
26

31
33

35
38
42

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

NASA  AT  50:  PAST  ACCOMPLISHMENTS  AND
FUTURE  OPPORTUNITIES  AND  CHALLENGES

WEDNESDAY,  JULY  30,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bart  Gordon
[Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

NASA at 50: Past Accomplishments

and Future Opportunities

and Challenges

WEDNESDAY, JULY 30, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

The purpose of the hearing is to mark the 50th anniversary of the establishment
of  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA),  review  the  accom-
plishments achieved since its creation, and examine its future challenges and oppor-
tunities.

Witnesses

Witnesses scheduled to testify at the hearing include:

Honorable John H. Glenn, Jr., United States Senate [retired]
Mr. Norman R. Augustine, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer [retired], Lock-
heed Martin Corporation
Dr. Maria T. Zuber, Department Head and E.A. Griswold Professor of Geophysics,
Department of Earth, Atmospheric, and Planetary Sciences, Massachusetts Institute
of Technology

Also,  a  special  audio  message  from  Professor  Stephen  Hawking,  Lucian  Pro-

fessor of Mathematics, University of Cambridge, will be aired at the hearing.

Potential Issues

The following are some of the potential issues that may be discussed at the hear-

ing:

• Which  NASA  accomplishments  over  the  last  50  years  have  been  the  most  sig-
nificant  in  shaping  the  Nation’s  leadership  in  space  and  Earth  science,  aero-
nautics, and human space flight and exploration, and why?

• What  factors  will  be  the  most  influential  in  shaping  the  next  50  years  of  civil
space and Earth science, aeronautics, and human space flight and exploration,
and why?

• What are the most important steps that need to be taken today to ensure U.S.
leadership  in  space  and  Earth  science,  aeronautics,  human  space  flight,  and
exploration over the next half century?

• What  scientific  discoveries  or  technological  breakthroughs  would  dramatically

change the current and future path of NASA?

• What role can NASA play in engaging young people in science, technology, en-
gineering, and mathematics (STEM) education and careers in space and aero-
nautics?

• How  can  NASA  maximize  the  effectiveness  of  its  activities  and  missions  in

meeting societal needs?

• How  important  has  international  cooperation  been  for  NASA  over  the  last  50
years, and what should be done to maximize the utility of future international
partnerships in the civil space arena?

• What  impact  will  the  emerging  commercial  space  sector  have  on  NASA’s  pro-
grams  in  the  coming  years,  and  how  can  NASA  best  make  use  of  commercial
space capabilities to support its missions?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

BACKGROUND
Overview

4

On  July  29,  1958,  President  Eisenhower  signed  the  National  Aeronautics  and
Space  Act  that  established  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration
(NASA).  NASA  formally  came  into  existence  on  October  1,  1958.  Since  that  time,
NASA  has  made  path-breaking  contributions  in  the  areas  of  aeronautics,  human
space  flight  and  exploration,  and  space  and  Earth  science.  The  space  program  has
significantly  advanced  our  understanding  of  the  Earth  and  the  Sun,  our  solar  sys-
tem  and  the  Universe,  and  the  role  of  microgravity  in  physical  and  biological  proc-
esses.  NASA  has  also  tested  and  demonstrated  space-based  communications  and
meteorological monitoring techniques and fostered the applied use of Earth observa-
tions  data  to  help  to  monitor  natural  resources,  facilitate  urban  planning,  and  ad-
dress societal challenges. NASA has pioneered aeronautical developments that have
enabled  more  efficient  and  safer  commercial  air  transportation  as  well  as  tech-
nologies  to  advance  the  capabilities  of  military  aircraft.  Finally,  NASA  developed
and  demonstrated  the  means  to  send  humans  into  space,  land  them  on  the  Moon,
and return them home safely. NASA’s further human space flight accomplishments
include the development of a partially reusable Space Shuttle vehicle and leadership
in developing and assembling the International Space Station.

NASA  has  built  a  workforce  of  highly  educated  and  trained  scientists  and  engi-
neers who have contributed knowledge and technical capability that have helped to
establish the Nation’s leadership in technological innovation and competitiveness, a
fact borne out by the 6,573 patents the agency holds for contributions by its employ-
ees  and  contractors.  Today,  NASA  employs  over  18,000  civil  servants  and  some
40,000 contractors and grantees.

NASA  has  played  a  constructive  role  in  providing  opportunities  to  bring  nations
together  in  pursuit  of  peaceful  and  inspiring  goals  in  science  and  technologies.
These  international  activities  have  included  data  sharing  and  analysis  at  the  sci-
entist-to-scientist  level;  contributions  of  instruments  to  and  coordination  of  space
and  Earth  science  missions  to  maximize  observations;  and  contributions  of  major
portions of space systems. The Apollo-Soyuz Test Project was an example of coopera-
tion between the United States and the Soviet Union during the Cold War, and the
International Space Station, which involves major contributions from the U.S., Rus-
sia, Europe, Japan, and Canada, is the largest and most complex space cooperative
effort to date.

National Advisory Committee for Aeronautics: The Predecessor to NASA

Although  NASA  was  established  in  1958,  its  roots  go  back  to  the  Advisory  Com-
mittee for Aeronautics, later known as the ‘‘National’’ Advisory Committee for Aero-
nautics  (NACA),  which  Congress  created  in  1915  ‘‘to  supervise  and  direct  the  sci-
entific  study  of  the  problems  of  flight,  with  a  view  to  their  practical  solution  . . ..’’
Its  role  was  largely  to  coordinate,  evaluate,  and  advise  on  ongoing  aeronautical
work.

NACA  identified  the  need  for  civil  aviation  research  as  a  priority  for  the  post-
World  War  I  era,  and  it  created  the  first  U.S.  aviation  laboratory,  the  Langley  Me-
morial Aeronautical Laboratory, in Virginia, in 1920, to conduct research and devel-
opment  work.  Notably,  NACA’s  work  contributed  significantly  to  the  development
of  the  engine  cowling,  refined  wing  design,  laminar  flow  airfoils,  and  retractable
landing gear. These features became standard on U.S. aircraft.

In  response  to  continuing  advances  in  European  aviation  and  aeronautics,  NACA
and the Congress moved to establish additional U.S. aeronautics laboratories in the
late 1930s and early 1940s, including the Ames Aeronautical Laboratory on Moffett
Field in California and additional facilities at Langley. The need for research on air-
craft engines led NACA to add a third center, the Aircraft Engine Research Labora-
tory  (later  named  the  Lewis  Flight  Propulsion  Laboratory  and  now  the  John  H.
Glenn  Research  Center  at  Lewis  Field),  in  Cleveland,  Ohio.  NASA’s  Dryden  Test
Flight  Facility  in  California’s  Mojave  Desert  (at  what  was  Muroc  Army  Air  Field
and  is  now  Edwards  Air  Force  Base)  also  traces  its  origins  to  NACA  when  aero-
nautics researchers began to use the air base for flight testing activities.

Following World War II, the U.S. focused on jet engines and supersonic flight ca-
pability, and the joint efforts of NACA and the Air Force led to the first supersonic
flight on October 14, 1947, when Chuck Yeager broke the sound barrier while pilot-
ing  the  X–1  aircraft.  During  the  Cold  War,  the  Nation  began  to  focus  on  military
rocketry  and  NACA’s  infrastructure  and  personnel  were  tasked  increasingly  with
missile research. In response to the Soviet Union’s launch of Sputnik, the first artifi-
cial  satellite  deployed  in  space,  the  U.S.  accelerated  plans  for  launching  satellites
into space. NACA’s experience in aeronautics, missile research, management of tech-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

nical infrastructure and personnel, and its ability to help translate research develop-
ments into military and civil applications made it a fitting candidate to lead the Na-
tion’s  civil  space  activities.  Later,  NACA’s  aeronautics  research  and  development
work was folded into a broader agency mission of space and aeronautics.

Dawn of the United States Space Program

The International Geophysical Year (IGY) of 1957–1958, a multinational program
to  coordinate  global  scientific  investigations  about  the  Earth  system  and  the  near-
Earth space environment, included plans by the United States and Soviet Union for
launching  scientific  satellites  into  space.  However,  the  Soviet  Union’s  launch  of
Sputnik  on  October  4,  1957  jolted  the  United  States  into  a  space  race.  The  initial
U.S.  attempt,  the  launch  of  the  Vanguard  test  rocket  on  December  7,  1957  failed,
but  on  January  31,  1958,  the  launch  of  the  Explorer  I  satellite  succeeded  and  her-
alded America’s entry into space.

Establishment of the House Committee on Science and Astronautics

As  part  of  its  swift  response  to  the  Soviet’s  early  successes  in  space,  the  House
of  Representatives  created  a  Select  Committee  on  Astronautics  and  Space  Explo-
ration  for  the  purpose  of  conducting  ‘‘a  thorough  and  complete  study  and  investiga-
tion with respect to all aspects and problems relating to the exploration of outer space
. . . ,’’ according to the book, Toward the Endless Frontier. In the following months,
the  Select  Committee  accomplished  the  monumental  tasks  of  chartering  a  perma-
nent  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Astronautics,  working  on  the  development
of  the  Space  Act  which  established  NASA,  and  holding  important  hearings  on  the
future  of  the  Nation’s  space  program.  The  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Astro-
nautics,  now  known  as  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  was  au-
thorized  on  July  21,  1958,  and  on  January  3,  1959  became  the  first  standing  com-
mittee  since  1892  to  oversee  an  entirely  new  area.  The  Senate  also  established  a
space committee, the Committee on Aeronautical and Space Sciences.

The National Aeronautics and Space Act of 1958

On  April  2,  1958,  the  Eisenhower  Administration  submitted  a  bill  to  Congress  to
establish a National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA). The House and
Senate  debated  and  made  changes  to  the  bill,  including  the  addition  of  Congres-
sional oversight, and provided a mechanism for international cooperation in the Act.
On July 29, 1958 President Eisenhower signed into law P.L. 85–568, ‘‘The National
Aeronautics  and  Space  Act  of  1958’’  (The  Policy  and  Purpose  section  of  the  Act  is
included in Appendix A). NASA’s workforce and facilities included those of its prede-
cessor,  NACA,  as  well  as  the  space  science  staff  from  the  Naval  Research  Labora-
tory, and later the Army Ballistic Missile Agency and the Jet Propulsion Laboratory,
among parts of other organizations.

T.  Keith  Glennan,  President  of  Case  Institute  of  Technology,  was  selected  as  the
first NASA Administrator. On October 1, 1958 at the Dolly Madison House, Glennan
officially  announced  the  end  of  NACA  and  the  beginning  of  NASA.  One  week  after
NASA’s  birth,  Glennan  gave  approval  for  work  to  start  on  Project  Mercury,  the
country’s first human space flight program.

Funding History (50 Years of NASA Budgets in Constant Year Dollars)

NASA’s  budget  history  since  the  creation  of  the  agency  in  1958  is  shown  in  At-
tachment  B.  The  budget  reached  an  all-time  high  during  the  Apollo  years  and  also
saw  an  increase  following  the  Challenger  accident.  Over  the  last  decade,  NASA’s
budget has been essentially flat.

Selected Accomplishments in Human Exploration

NASA accomplished a great deal in human space flight and exploration since the
initiation  of  Project  Mercury,  from  Alan  Shepard’s  15  minute  sub-orbital  flight  in
1961  to  the  recent  record  breaking  377  days  in  space  accomplished  by  astronaut
Peggy Whitson. In the span of 47 years, NASA has gone from learning how to cope
with operating in space without fear of temperature extremes and radiation to land-
ing  astronauts  on  the  Moon  and  collaborating  with  other  nations  in  building  what
will  be  a  925,000  pound  research  facility  orbiting  200  miles  above  the  Earth  and
occupied by a six-person crew.

The  Mercury  project  was  NASA’s  first  human  space  exploration  effort.  At  that
time,  it  was  still  uncertain  whether  a  human  could  function  in  the  hostile  environ-
ment  of  space.  Alan  Shepard’s  flight  on  May  5,  1961  demonstrated  that  an  astro-
naut  could  survive  and  work  in  space,  albeit  for  a  short  period.  Less  than  a  year
later, on February 20, 1962, NASA astronaut John Glenn became the first American

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

to  orbit  the  Earth.  Glenn’s  flight  in  the  Friendship  7  spacecraft  lasted  just  under
five  hours  and  made  three  orbits.  Project  Gemini,  conducted  from  1965  to  1966,  in-
volved  a  larger  spacecraft  with  a  crew  of  two.  Goals  were  elevated  as  astronauts
demonstrated  the  ability  to  rendezvous  and  dock  with  other  spacecraft  and  con-
ducted  extra  vehicular  activities  (EVAs),  also  known  as  spacewalks.  Next  was
project  Apollo,  whose  objectives  were  established  by  President  John  F.  Kennedy  on
May  25,  1961,  when  he  announced  the  goal  of  landing  a  man  on  the  Moon  and  re-
turning  him  safely  to  Earth  by  the  end  of  the  decade.  The  Apollo  program  was  a
demanding  undertaking,  one  that  resulted  in  the  loss  of  the  three  astronauts  of
Apollo 1 in a fire on the launch pad, and involved a series of challenging milestones
including  the  development  of  the  Saturn  V  rocket,  a  lunar  module,  and  a  series  of
manned flight demonstrations to validate systems. On July 20, 1969, President Ken-
nedy’s  goal  was  achieved  when  two  members  of  the  crew  of  Apollo  11—Neil  Arm-
strong  and  Edwin  E.  ‘‘Buzz’’  Aldrin  Jr.—made  a  successful  landing  on  the  Sea  of
Tranquility. Over the next three and a half years, NASA successfully launched five
more Apollo lunar landing missions to conduct scientific activities, collect lunar rock
samples, and to explore regions of the Moon with the use of a lunar rover.

Evaluating the ability of humans to withstand long-term periods in space was the
impetus behind three Skylab missions conducted from 1973 to 1974. Skylab was de-
veloped  by  converting  an  empty  S  IV–B  stage  into  what  was  in  essence  the  first
U.S.  space  station.  The  first  Skylab  crew  spent  almost  a  month  in  space,  doubling
that  previously  experienced  by  a  U.S.  crew,  and  conducted  experiments  in  solar
physics, Earth resources, space medicine, and industrial processes.

During  the  late  1960s,  acting  NASA  Administrator,  Thomas  Paine,  sought  in-
creased  cooperation  in  NASA’s  human  space  exploration  activities.  An  offer  to  the
Soviets  to  develop  compatible  rendezvous  and  docking  systems  that  both  nations
could  use  in  potential  joint  space  flight  activities  was  accepted.  The  Apollo-Soyuz
Test  Project  (ASTP)  involved  joint  docking  of  the  two  human  spacecraft  and  crew
exchange.  The  ASTP  came  to  fruition  on  July  17,  1975  in  the  successful  docking  of
the Soviet Soyuz and American Apollo spacecraft; it was the first ever international
human space flight project.

Following ASTP, it would not be until 1981 that NASA returned to human space
flight.  The  first  Space  Shuttle  mission  was  launched  on  April  12,  1981.  The  next
four Shuttle flights demonstrated design and thermal characteristics, important con-
firmations since the orbiter was the first reusable spacecraft built by NASA. ‘‘Oper-
ational’’ Shuttle flights began in November 1982 and included deploying communica-
tions  satellite  and  scientific  satellite  payloads  such  as  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope.
In 1983, the Shuttle launched the first European-built modular research laboratory,
Spacelab—along with the first non-American astronaut, Ulf Merbold, as part of the
Shuttle  crew.  From  1983–1998,  Spacelab  flew  numerous  times.  The  program  in-
volved scientific experiments and contributed valuable knowledge and experience to
the International Space Station program.

The  risk  associated  with  human  space  exploration  was  made  painfully  apparent
on  two  tragic  occasions  involving  the  Shuttle.  On  January  28,  1986,  an  O-ring  fail-
ure  in  one  of  two  solid  rocket  boosters  attached  to  the  Shuttle  orbiter  Challenger
caused the main liquid fuel tank to explode seventy-three seconds after launch, kill-
ing  all  seven  crew  members.  After  the  Shuttle  successfully  returned  to  flight  in
1988,  NASA  flew  eighty-seven  successful  missions  before  tragedy  struck  again  on
February  1,  2003,  with  the  loss  of  the  orbiter  Columbia  and  its  seven  astronauts
during reentry. Both accidents led to intense scrutiny and criticism of agency proce-
dures  and  safety  practices  that  were  believed  to  have  contributed  to  the  accidents.
In  1984,  Congress  approved  President  Ronald  Reagan’s  proposal  for  NASA  to
build  a  space  station;  Europe,  Canada,  and  Japan  were  invited  to  participate  and
signed  agreements  in  1988.  The  space  station  program  was  technically  and  pro-
grammatically  challenging  for  NASA  to  carry  out  and  the  program  suffered  signifi-
cant cost growth and a number of restructurings.

In addition, in 1992, President George Bush and Russian President Boris Yeltsin
signed  an  agreement  which  included  involving  a  U.S.  astronaut  on  a  long-duration
Mir  mission  and  the  flight  of  a  Russian  cosmonaut  on  the  Shuttle.  Later  in  1992,
NASA  Administrator  Daniel  Goldin  and  Yuri  Koptev,  Director  General  of  the  Rus-
sian Space Agency (RSA), signed an agreement detailing further human space flight
cooperation  with  Russia,  including  a  Russian  cosmonaut  joining  a  Shuttle  crew  as
a mission specialist and a U.S. astronaut launching in a Soyuz spacecraft, spending
more  than  90  days  on  the  Mir,  and  returning  in  a  Shuttle,  among  other  activities.
The  program  established  a  level  of  trust  between  NASA  and  the  Russian  Space
Agency,  and  provided  a  basis  of  understanding  and  interaction  that  led  to  the  U.S.
invitation,  in  1993,  to  Russia  to  join  the  U.S.  and  its  partners  in  the  International
Space  Station.  In  1998,  the  U.S.,  Russia,  members  of  the  European  Space  Agency,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

Japan,  and  Canada  signed  an  Intergovernmental  Agreement  on  Space  Station  Co-
operation.

The  first  element  of  the  International  Space  Station,  the  Russian-built  and  U.S.
funded  Functional  Cargo  Block  reached  orbit  in  November  1998.  Since  then,  the
International  Space  Station  has  grown  with  the  addition  of  modules,  trusses,  solar
arrays, and laboratories contributed by the U.S., Russia, Europe, and Japan. Perma-
nent habitation of the ISS began when the Expedition One crew arrived in 2000 and
the  ISS  has  been  continuously  occupied  ever  since.  The  ISS,  scheduled  for  comple-
tion in 2010, will be the largest human-made object ever to orbit the Earth.

While  work  on  developing  the  space  station  was  underway,  President  George
W.H.  Bush,  in  1989,  announced  a  Space  Exploration  Initiative  that  included  the
Space  Station  and  plans  to  send  astronauts  back  to  the  Moon  and,  eventually,  on
to Mars. The Initiative, however, failed to garner support, and the Clinton Adminis-
tration  did  not  continue  it.  In  2004,  President  George  W.  Bush  announced  a  Vision
for  Space  Exploration  that  entailed  sending  humans  back  to  the  Moon  and  on  to
Mars by retiring the Shuttle after completion of the ISS, planned for 2010, and de-
veloping  the  follow-on  Constellation  program.  The  latter  includes  a  new,  multipur-
pose Orion crew exploration vehicle as well as new crew and cargo launchers, known
as Ares I and Ares V. Scheduled to transport six crew members to the International
Space  Station  in  2015,  Orion,  supplemented  by  the  Altair  lunar  lander  module,  is
intended to return U.S. astronauts to the Moon by no later than 2020, budgets per-
mitting, and provide the core capability for future travel to other bodies in the solar
system.

While  human  space  exploration  during  much  of  NASA’s  first  50  years  was  man-
aged,  in  large  part,  by  the  Federal  Government,  the  contributions  of  the  aerospace
industry  and  private  sector  companies  have  increased  significantly  over  time,  and
contractors  currently  carry  out  the  bulk  of  the  development  work  in  the  Constella-
tion program. In addition, NASA is planning to procure commercial cargo, and even-
tually  crew,  transportation  services  to  the  International  Space  Station,  should  the
private sector demonstrate the capability to provide those services. The private sec-
tor is also pursuing a potential market in personal human space flight. Further op-
portunities  for  commercially-provided  space  services  may  emerge  from  innovation
prize  competitions,  including  a  challenge  to  develop,  land,  and  operate  a  rover  on
the Moon, all based on private funding.

Selected Accomplishments in Aeronautics

Building on the pioneering accomplishments of NACA, NASA has continued to en-
able  aeronautical  advances  that  encompass  a  wide  range  of  developments  in  aero-
dynamics,  aircraft  structure,  and  experimental  design.  Many  of  the  technologies
that have emerged from NASA research have found their way into both military and
civilian  aircraft  and  have  significantly  improved  aircraft  performance  and  fuel  effi-
ciency and enhanced the safety of the national airspace.

During  the  1940s  and  1950s,  problems  with  aircraft  drag  were  causing  excessive
use  of  fuel  and  problems  in  aircraft  control.  A  NASA  scientist,  Dr.  Richard
Whitcomb,  discovered  the  ‘‘area  rule,’’  a  revolutionary  concept  that  helped  aircraft
designers  to  avoid  the  disruption  in  air  flow  caused  by  the  attachment  of  wings  to
the fuselage. By removing the equivalent wing cross-sectional area from that of the
fuselage cross-sectional area, scientists were able to improve the distribution of flow
across  the  longitudinal  area  of  the  aircraft.  The  benefits  were  immediate  and  the
so-called ‘‘Coke bottle’’ fuselage revolutionized fighter designs and high performance
aircraft for the years to come.

During  the  late  1950s  and  the  1960s,  NASA’s  aeronautics  research  and  develop-
ment program, the X–15 experimental rocket-powered aircraft, made significant con-
tributions.  On  August  22,  1963,  the  X–15  reached  a  record  354,000  feet  in  altitude
and  achieved  a  speed  of  Mach  6.7  on  October  3,  1967.  The  X–15  program  produced
valuable  data  on  aerodynamic  heating,  high-temperature  materials,  reaction  con-
trols,  and  space  suits,  some  of  which  was  later  used  in  the  Space  Shuttle  program.
Other ‘‘X-planes’’ contributed important data in other areas of aeronautical research
and development.

During  the  1960s  and  1970s,  NASA  scientists  and  researchers  developed  the
‘‘supercritical airfoil’’ shape, which delayed the drag rise that normally accompanies
transonic  airflow  and  help  to  improve  aircraft  cruise  efficiency.  At  the  same  time,
NASA  also  helped  develop  and  flight  test  the  digital  ‘‘fly-by-wire’’  system.  This  re-
placed  heavier  and  less  reliable  hydraulics  systems  with  a  digital  computer  and
electric actuators. Such technologies are now commonplace on military and commer-
cial aircraft.

Driven  by  the  need  to  find  ways  to  reduce  fuel  consumption,  NASA  developed
winglets  during  the  1970s  and  1980s.  These  vertical  endplates,  seen  on  many  air-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

craft wings today, help to reduce vortices and drag and to improve airflow and fuel
efficiency,  and  represent  one  of  the  agency’s  most  important  aeronautical  achieve-
ments.  Over  the  last  few  decades,  NASA’s  work  in  aeronautics  resulted  in  several
air traffic management simulation tools, which today are greatly improving aircraft
flow and air traffic safety.

With  adequate  funding,  NASA  will  be  a  significant  contributor  to  the  advances
in future civilian aircraft technologies that will be needed to deal with projected in-
creases in air transportation capacity, without imposing adverse effects on the envi-
ronment.  The  agency  is  building  on  its  aircraft  engine  efficiency,  emissions  and
noise research to help develop technologies that will maximize fuel consumption and
minimize  harmful  environmental  impacts-including  those  on  the  Earth’s  climate.
Prior  NASA  research  such  as  the  Energy  Efficient  Engine  Project  developed  and
demonstrated  technologies  capable  of  reducing  fuel  consumption  by  15  percent  rel-
ative  to  the  best  commercial  aircraft  engines  in  service  at  that  time.  These  accom-
plishments  also  enabled  the  development  of  jet  engines  such  as  those  powering  to-
day’s Boeing 777. Pratt & Whitney’s prior collaborative research with NASA is ena-
bling  the  company  to  bring  to  market  a  geared  turbo  fan  engine  which  is  projected
to  burn  less  fuel,  emit  less  CO2 emissions  and  be  cheaper  to  use  then  most  other
jet engines.

The  Nation’s  latest  military  aircraft  have  also  benefited  from  technologies  devel-
oped by NASA. For example, the Air Force’s C–17 transport owes several of its key
elements  to  NASA  research  including  the  supercritical  wing  and  externally  blown
flap,  the  latter  enabling  the  heavy  transport  to  make  slow,  steep  approaches  with
heavy  cargo  loads.  Another  example  is  the  F–22  fighter  aircraft,  which  can  maneu-
ver  in  ways  unlike  most  fighters  due  to  the  thrust  vectoring  of  its  engine  nozzles,
a feature successfully demonstrated by NASA on a number of test aircraft, most no-
tably the X–31.

Selected Accomplishments in Space Science

Since Explorer I’s inauguration of our nation’s civil space program on January 31,
1958, the world has witnessed stunning achievements by NASA scientific spacecraft.
Explorer I’s main experiment led to the discovery of radiation belts surrounding the
Earth, an achievement that provided new scientific understanding of the near-Earth
environment and its hazards to human space exploration. NASA scientific spacecraft
have  continued  to  make  discoveries  that  have  rewritten  textbooks,  led  to  Nobel
prizes, and captivated our youth and the public.

Planetary Exploration

NASA’s  interplanetary  exploration  began  with  the  launch  of  Mariner  2  in  1962,
which  passed  within  21,000  miles  of  Venus.  From  that  point  on,  NASA’s  planetary
spacecraft, including Pioneers, Mariners, Voyagers, Cassini, Magellan, Galileo, Mes-
senger,  Mars  missions,  and  smaller  probes,  have  visited  and  explored  eight  planets
and  their  moons  as  well  as  comets  and  asteroids.  Mariner  9  was  the  first  probe  to
successfully  orbit  Mars  in  1971,  and  the  Pioneer  10  and  11  spacecraft,  launched  in
1972 and 1973, were the first spacecraft to pass through the harsh asteroid belt and
to  explore  the  outer  planets  of  Jupiter  and  Saturn  (Pioneer  11).  In  1983,  Pioneer
10  became  the  first  robotic  object  to  leave  the  solar  system.  The  Voyager  1  and  2
spacecraft,  launched  over  30  years  ago  in  1977,  studied  Jupiter,  Saturn,  and  their
moons. Voyager 2 went on to discover previously undetected moons orbiting Uranus
when it flew by the planet and became the first spacecraft to observe Neptune. The
Voyager  probes,  now  beyond  the  solar  system  and  en  route  to  interstellar  space,
have  sent  back  data  that  have  changed  scientists’  understanding  about  what  hap-
pens  at  the  edge  of  the  solar  system  where  the  solar  wind  blowing  outward  from
the Sun meets energetic particles from interstellar space. The Cassini-Huygens mis-
sion,  a  collaborative  mission  with  the  European  Space  Agency,  was  launched  in
1997,  and  has  been  the  first  to  study  the  Saturn  system  of  rings  and  moons  and
included the first probe (Huygens) sent into the atmosphere of Titan.

NASA’s Viking 1 and 2 spacecraft touched down in a ‘‘soft landing’’ on the Chryse
Planitia and Utopia Planitia areas of Mars respectively in 1976. Viking’s ambitious
scientific objectives included the search for life. Although the results were inconclu-
sive, the Viking mission were followed in later decades by a series of integrated in-
vestigations of Mars by orbiters, landers, and rovers that have significantly changed
scientists’ understanding of the Martian world. The landing of the Mars Pathfinder
lander  and  its  rover,  Sojourner,  on  July  4,  1997  created  an  unprecedented  appetite
for  the  images  of  and  scientific  news  reported  from  the  Red  Planet.  Subsequent
Mars  orbiters,  landers  and  probes,  including  those  operating  today,  have  revealed

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

that  Mars  once  had  liquid  water  and  that  areas  of  the  planet  harbor  water  ice  be-
neath its surface.

Astrophysics

NASA’s first astrophysics satellites were launched in the late 1960s. The Orbiting
Astronomical Observatory (OAO)–2 provided the first ultraviolet images of stars and
discovered  a  supernova.  Its  successor,  OAO–3,  conducted  in  collaboration  with  the
United  Kingdom,  went  on  to  discover  several  pulsars.  During  the  1970s,  NASA
began to launch a series of High Energy Astronomy Observatories (HEAO) to survey
the  sky  in  the  x-ray  band.  In  1989,  NASA  launched  the  Cosmic  Background  Ex-
plorer  (COBE),  which  measured  microwave  radiation  from  the  early  Universe.  The
scientific  analysis  of  COBE  data  confirmed  the  theory  of  the  Big  Bang.  The  impor-
tance  of  this  result  was  recognized  by  Dr.  George  Smoot  and  Dr.  John  Mather  (a
NASA civil servant) being awarded the 2006 Nobel Prize in physics.

During  the  1990s  and  2000s,  NASA  completed  and  launched  the  so-called  ‘‘Great
Observatories’’—the  Hubble  Space  Telescope,  Spitzer  Space  Telescope,  Chandra  X-
ray Observatory, and the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory. Together these observ-
atories,  which  have  observed  the  Universe  through  multiple  wavelengths  of  light,
have  peered  back  in  time  to  examine  the  early  evolution  of  the  Universe  and  the
development of stars, galaxies, and planets. In July of 1994, Hubble was able to ob-
tain  images  of  Comet  Shoemaker-Levy’s  impact  with  Jupiter,  the  first  collision  of
two  bodies  in  the  solar  system  to  be  observed.  NASA’s  astrophysics  spacecraft  also
contributed to confirming the 1998 discovery that the expansion of the Universe was
accelerating  and  that  a  mysterious  ‘‘dark  energy’’  was  counteracting  the  forces  of
gravity to increase the pace of expansion of the Universe.

Solar and Space Physics

In  the  area  of  solar  physics  and  space  physics,  the  earliest  science  satellites  of
the late 1950s provided data that helped scientists to create the initial maps of the
magnetosphere  and  confirm  the  existence  of  the  solar  wind  (the  energetic  particles
that blow out from the Sun) and observe the interplanetary magnetic field. A series
of  Orbiting  Solar  Observatory  (OSO)  spacecraft,  launched  during  the  1960s  and
1970s,  conducted  solar  physics  investigations  during  a  full  solar  cycle,  mapped  the
ultraviolet,  x-ray,  and  gamma  radiation  in  the  sky,  and  collected  the  first  images
of a solar flare. The data on solar activity were used to develop warnings of height-
ened  solar  activity  and  to  conduct  satellite  operations  in  space.  The  planetary  mis-
sions  of  the  1970s  and  1980s  enabled  significant  advances  in  studies  on  magnetic
fields in the planets of the solar system.

In  1995,  the  Solar  and  Heliophysics  Observatory,  a  large  cooperative  mission  be-
tween  the  European  Space  Agency  and  NASA,  was  launched.  Among  its  many  con-
tributions, SOHO recently helped confirm a thirty-year old theory about solar flares
and  has  made  significant  contributions  to  the  study  of  the  Sun  and  solar  activity.
NASA’s solar and space physics satellites continue to collect data to improve under-
standing of the Sun-Earth connection, the physical processes of the heliosphere, the
dynamics of the solar corona and its heating processes, among other research areas.
NASA’s solar and space physics research advances basic knowledge and contributes
to improving the prediction of space weather events, which can disrupt space-based
activities  including  the  transmission  of  GPS  signals  and  satellite  communications
and interfere with ground-based assets such as the electricity grid.

Selected Accomplishments in Earth Science

NASA’s  long  record  of  Earth  observations,  beginning  with  its  earliest  scientific
satellites, has become critical in understanding changes to the Earth and its climate
on a global level and for facilitating applied uses of the data to help address societal
challenges.  The  Vanguard  I  satellite  launched  in  1958  gave  us  new  information
about the shape of the Earth. The Explorer 7 satellite that operated from 1959–1961
enabled  the  first  measurements  of  the  energy  coming  into  and  going  out  of  the
Earth,  a  key  component  of  climate  study.  The  launch  of  NASA’s  TIROS  1  in  1960,
the  first  weather  satellite,  revealed  features  such  as  ocean  storms  and  the  struc-
tures  of  hurricanes  and  typhoons,  the  flows  of  ice  over  water,  and  the  temperature
patterns of oceans and land—information that had direct societal value. The imme-
diate  recognition  of  TIROS’s  value  to  the  Nation  led  to  the  continuation  of  the  pro-
gram and its eventual inclusion in an operational weather satellite program housed
in what is now the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA).

The  Nimbus  series  of  satellites,  starting  in  1964,  became  a  standard  NASA  plat-
form  for  observing  the  Earth  and  provided  the  first  global  images  of  clouds  and
weather  systems.  The  Nimbus  7  satellite,  which  operated  from  1978–1994,  carried

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

an instrument that collected the first precision measurements of the total solar irra-
diance, an important measurement for understanding long-term climate change. In-
struments  on  Nimbus  satellites  also  provided  the  first  data  from  space  on  changes
in  the  color  of  the  ocean  from  space,  which  enable  scientists  to  quantify  and  map
the  concentration  of  chlorophyll,  estimate  global  marine  biomass,  and  provide  in-
sight on ocean biomass as a carbon sink.

In  1972,  NASA  launched  the  Earth  Resources  Technology  Satellites  (later  re-
named  Landsat),  which  opened  new  opportunities  to  study  natural  and  human-in-
duced changes of the Earth’s surface and land cover such as deforestation, urbaniza-
tion,  and  ice  flows  and  their  implications.  Unlike  purely  science-oriented  missions,
Landsat  grew  out  of  the  interests  of  both  non-scientist  stakeholders  and  scientists
who  wanted  to  use  the  data  for  monitoring  crops,  managing  natural  resources,  and
mapping  forest  fires,  among  other  uses.  The  Landsat  program  has  continued
through successive satellite launches and data collection over the last 36 years; the
program  holds  the  longest  unbroken  record  of  data  collected  on  the  Earth’s  surface
from  space.  Landsat  7  data  have  recently  been  used  to  create  a  map  of  Antarctica
at  a  resolution  ten  times  better  than  the  previous  maps.  Landsat  was  also  one  of
the NASA Earth observing spacecraft that contributed to the dramatic images of the
collapse  of  the  Larsen  B  Ice  Shelf  in  western  Antarctica  during  January–March
2002.

Not  all  of  NASA’s  Earth  science  contributions  have  come  from  satellite  observa-
tions.  A  NASA-funded  airborne  survey  to  explore  reported  losses  of  stratospheric
ozone over Antarctica ‘‘demonstrated unequivocally that ozone was destroyed by chlo-
rine  and  bromine  radicals,’’  according  to  a  National  Academies  report,  Supporting
Research and Data Analysis in NASA’s Science Programs. The survey helped estab-
lish  that  chlorofluorocarbons  were  destroying  the  ozone,  results  that  helped  lead  to
the  Montreal  Protocol  of  1987  and  the  agreement  among  industrialized  nations  to
stop producing chlorofluorocarbons.

During  the  1980s,  NASA  initiated  the  Earth  Observing  System  program  to  pro-
vide measurements of the Earth as an integrated system. NASA launched its Earth
Observing  Satellites—Terra,  Aqua,  and  Aura—during  the  late  1990s  and  early
2000s.  These  and  other  NASA  Earth  observations  satellite  have  made  important
contributions  to  environmental  and  climate  change  research.  Data  collected  by  the
Aqua satellite, for example, has been used in weather prediction models and helped
to improve ‘‘the accuracy range of experimental six-day Northern Hemisphere weath-
er  forecasts  by  up  to  six  hours,  a  four  percent  increase,’’  according  to  a  2005  NASA
and NOAA news release.

Early Developments in Satellite Communications

NASA’s  research  and  development  activities  on  satellite  communications  during
the 1960s and 1970s demonstrated the ability to redirect transcontinental and inter-
continental  telephone,  radio,  and  television  signals  with  the  first  passive  commu-
nication satellite, Echo 1; to amplify and retransmit up to 60 two-way telephone con-
versations simultaneously with NASA’s launch of the first orbiting commercial com-
munications satellite, AT&T’s Telstar 1; and the routine use of ground station tech-
nology  with  the  RCA-developed  Relay  1  satellite,  which  NASA  launched.  In  1963,
NASA launched the first geosynchronous communications satellite, Syncom 2, which
enabled the development of a global communications satellite system.

NASA’s Applications Technology Satellites Program (ATS) program tested commu-
nications experiments, including the use of search and rescue location transmitters,
emergency  communications  links,  and  satellite  navigation,  and  demonstrated  new
applications  such  as  long-distance  education.  Many  of  these  early  demonstrations
helped  foster  what  has  grown  to  be  a  multi-billion  dollar  commercial  communica-
tions satellite and services market.

Education

From the early 1960s through 1970, NASA funded graduate studies for 5,000 sci-
entists and engineers—an investment of more than $100 million. NASA has contin-
ued to support a graduate fellowship program and also supports undergraduate fel-
lowships,  internships,  cooperative  education  opportunities,  museum  and  outreach
activities,  and  education  projects  to  inspire  students  at  all  levels  to  study  space-re-
lated disciplines and to provide training and educational opportunities for America’s
youth,  including  women  and  under-represented  minorities.  In  addition,  many  of
NASA’s science missions include education and outreach activities. Through its edu-
cation  and  related  program  activities,  NASA  is  working  to  foster  student  interest
in  and  pursuit  of  science,  technology,  engineering  and  mathematics  (STEM)  edu-
cation and careers that serve the Nation’s and NASA’s workforce needs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Looking Ahead

11

While NASA’s past accomplishments are reason for celebration and reflection this
year, it is also clear that the future will provide challenges and opportunities no less
daunting  and  inspiring  than  those  of  the  past  half  century.  Challenges  for  NASA’s
aeronautical programs include the national effort to develop of a next generation air
transportation  system,  research  to  mitigate  aviation’s  impact  on  the  environment,
and  the  development  of  innovative  vehicle  concepts  that  can  provide  new  capabili-
ties for civil and military aviation.

In  human  space  exploration,  NASA  is  seeking  to  exploit  the  research  opportuni-
ties  of  the  International  Space  Station,  develop  a  new  crew  and  cargo  launch  sys-
tem,  and  continue  to  plan  for  returning  astronauts  to  the  Moon,  all  of  which  will
help  build  the  capabilities  required  for  human  visits  to  other  destinations  in  the
solar system.

In  the  area  of  science,  space-based  investigations  of  ‘‘dark  energy,’’  the  ongoing
search for extant and extinct life beyond Earth, as well as the search for Earth-like
planets orbiting stars like the Sun and the prospects for collecting samples on Mars
and  returning  them  back  to  Earth  represent  some  of  the  exciting  challenges  that
lie  ahead.  The  need  to  sustain  measurements  of  the  Earth  and  climate  are  critical
to  understanding  changes  to  the  Earth;  these  data  also  offer  the  potential  for  new
and  expanded  uses  of  the  data  to  benefit  society.  In  addition,  the  threat  of  space
radiation remains a significant hazard to human space exploration and requires sci-
entific  research  that  can  help  lead  to  approaches  for  mitigating  radiation  effects  to
astronauts. Finally, better understanding and characterizing the properties and po-
tential  threat  posed  by  near-Earth  objects  will  continue  to  be  a  challenge  for  the
agency.

Many  of  these  challenges  will  be  pursued  with  international  partnerships,  due  to
their cost and complexity and the opportunities that they offer for sustained peace-
ful cooperation in science and technology. The potential pathways for such coopera-
tion will continue to emerge as many nations with increasing space capabilities seek
to expand their presence in outer space.

However,  as  the  Committee’s  oversight  activities  have  demonstrated,  NASA  is
likely to continue to face hurdles in carrying out all of these challenges. Controlling
costs;  executing  programs  efficiently;  maintaining  a  balanced  set  of  aeronautics,
science,  and  human  space  flight  and  exploration  programs;  dealing  with  an  aging
workforce,  and  coping  with  a  constrained  fiscal  environment  are  all  likely  to  con-
tinue to be imperatives for the agency’s leadership in the years ahead.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

12

Declaration of Policy and Purpose of the

National Aeronautics and Space Act of 1958

as enacted in 1958 (Unamended)

DECLARATION OF POLICY AND PURPOSE
Sec.  102.  (a)  The  Congress  hereby  declares  that  it  is  the  policy  of  the  United  States
that  activities  in  space  should  be  devoted  to  peaceful  purposes  for  the  benefit  of  all
mankind.
(b)  The  Congress  declares  that  the  general  welfare  and  security  of  the  United  States
require  that  adequate  provision  be  made  for  aeronautical  and  space  activities.  The
Congress further declares that such activities shall be the responsibility of, and shall
be directed by, a civilian agency exercising control over aeronautical and space activi-
ties sponsored by the United States, except that activities peculiar to or primarily as-
sociated with the development of weapons systems, military operations, or the defense
of the United States (including the research and development necessary to make effec-
tive provision for the defense of the United States) shall be the responsibility of, and
shall be directed by, the Department of Defense; and that determination as to which
such  agency  has  responsibility  for  and  direction  of  any  such  activity  shall  be  made
by the President in conformity with section 201 (e).
‘‘(c) The aeronautical and space activities of the United States shall be conducted so
as to contribute materially to one or more of the following objectives:
(1) The  expansion  of  human  knowledge  of  phenomena  in  the  atmosphere  and  space;
(2) The  improvement  of  the  usefulness,  performance,  speed,  safety,  and  efficiency  of

aeronautical and space vehicles;

(3) The  development  and  operation  of  vehicles  capable  of  carrying  instruments,

equipment, supplies and living organisms through space;

(4) The  establishment  of  long-range  studies  of  the  potential  benefits  to  be  gained
from,  the  opportunities  for,  and  the  problems  involved  in  the  utilization  of  aero-
nautical and space activities for peaceful and scientific purposes.

(5) The preservation of the role of the United States as a leader in aeronautical and
space  science  and  technology  and  in  the  application  thereof  to  the  conduct  of
peaceful activities within and outside the atmosphere.

(6) The  making  available  to  agencies  directly  concerned  with  national  defenses  of
discoveries  that  have  military  value  or  significance,  and  the  furnishing  by  such
agencies, to the civilian agency established to direct and control nonmilitary aero-
nautical  and  space  activities,  of  information  as  to  discoveries  which  have  value
or significance to that agency;

(7) Cooperation  by  the  United  States  with  other  nations  and  groups  of  nations  in
work  done  pursuant  to  this  Act  and  in  the  peaceful  application  of  the  results,
thereof; and

(8) The  most  effective  utilization  of  the  scientific  and  engineering  resources  of  the
United States, with close cooperation among all interested agencies of the United
States  in  order  to  avoid  unnecessary  duplication  of  effort,  facilities,  and  equip-
ment.

(d)  It  is  the  purpose  of  this  Act  to  carry  out  and  effectuate  the  policies  declared  in
subsections (a), (b), and (c).’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Chairman  GORDON.  Hearing  will  come  to  order.  I  hear  the  bells
ringing,  so  it  must  be  10  o’clock,  and  I  am  following  Senator
Glenn’s  suggestion  that,  in  his  committees  he  knows  how  things
are often hectic. You need to get started on time to encourage peo-
ple  to  get  here  on  time.  We  have  Members  at  various  other  hear-
ings  that  will  be  coming  and  going,  but  I  want  you  also  to  know,
and we want to welcome all of our web cast viewers today. We typi-
cally have, it is really hard to believe, but we will have two million
or  more  individuals  watching  us  on  the  web  today.  So  we  want  to
welcome all those, too.

And  I  will  be  brief  in  my  opening  remarks,  because  we  have  a
very distinguished panel of witnesses, and I know that we all want
to hear from them. However, I do want to provide some context for
today’s hearing.

As  many  of  you  know,  this  year  marks  the  50th  anniversary  of
the  creation  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee.  We  were
one of Congress’s responses to the Soviet Union’s successful launch
of Sputnik 1 in late 1957. Sputnik led to a national reexamination
of  America’s  educational  system,  our  scientific  research  infrastruc-
ture, and our goals and capabilities for space exploration.

And  this  committee  was  given  the  responsibility  of  leading  Con-

gressional oversight of these issues.

1958  also  marked  the  year  that  the  National  Aeronautics  and
Space  Administration  was  established.  In  fact,  yesterday,  July  the
29th, marked the 50th anniversary of President Eisenhower’s sign-
ing of the National Aeronautics and Space Act of 1958, the legisla-
tion that created NASA.

So it is fitting that we take time to look back at what NASA has
accomplished  over  the  past  50  years,  as  well  as  look  ahead  to  the
opportunities  and  challenges  facing  the  agency  over  the  next  50
years.

We  often  forget  how  much  we  owe  to  the  men  and  women  of
NASA  who  in  many  ways  have  helped  create  the  world  in  which
we  live  today.  They  have  dramatically  advanced  our  knowledge  of
our  home  planet  Earth  and  of  the  universe  at  large  through  an
amazing array of scientific research or spacecraft over the past five
decades.

Indeed,  it  is  no  exaggeration  to  say  that  NASA’s  accomplish-
ments have helped to rewrite the science textbooks more than once.
NASA’s  men  and  women  have  also  helped  create  the  technologies
that  have  made  possible  the  commercial  aircraft  and  the  aviation
system that contributes so much to our nation’s economic viability,
as  well  as  technologies  that  have  helped  enable  the  military  air-
craft that defend our freedom.

Finally, NASA’s men and women have led the way in helping hu-
manity  to  move  out  into  the  solar  system,  including  putting  the
first  footprints  on  the  Moon  almost  40  years  ago.  In  doing  so  they
have inspired successive generations to seek to achieve challenging
goals in science and technology.

In  short,  NASA  has  accomplished  a  great  deal  in  its  first  50

years.

Of  course,  the  agency  has  also  had  its  share  of  tragedies  and
missteps  over  that  same  period,  and  we  will  continue  to  address

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

those  issues  whenever  it  is  necessary  as  part  of  the  Committee’s
ongoing oversight of NASA.

But  at  the  end  of  the  day,  however,  NASA  and  its  programs  are
still  recognized  around  the  world  as  a  shining  symbol  of  America’s
preeminence in science technology, and we need to ensure that con-
tinues to be the case.

In  that  regard,  I  am  pleased  that  the  House  of  Representatives
passed  the  Committee’s  bipartisan  NASA  Authorization  Act  by  an
overwhelming  margin,  because  I  believe  the  bill  will  help  provide
positive  guidance  to  the  next  Administration  regarding  the  impor-
tance  of  investing  in  our  nation’s  civil  space  and  aeronautics  pro-
grams  and  investing  at  a  level  that  is  equal  to  the  tasks  we  have
asked the agencies to undertake.

I  look  forward  to  the  Senate  completing  its  work  on  the  bill  so
that  we  can  send  it  to  the  President  for  his  signature  before  Con-
gress adjourns.

I  also  want  to  express  my  deep  appreciation  to  the  noted  physi-
cist, Professor Stephen Hawking, for his submitting a pre-recorded
message  that  will  be  played  during  this  hearing.  However,  before
we hear from the witnesses and Professor Hawking, I also want to
recognize some special guests we have in the audience today. I am
very  pleased  that  two  former  Chairmen  of  the  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Committee,  Bob  Walker  and  Sherry  Boehlert,  are  able  to
join us today.

In addition, I would also like to recognize NASA Deputy Admin-
istrator,  Shana  Dale,  who  has  joined  us  today  also.  So  welcome  to
each of you, and thank you for your contribution to this committee
and to Congress and to NASA.

Now  I  would  like  to  return  to  my  friend  and  colleague,  Ranking
Member Hall, a long-time strong supporter of NASA, for any open-
ing comments that he would care to make.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BART GORDON

Good morning.
I will be brief in my opening remarks, because we have a very distinguished panel

of witnesses, and I know that we all want to hear from them.

However, I do want to provide some context for today’s hearing.
As  many  of  you  know,  this  year  marks  the  50th  anniversary  of  the  creation  of

the Science and Technology Committee.

We  were  one  of  Congress’s  responses  to  the  Soviet  Union’s  successful  launch  of

Sputnik 1 in late 1957.

Sputnik led to a national reexamination of America’s educational system, our sci-
entific  research  infrastructure,  and  our  goals  and  capabilities  for  space  exploration.
And this committee was given the responsibility of leading congressional oversight

of those issues.

tion was established.

1958  also  marked  the  year  that  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administra-

In  fact,  yesterday—July  29th—marked  the  50th  anniversary  of  President  Eisen-
hower’s  signing  of  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Act  of  1958,  the  legislation
that created NASA.

So  it  is  fitting  that  we  take  time  to  look  back  at  what  NASA  has  accomplished
over  the  past  50  years,  as  well  as  look  ahead  to  the  opportunities  and  challenges
facing the agency over its next 50 years.

We often forget how much we owe to the men and women of NASA who in many

ways have helped create the world in which we live today.

They  have  dramatically  advanced  our  knowledge  of  our  home  planet  Earth  and
of  the  universe  at  large  through  an  amazing  array  of  scientific  spacecraft  over  the
past five decades.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

Indeed, it’s no exaggeration to say that NASA’s accomplishments have helped re-

write the science textbooks more than once.

NASA’s men and women have also helped create the technologies that have made
possible  the  commercial  aircraft  and  the  aviation  system  that  contribute  so  much
to  our  nation’s  economic  vitality—as  well  as  technologies  that  have  helped  enable
the military aircraft that defend our freedom.

Finally,  NASA’s  men  and  women  have  led  the  way  in  helping  humanity  to  move
out into the solar system, including putting the first footprints on the Moon almost
40 years ago.

In  doing  so,  they  have  inspired  successive  generations  to  seek  to  achieve  chal-

lenging goals in science and technology.

In short, NASA has accomplished a great deal in its first 50 years.
Of  course,  the  agency  has  also  had  its  share  of  tragedies  and  missteps  over  that
same  period,  and  we  will  continue  to  address  those  issues  whenever  necessary  as
part of the Committee’s ongoing oversight of NASA.

At  the  end  of  day,  however,  NASA  and  its  programs  are  still  recognized  around
the  world  as  a  shining  symbol  of  American  preeminence  in  science  and  technology.

We need to ensure that that continues to be the case.
In  that  regard,  I  am  pleased  that  the  House  of  Representatives  passed  the  Com-
mittee’s  bipartisan  NASA  Authorization  Act  by  an  overwhelming  margin,  because  I
believe  that  bill  will  help  provide  positive  guidance  to  the  next  Administration  re-
garding the importance of investing in our nation’s civil space and aeronautics pro-
grams—and investing at a level that is equal to the tasks we have asked the agency
to undertake.

I  look  forward  to  the  Senate  completing  its  work  on  the  bill  so  that  we  can  send

it to the President for his signature before this Congress adjourns.

I also want to express my deep appreciation to the noted physicist, Professor Ste-
phen Hawking, for submitting a pre-recorded message that we will play during this
hearing.

However, before we hear from our witnesses and Professor Hawking, I would like

to recognize some special guests we have in the audience today.

I am very pleased that two former Chairmen of the Science and Technology Com-

mittee, Bob Walker and Sherry Boehlert, were able to join us today.

In  addition,  I  would  also  like  to  recognize  NASA  Deputy  Administrator  Shana

Dale who has also joined us today.

Welcome to each of you.
Now  I’d  like  to  turn  to  my  friend  and  colleague,  Ranking  Member  Hall—a  long-
time strong supporter of NASA—for any opening comments he would care to make.
Mr.  HALL.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you,  and  you  have  made  good

comments, and it gives me great pleasure to be here today.

NASA  has  given  us  so  many  really  great  accomplishments  and
such  pride  and  so  many  great  American  heroes,  and  today  we  are
honored  to  have  Senator  Glenn  here,  who  is  certainly  everyone’s
hero. Spent a lifetime serving this country, first as a Naval aviator,
then  as  an  American,  the  first  American  to  orbit  the  Earth  and
serving  24  years  as  a  U.S.  Senator  from  Ohio.  And  I  was  proud  to
be on the John Glenn President for a long, long time in Texas, and
they  still,  half  the  people  there  think  he  won.  And  the  very  lovely
Mrs.  Glenn,  who  would  have  made  a  great  first  lady.  We  are  glad
to have you with us.

I  also  am  pleased  to  see  other  distinguished  Americans  on  our
panel today. Norm Augustine, a good friend and longtime supporter
of  everything  that  is  good  and  great  for  NASA  and  for  the  Amer-
ican people. My recommendation to either of those Presidential as-
pirants  for  a  Vice  President,  if  we  could  push  you  into  it,  but  I
know  we  couldn’t,  because  I  suggested  it  to  you,  and  you  said  you
thought I was your friend.

Speaking of Norm, the American people really should feel at ease
if  we  could  accept  this,  would  accept  that  second  spot.  We’ll  talk
about that later.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

Dr. Stephen Hawking, I also want to take a moment to welcome
my good friends and former colleagues as Bart has done. Bob Walk-
er  and  Sherry  Boehlert,  who,  along  with  Jim  Sensenbrenner,  have
ably  chaired  this  committee.  And  also  I  would  like  to  mention  the
Chairmen  I  have  worked  with  here  who  could  not  make  it  here
today,  Don  Fuqua,  what  a  guy,  and  Robert  Roe,  and  the  late
George Brown.

So  it  is  really  fitting  to  reflect  on  the  accomplishments  of  both
NASA  and  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee.  Shana,  we  are
happy to see you and glad to see that you are still running NASA.
We look to you for leadership as you have given us for a lot of your
years.  I  think  the  first  time  I  ever  saw  you  you  were  working  for
NASA, you were on a tricycle. That is how long you have been with
us,  so  I  won’t  mention  the  number  of  years.  But  welcome  to  you.
In the decade after World War II American leadership in science
and technology was largely taken for granted, and we may have al-
lowed  ourselves  to  get  too  complacent.  When  the  Soviets  launched
Sputnik  in  October  of  1957,  I  well  remember  it.  I  watched  it,  and
it  was  a  real  wakeup  call  for  the  country.  In  1958,  under  House
Speaker  Sam  Rayburn,  whose  Texas  fourth  district  I  proudly  rep-
resent  at  this  time,  the  Select  Committee  on  Astronautics  and
Space  Exploration  was  established.  Shortly  thereafter  the  Com-
mittee  created  NASA  from  what  was  then  the  National  Advisory
Committee  on  Aeronautics  and  the  permanent  House  Committee
on Science and Astronautics or our forerunner was chartered.

We rose to the challenge of Sputnik. We caught up with and then
surpassed  the  Soviets,  and  in  doing  so  we  demonstrated  to  the
world  our  American  values  of  democracy  and  peaceful  scientific
achievements,  but  scientific  and  technological  advantages  tend  to
be  short-lived,  and  they  rely  on  a  steady  stream  of  education  and
innovation that must be nurtured.

While we celebrate and reflect on NASA’s past accomplishments,
it  is  also  clear  that  the  future  challenges  and  opportunities  are  no
less  daunting,  no  less  important,  and  no  less  inspiring  than  those
of the last 50 years.

NASA’s  astronautical  programs  are  vital  as  developing  the  next
generation of aircraft and air traffic management systems that will
help expand our economy through increased capacity with less fre-
quent  and  less  costly  delays  and  by  developing  technologies  that
will enable safer and more efficient aircraft.

NASA’s  space  science  programs  contribute  to  our  knowledge  of
our  solar  system,  the  sun,  and  the  universe.  Space  science  has  al-
ways  been  very  practical  and  has  had  practical  applications  devel-
oping  the  means  to  monitor  solar  space  weather  events  which  can
disrupt  the  transmission  of  GPS  signals  and  satellite  communica-
tions  and  interfere  with  ground-based  systems  such  as  our  elec-
tricity grid or our military weapons targeting.

So  finally,  NASA’s  Earth  Science  programs  have  greatly  ad-
vanced our understanding of our home planet. We are beginning to
better  understand  the  Earth  and  the  ways  that  weather,  the
oceans, land masses, icecaps, and the atmosphere interact with one
another. Through NASA-developed technology, we are also improv-
ing  our  ability  to  predict  weather,  help  farmers  increase  crop  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

duction,  give  local  governments  the  ability  to  better  manage  land
use, fisheries, and many other practical uses.

And  in  human  space  exploration,  NASA  is  completing  construc-
tion  of  the  International  Space  Station.  The  ISS  is  the  largest
international  engineering  and  construction  project  ever  under-
taken,  and  research  on-board  Station  holds  the  promise  of  life-
changing  medical  breakthroughs.  We  will  pursue  many  of  our  fu-
ture  space  exploration  challenges  with  our  international  friends
and allies, and those arrangements offer the potential for sustained
peaceful cooperation in both science and technology.

If  America  wants  to  retain  its  status  in  the  world  and  the  pres-
tige  and  power  that  comes  from  leadership,  we  cannot  be  compla-
cent. Other countries are making great strides, and American lead-
ership  is  not  guaranteed.  We  can  succeed  at  whatever  we  put  our
minds to as long as we stay focused.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  look  forward  to  today’s  hearing.  I  look  forward
to  celebrating  some  of  our  past  successes.  I  also  look  forward  to
hearing from our panelists how we can all work together to ensure
that  the  next  50  years  are  even  better.  I  am  proud  to  have  been
a  part  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee  for  27  years.  To-
gether  we  have  accomplished  amazing  revolutionary  things.  You
have  given  us  good  leadership  as  our  Chairman.  We  are  the  lead-
ing Committee in the United States Congress on successfully trans-
mitting  bills  that  come  before  us  and  handle  them  properly,  and  I
am confident that our finest hour is still ahead of us.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RALPH M. HALL

Mr.  Chairman,  it  gives  me  great  pleasure  to  be  here  today  celebrating  the  50th
anniversary  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee,  and  honoring  the  great
achievements  of  the  men  and  women  of  NASA  over  the  past  50  years.  NASA  has
given us so many great accomplishments, and so many great American heroes.

Today  we  are  honored  to  have  Senator  John  Glenn,  a  true  American  hero  who
has  spent  a  lifetime  serving  his  country,  first  as  a  Naval  Aviator,  then  as  the  first
American to orbit the Earth, and then serving 24 years as a U.S. Senator from Ohio.
Senator Glenn, it’s an honor to have you with us today.

I  would  also  like  to  welcome  the  other  distinguished  Americans  on  our  panel
today;  Norm  Augustine,  and  Dr.  Maria  Zuber.  Speaking  of  Norm  Augustine,  the
American people should feel at ease if he would accept the second spot on the Presi-
dential  ticket.  We  will  also  hear  pre-recorded  testimony  from  noted  physicist  and
author,  Dr.  Stephen  Hawking.  I  also  want  to  take  a  moment  to  welcome  my  good
friends and former colleagues, Bob Walker and Sherry Boehlert, who along with Jim
Sensenbrenner,  have  ably  chaired  this  committee  in  the  past.  I  would  also  like  to
mention other Chairmen I have worked with but who could not make it today; Don
Fuqua, Robert Roe, and the late George Brown.

It is fitting to reflect on the accomplishments of both NASA, and the Science and
Technology  Committee  over  the  last  half  century  because  they  were  born  of  the
same  crisis.  In  the  decade  after  World  War  II,  American  leadership  in  science  and
technology was largely taken for granted. We may have allowed ourselves to get too
complacent.  When  the  Soviets  launched  Sputnik  in  October  1957,  it  was  a  real
wake-up call for the country.

In  1958,  under  House  Speaker  Sam  Rayburn,  whose  Texas  fourth  district  I  now
represent,  the  Select  Committee  on  Astronautics  and  Space  Exploration  was  estab-
lished.  Shortly  thereafter,  the  Committee  created  NASA  from  what  was  then  the
National Advisory Committee on Aeronautics; and the permanent House Committee
on Science and Astronautics—our forerunner—was chartered.

We  rose  to  the  challenge  of  Sputnik.  We  caught  up  with—and  then  surpassed—
the  Soviets.  And  in  doing  so  we  demonstrated  to  the  world  our  American  values  of
democracy and peaceful scientific achievements. But scientific and technological ad-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

vantages  tend  to  be  short  lived,  and  they  rely  on  a  steady  stream  of  education  and
innovation  that  must  be  nurtured.  While  we  celebrate  and  reflect  on  NASA’s  past
accomplishments, it is also clear that future challenges and opportunities are no less
daunting,  no  less  important,  and  no  less  inspiring  than  those  of  the  past  50  years.
NASA’s  aeronautical  programs  are  vital  to  developing  the  next  generation  of  air-
craft  and  air  traffic  management  systems  that  will  help  expand  our  economy
through  increased  capacity  with  less  frequent  and  less  costly  delays,  and  by  devel-
oping technologies that will enable safer, and more efficient aircraft.

NASA’s  space  science  programs  contribute  to  our  knowledge  of  our  solar  system,
the Sun, and the universe. Space science also has very practical applications, devel-
oping  the  means  to  monitor  solar  space  weather  events,  which  can  disrupt  the
transmission  of  GPS  signals  and  satellite  communications  and  interfere  with
ground-based systems such as our electricity grid or military weapons targeting.

NASA’s  Earth  Science  programs  have  greatly  advanced  our  understanding  of  our
home  planet.  We  are  beginning  to  better  understand  the  Earth,  and  the  ways  that
weather,  the  oceans,  land  masses,  ice  caps,  and  the  atmosphere  interact  with  one
another.  Through  NASA-developed  technology,  we’re  also  improving  our  ability  to
predict  weather,  help  farmers  increase  crop  production,  and  give  local  governments
the ability to better manage land-use, fisheries, and many other practical uses.

And  in  human  space  exploration,  NASA  is  completing  construction  of  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station.  The  ISS  is  the  largest  international  engineering  and  con-
struction project ever undertaken, and research on-board Station holds the promise
of  life-changing  medical  breakthroughs.  We  will  pursue  many  of  our  future  space
exploration challenges with our international friends and allies, and those arrange-
ments  offer  the  potential  for  sustained  peaceful  cooperation  in  science  and  tech-
nology.

If  America  wants  to  retain  its  status  in  the  world,  and  the  prestige  and  power
that comes from leadership, we can not be complacent. Other countries are making
great strides, and American leadership is not guaranteed. We can succeed at what-
ever we put our minds to, as long as we stay focused.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  look  forward  to  today’s  hearing.  I  look  forward  to  celebrating
some  of  our  past  successes.  I  also  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  panelists  how
we  all  can  work  together  to  ensure  that  the  next  50  years  are  even  better.  I  am
proud  to  have  been  a  part  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee  for  27  years.
Together  we  have  accomplished  amazing  and  revolutionary  things,  and  I  am  con-
fident our finest hour is ahead of us.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you very much, Mr. Hall.
If  there  are  Members  who  wish  to  submit  additional  opening

statements, your statement will be added to the record.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today.  I  am  pleased  that  the
Committee  has  taken  time  to  honor  the  50th  anniversary  of  the  establishment  of
the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  and  review  its  accom-
plishments and examine its future challenges.

NASA’s accomplishments have been numerous in its relatively short history, most
notably  multiple  lunar  landings  beginning  in  1969,  international  cooperation  with
Soviet  and  Russian  space  programs  throughout  the  Cold  War,  and  most  recently,
invaluable research and discovery on the planet Mars.

What is evident from NASA’s accomplishments over the past decades is that they
were achieved through a national commitment—through Sputnik, through President
Kennedy’s  inaugural  address  challenging  this  country  to  put  a  man  on  the  moon,
and through the establishment of this committee and others.

Today NASA faces steep challenges—it continues to operate on a nearly stagnant
budget and with the end of Shuttle flights, faces an operational gap before the next
generation of space flight technologies become available. From this hearing and oth-
ers honoring this anniversary, we must learn from our past, from mistakes we made
and from what we were able to accomplish.

The  Committee  has  a  number  of  distinguished  panelists  today,  witnesses  that
have been intricately involved with NASA’s many accomplishments over its history.
I  look  forward  to  our  testimony  today  and  I  yield  back  the  remainder  of  my  time.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

20

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  want  to  welcome  our  distinguished  witnesses:  Sen-

ator John Glenn, Mr. Norman Augustine, and Dr. Maria Zuber.

Each  of  you  has  played  an  important  role  in  directing  and  analyzing  the  state  of

our space and aeronautics efforts.

The  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  is  critical  to  my  home  State

of Texas, and the research it has supported has benefited all of mankind.

Today’s hearing will assess NASA’s 50 years of existence; analyze its current state

of operations; and provide guidance for the Administration in the years ahead.

NASA  celebrates  50  years  since  its  establishment.  For  50  years,  NASA  research
has  enabled  scientists  to  continue  to  do  ground-breaking  research  in  a  zero-gravity
environment, with untold benefits.

For  example,  one  of  the  many  spinoff  technologies  from  the  Hubble  telescope  is
the  use  of  its  Charge  Coupled  Device  (CCD)  chips  for  digital  imaging  breast  biop-
sies.

The  resulting  device  images  tissue  more  clearly  and  efficiently  than  other  tech-

The  CCD  chips  can  detect  the  small  differences  between  a  malignant  or  benign

tumor, without the need for a surgical biopsy.

This  saves  the  patient  weeks  of  recovery  time,  and  the  cost  for  this  procedure  is

hundreds of dollars vs. thousands for a surgical biopsy.

With  over  500,000  women  needing  biopsies  a  year,  the  economic  benefits  are  tre-
mendous,  not  to  mention  the  reduction  in  pain,  scarring,  radiation  exposure,  time,
and money associated with surgical biopsies.

Of  course,  this  is  just  one  of  so  many  examples  of  NASA  research  that  benefits

nologies.

society with broader applications.

NASA has played such a key role in outreach and education activities.
A  well-educated  technical  workforce  is  essential  to  NASA’s  success,  and  it  is  im-
perative for the agency to continue to invest in education as well as its other activi-
ties.

Again, I want to congratulate NASA for 50 years of stellar work.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back the balance of my time.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Udall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE MARK UDALL

Good  morning.  I  am  very  pleased  that  we  are  holding  today’s  hearing  to  com-
memorate the 50th anniversary of the National Aeronautics and Space Administra-
tion  (NASA).  NASA  is  one  of  the  crown  jewels  of  the  Nation’s  research  enterprise,
and it has a positive ‘‘brand’’ that is known throughout the world. As Chairman Gor-
don has noted, this week marks the 50th anniversary of the signing of the National
Aeronautics  and  Space  Act  of  1958—the  legislation  that  established  NASA,  so  it  is
quite  appropriate  that  we  hold  this  hearing  now.  I  also  want  to  welcome  the  very
distinguished  panel  of  witnesses  that  is  appearing  before  us  today.  We  appreciate
your service.

The  world  is  in  many  ways  a  far  different  place  than  it  was  a  half  century  ago.
Many of the technologies and capabilities that we take for granted today would have
been considered to be in the realm of science fiction back in 1958. Moreover, I have
little doubt that fifty years from now, many of today’s technologies and accomplish-
ments  and  scientific  knowledge  will  be  considered  quaint  at  best.  That  is  the  dy-
namic  reality  of  scientific  and  technological  advance.  And  that  advance  can  lead  us
to  a  brighter  future,  if  we  take  the  steps  necessary  to  ensure  that  we  harness  the
fruits of those advances in science and engineering for the benefit of society.

One  of  the  significant  engines  of  scientific  and  technological  progress  in  America
over the past fifty years has been NASA. Indeed, investments made in NASA since
1958  have  produced  achievements  that  have  profoundly  affected  our  daily  lives,
whether  through  the  practical  benefits  of  NASA’s  meteorological  satellite  R&D  and
its  remote  sensing  satellites  or  by  means  of  the  innumerable  improvements  NASA
has  made  to  our  civil  and  military  aircraft  technologies—improvements  that  have
made them safer, faster, more efficient, and more environmentally friendly.

Yet  NASA’s  impact  has  been  even  more  profound,  leading  to  extraordinary  ad-
vances  in  our  understanding  of  the  universe—witness  the  amazing  discoveries  en-
abled by the Hubble Space Telescope—and of our Earth, especially in understanding
the complex factors involved in climate change. NASA’s human space missions have
also  fundamentally  changed  our  world  view,  as  people  around  the  world  saw  Earth
for  the  first  time  as  a  bluish-white  globe  suspended  in  the  inky  blackness  of  space
while humans walked for the first time on the surface of another world nearly forty

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

years  ago.  That  change  in  world  view  has  also  been  one  of  the  fruits  of  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  project—a  project  involving  some  16  nations  in  a  complex
and challenging cooperative mission. And it is a perspective that will produce bene-
fits  in  the  future  as  America  leads  cooperative  efforts  to  explore  our  solar  system
with humans and robots.

As  I  note  the  amazing  impact  of  NASA  on  our  nation  over  the  past  fifty  years,
I am of course aware of the times when NASA’s missions have not gone as planned,
when missions have ended in tragedy, and when cost growth and technical problems
have led to outcomes less successful than we would have liked. As Chairman of the
Space  and  Aeronautics  Subcommittee,  I  recognize  those  problems  and  have  worked
to help prevent their recurrence. That is the proper role of Congressional oversight,
and I take that responsibility seriously.

Yet,  that  said,  I  think  that  as  we  look  back  at  all  NASA  has  accomplished  over
the past half century as well as what NASA is seeking to achieve even as we speak,
I  think  we  owe  a  debt  of  appreciation  to  all  the  men  and  women  of  NASA,  its  con-
tractors,  and  the  universities  and  research  institutions  that  have  made  it  all  pos-
sible.  So  in  conclusion,  I  would  just  like  to  say  ‘‘Happy  birthday,  NASA—we  look
forward to many more years of accomplishments from you.’’

[The prepared statement of Ms. Richardson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE LAURA RICHARDSON

Thank  you  Chairman  Gordon  for  holding  this  important  hearing  today.  I  would
also  like  to  thank  our  witnesses,  in  particular  the  former  Senator  from  Ohio,  and
the  first  American  to  orbit  Earth,  Mr.  John  Glenn  for  their  willingness  to  appear
before this committee as we discuss the state of NASA moving forward.

This  hearing  marks  the  second  in  a  series  of  three  hearings  celebrating  the  50th
anniversary  of  NASA  and  the  creation  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee.
Back in March this committee had a productive conversation with former Microsoft
CEO Bill Gates about the state of American innovation. During that discussion Mr.
Gates  emphasized  the  need  to  focus  our  time  and  energy  on  our  most  precious  re-
source, our children. Quite frankly any discussion about the future of NASA, Amer-
ican innovation, and our nation’s standing in the global scientific community should
include the youngest segment of the population responsible for ushering in the next
era of creativity and advancement that has come to characterize NASA.

With the recent landing of the spacecraft Phoenix on Mars, coupled with my own
opportunity to witness the launch of the Space Shuttle Endeavour, there is no doubt
in  my  mind  that  we  can  continue  to  build  upon  our  past  achievements.  However,
we can not rest on our laurels to be leaders in innovation, we must also invest.

Back  in  February  the  Full  Committee  held  a  hearing  on  the  NASA  budget,  and
at  that  time  I  expressed  concern  with  cuts  to  the  budget  in  several  areas.  As  Sen-
ator  Glenn  mentioned  in  his  testimony,  space  flight  has  allowed  the  scientific  com-
munity to perform critical research in zero gravity environments, and construct the
International  Space  Station.  However,  absent  a  lack  of  funding,  the  United  States
will not have a viable means for space travel. Every effort to shorten this gap must
be made to ensure that scientific progress in this country is not stymied.

In conclusion I want to reiterate my support for NASA, including past and present
NASA  personnel  who  conduct  the  activities  which  will  keep  us  at  the  forefront  of
innovation. I look forward to a very productive discussion.

Mr. Chairman I yield back my time.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  hosting  this  monumental  hearing  to  celebrate  the
50th anniversary of the creation of the National Aeronautics and Space Administra-
tion (NASA).

The National Aeronautics and Space Act was signed into law 50 years ago yester-
day,  on  July  29,  1958,  establishing  NASA.  Our  nation  has  witnessed  extraordinary
moments  because  of  NASA’s  creation;  we  successfully  and  safely  launched  the  first
flight  of  humans  into  space  and  land  them  on  the  Moon.  In  fact,  we  have  the  first
American to orbit the Earth before us today. Space exploration and aeronautical de-
velopments have enabled the creation of new technologies and capacities.

I  am  proud  that  our  committee  passed  the  NASA  reauthorization  bill  this  year.
We  must  continue  to  adequately  fund  NASA’s  efforts,  pushing  the  agency  and  Na-
tion forward.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

I  was  thrilled  to  witness  a  Space  Shuttle  liftoff  this  year  in  Florida.  The  excite-
ment I felt must have been minimal compared to the awe of viewing the Earth while
orbiting the planet for the first time, Senator. Yet, NASA continues to create a sense
of  national  pride  and  personal  inspiration  for  millions  of  Americans  even  without
viewing a liftoff or orbiting the Earth first-hand.

I  would  like  to  thank  today’s  witnesses,  Senator  Glenn,  Mr.  Augustine,  and  Dr.
Zuber, for taking the time to appear before us. I look forward to hearing your testi-
monies.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mitchell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE HARRY E. MITCHELL

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Thank you for holding this hearing to celebrate the 50th anniversary of the estab-

lishment of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA).

NASA  conducts  vital  research  and  development  projects  that  help  us  learn  about

our surroundings.

Arizona  State  University,  which  is  located  in  my  district,  is  home  to  researchers

who on many of these important NASA research projects.

To  maintain  America’s  competitiveness  in  science  and  technology,  we  must  do
more  than  merely  keep  up.  We  must  lead,  and  commit  ourselves  to  providing  the
resources necessary to keep us at the forefront of this kind of cutting edge research
and development.

I look forward to hearing more from our witnesses about NASA’s accomplishments

as well as its future challenges and opportunities.

I yield back.
Chairman  GORDON.  And  at  this  time  I  will  now  introduce  our
witnesses. First up will be the Honorable John Glenn, who was the
first  American  to  orbit  the  Earth  as  part  of  the  original  Mercury
7  astronauts.  He  then  served  the  State  of  Ohio  as  Senator  for  24
years,  and  in  1998,  Senator  Glenn  returned  to  orbit  as  the  oldest
person  to  fly  in  space  as  a  crew  member  of  the  Space  Shuttle  Dis-
covery. And Mr. Glenn, we welcome you here.

Secondly, we will have Dr. Norm Augustine, who was the Chair-
man  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  Lockheed  Martin  Corporation
and went on to chair numerous advisory panels including the 1990,
Advisory Committee on the Future of the U.S. Space Program, and
most  recently  he  chaired  the  Committee  that  authorized  or  au-
thored  the  profoundly  important  National  Academy’s  Report,  Ris-
ing Above the Gathering Storm.

And  finally,  Dr.  Maria  Zuber,  who  is  currently  the  Department
Head and E.A. Griswold Professor of Geophysics in the Department
of  Earth,  Atmospheric,  and  Planetary  Sciences  at  the  Massachu-
setts  Institute  of  Technology.  She  also  served  on  the  President’s
Commission  on  Implementation  of  the  United  States  Space  Explo-
ration Policy and is a member of the National Academy of Science.
Welcome to you.

And we will begin with Senator Glenn.
STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. GLENN, JR., UNITED STATES

SENATE (RETIRED)

Mr.  GLENN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members

of the Committee.

To  be  asked  to  comment  on  NASA’s  first  50  years  and  then  con-
template  where  we  go  from  here  for  the  next  50  years  or  more  is
a  big  order.  It  has  been  a  wondrous  half  century  to  say  the  least.
Mankind for the very first time learned to get off the surface of the
Earth  and  make  a  lot  of  progress  in  getting  into  this  new  labora-
tory of space.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

We  can’t  help  but  remind  ourselves  of  the  losses  along  the  way
of  good  friends  who  are  no  longer  with  us  who  were  sacrificed  in
this whole process, but we look forward to the coming days as me-
morial to those folks who were good friends who lost their lives.

Exploration  comes,  and  this  will  be  a  summary  of  my  longer  re-
marks,  which  I  ask  would  be  put  in  the  record  if  we  could,  please.
This will be a summary of them.

Exploration  comes  down  into  two  areas  in  my  mind.  One  is
macro, one is micro. Macro is going out deeper into space, going off
Earth and going wherever we can learn how to travel. Micro to me
is equally important in that it does the experimenting, the research
that maximizes the research return for benefit of people right here
on  Earth.  And  that  is  an  area  that  I  will  give  special  attention  to.
In the first 50 years we had the Mercury Program, we had, that
started  us  off.  We  had  the  Gemini  Program  in  which  we  learned
to  rendezvous,  Apollo  that  gave  us  that  wondrous  day,  I  certainly
will  never  forget  when  Neil  Armstrong  made  the  first  footprint  on
some place other than Earth.

We went on to use some old equipment and use Skylab. We built
the  Orbiter,  which  could  then  stay  up  for  a  14-day  period  of  time,
and along with that we asked colleges, universities, and businesses
to be involved with this, because we could now do research in space
that we never were able to do before.

Beyond  that  we  developed  a  Space  Station  for  longer-term  re-
search  because  we  thought  it  was  that  important,  and  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  then,  when  we  asked  15  other  nations  to
join us.

The number of projects that were, are illustrated by the fact that
on STS–95, the flight of Discovery I was privileged to be on in ’98,
we  had  83  different  research  projects,  and  Columbia  before  its  de-
mise had 90 research projects on that one flight.

So the community, the colleges, universities, and businesses had
reacted very favorably to our proposals to let them or to encourage
them to use space for this new research.

We  had  developed  robotics  along  the  way,  which  is  amazing  in
its  own.  NASA  set  up  a,  they  were  enough  into  the  research  area
that they set up a special research planning Office of Biological and
Physical Research (OBPR). And they had five different areas under
that  in  which  they  were  looking  forward  to  conducting  very  basic
experiments;  bio-technology,  combustion,  fluid  physics,  funda-
mental physics, and material science.

Now, there have been delays, and we look forward in those areas
to  longer-term  research  on  the  Station.  There  have  been  delays  in
completing  the  International  Space  Station  because  of  Columbia
and some of the other engineering problems, but those will be even-
tually solved.

Along  the  way  George  H.W.  Bush,  our  41st  President,  proposed
a Mars Program, and there wasn’t a whole lot of support for it, and
when  the  Administration  changed,  the  idea  sort  of  died,  but  an-
other  proposal  for  the  Mars  Program,  the  Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration  was  put  forward  by  the  current  President,  George  Bush,  in
January  of  2004.  This  time  there  was  not  a  wait  for  support.  The
President just put a directive over to NASA to do it, and NASA re-
sponded.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Congress,  this  was  not  what  Congress  had  really  voted  the  ap-
propriations for that time period, and Congress responded later on
to this change of direction.

One  note  here  that  I  would  toss  out  to  the  Committee  is  I  don’t
think we know yet, we don’t have a clear definition of exactly what
the ultimate objective of the Moon Project is going to be. In Cleve-
land  in  2007,  the  President  said,  and  I  quote,  ‘‘And,  therefore,  we
set a new mission which is to go to the Moon and set up a launch-
ing there to further explore space.’’ Now, I don’t know that anyone
has  really  addressed  this  yet,  but  if  that  is  really  our  mission,  it
is to set up a launch facility on the Moon, that is a whole different
complicated, expensive, and questionable safety-type proposal. So I
think that needs to be ironed out.

I  favored  the  VSE  because  I  assumed  that  it  was  in  addition  to,
not  in  place  of,  existing  problems,  existing  programs.  I  assumed
that  money  requests  would  follow.  Instead  what  we  got  were  cuts
in other research to try and pay for this program, and it wound up
in  my  view  as  the  biggest  unfunded  mandate  that  we  have  in  all
government history. We had to do it, NASA had to do it. They were
directed to do it, but it was out of the existing NASA budget, which
is a huge job, enormous job.

Congressional consent and or consultation and international con-
sultation  was  certainly  lacking  in  this  because  there  was  con-
sternation in some of those communities when this was announced.
Not  only  would  there  be  no  increase  in  funding,  but  ongoing  re-
search  at  that  time  was  cut  by  1.2  billion  over  a  five-year  period.
Now,  I  think  too  often  Mike  Griffin,  the  current  Administrator,
catches  some  of  the  blame  for  this,  because  he  is  the  one  that  has
to  implement  it.  I  don’t  see  that  as  being  fair  at  all.  I  don’t  think
it  is  his  fault.  He  is  as  loyal  a  person  as  you  could  get,  and  if  he
is  given  a  direction  of  doing  something,  he  is  going  to  do  his  level
best to do it. He was a scientist at Johns Hopkins, headed up their
space  program,  was  formerly  in  the  hierarchy  of  NASA  in  his  ear-
lier career, in fact, back when the first proposal to go to Mars was
made.

So but he gets his direction from above, and he is a loyal soldier.
He  is  going  to  do  his  level  best  to  carry  it  out,  and  that  is  what
he has been doing.

But  I  would  say  this.  Someone  once  told  me  a  long  time  ago  in
the Marine Corps, ‘‘Great plans without resources remain dreams.’’
And  nothing  could  be  more  true.  Now,  my  colleague,  the  late  Gus
Grissom, put it in more understandable terms perhaps back in the
days  when  a  cut  in  the  funding  for  the  Project  Mercury  was  being
proposed. And Gus, being the person who could always sum things
up  well,  they  asked  him  for  his  comment  on  what  the  cuts  would
do, and he said, ‘‘No bucks, no Buck Rogers.’’ And that, and so that
did it.

The  Shuttle  has  now  been  looked  at  as  the  source  of  money  to
continue with the program, because it costs some $400 million plus
per launch, and so that was looked at, and so in 2010, the present
plan is to terminate that program.

Then  for  five  years  before  our  own  spacecraft  are  developed  to
where we can use them, for at least five years, it has already been
extended one year, it may go out to more, for five years we will be

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

dependent  on  the  Russians  to  launch  our  people.  We  will  have  no
man  capability  to  go  into  space  during  that  at  least  five-year  pe-
riod. U.S. astronauts and equipment will have to be launched from
and returned to Russia to have access to our Station.

Now, I don’t think that is a very pretty picture to put before the
rest  of  the  world,  quite  frankly,  and  I  never  thought  I  would  see
the  day  when  the  world’s  richest,  most  powerful,  most  accom-
plished  space-faring  Nation  had  to  buy  tickets  from  the  Russians
to get up to our Station. I think that is a bummer.

The  Soyuz  is  not  that  great  at  the  moment  either,  our  transpor-
tation system, because it has had its own set of problems, and this
all assumes that they will be able to work out the Soyuz problems.
If  not,  we  would  be  left  with  no  way  to  get  up  there  period.  That
would be it.

Way  out,  well,  we  have  $100  billion  invested  in  this.  When  the
Station is completed, we will have over $100 billion. Our allied na-
tions, the other 15 nations, will have about another $12 to $15 bil-
lion.  So  there  is  a  $115  billion  investment  that  we  have  here,  and
we are not maximizing. We could do that, we could keep the Shut-
tles  going,  start  restoring  research  in  those  five  areas  that  NASA
was  looking  at  previously,  keep  the  Shuttle,  restart  research,  and
also keep the workforce we have, the most experienced launch engi-
neering  team,  engineering  and  launch  personnel  ever  developed
anywhere. So it would keep that workforce alive also.

We have $100 billion investment, and if we put $2.8 to $3 billion
per year additional into the program now, we could keep the Shut-
tles, keep the research, and keep the workforce. It is a huge invest-
ment  for  the  most  unique  laboratory  ever  put  together  by  anybody
anywhere, and now it would cost that comparatively small amount
to use it, use it properly. A lot of money? Yes.

But for this country with a $3 trillion budget just announced yes-
terday,  $482  deficit  that  we  owe  $482  billion  deficit,  $10  billion  a
month going into Iraq, it would seem to me that we should be able
to find enough money to maximize this thing which is so important
for our future.

The  reliability  of  the  U.S.  is  at  stake  here  also.  We  have  sci-
entists, college, university, the business, the international partners
could  all  be  brought  back  on  stream  as  they  originally  signed  on
for.

This  fits  into  a  bigger  picture,  too.  We  are  into  a  time  of
globalization.  Tom  Friedman  has  addressed  that  very  well  in  his
book about the flat Earth, and Fareed Zakaria has a new book out
on that subject, too. But what they all sum up to me is this. A na-
tion that leads in the future in education for our people, which we
did  in  the  past  and  which  is  down  now,  our  K–12  education  is  not
in  good  shape  now  compared  to  other  nations,  that  our  education
and  research.  The  second  element  is  research.  We  learn  the  new
things first, and with an educated citizenry, put them together, and
NASA  is  a  good  example  of  that,  and  NACA,  its  predecessor  that
gave us the basis for the aircraft industry as we know it today.

Our  spacecraft,  our  space  program  is  admired  as  a  symbol  of  a
great  nation  willing  to  propose  great  projects  and  carry  them  out
for  the  benefit  of  all  mankind,  and  a  true  world  leader  defining
what the future will be and in turn, making it happen.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

NASA had a mantra at one time that said their goals were to im-
prove life here, to extend life to there, to find life beyond. If we fol-
low that prioritization, and I think we can do that and still do the
VSE, if we have the will, but I would caution once again, ‘‘A great
plan with resources remains a dream.’’

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Glenn follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN GLENN

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  tes-

tify today.

Just  50  years  ago,  we  were  learning—for  the  first  time  in  all  human  history—
how  to  travel  above  the  Earth’s  atmosphere  at  amazing  speeds  and  remain  there
for increasing amounts of time. It has been a wondrous half-century.

We  will  always  remind  ourselves  that  progress  was  not  without  losses  of  some

wonderful and dedicated friends along the way.

In the beginning:

My interest in NASA goes back to the 1950’s when the first seven astronauts were
starting  what  I  viewed  as  a  completely  new  service,  akin  in  nature  to  the  existing
military  services.  The  impetus  for  the  manned  space  program  back  in  those  days
was  the  cold  war,  but  I  felt  that  this  was  not  just  a  short-term  interest  to  be  laid
down when we prevailed in that confrontation with the Soviets. There would be new
exploration, whether just out of the atmosphere, as we were contemplating in those
days  of  Project  Mercury,  or  deeper  into  space  as  a  permanent  and  growing  part  of
our  national  future.  After  all,  people  had  looked  up  for  thousands  upon  thousands
of  years  and  wondered  what  was  up  there  and  what  we  could  do,  what  we  could
learn  if  we  were  there.  Now,  for  the  first  time  in  all  human  history,  we  could  go.
What was contemplated was exploration, to go where people had not gone before,
and to exercise our innate and questing human spirit in ways never before possible.

Macro-Micro:

We could term that ‘‘macro’’ exploration to deeper space, but to me it’s more than
matched in importance by the opportunity, also for the first time in human history,
to do on-board ‘‘micro’’ exploration, in a zero G environment. For the very first time
we would be able to do unique experiments with medicines, pharmaceuticals, mate-
rial, processes, physics and other research where astronauts could be working surro-
gates for the interest of the scientific community.

That dual view had the general interest, cooperation, and support of the successor
administrations,  our  people,  the  Congress  and  scientific  community,  particularly  in
the area of micro-exploration.

From the earliest days of the space program, I believed that we served our nation
best  by  maximizing  the  research  return—macro  and  micro—at  each  new  deeper
venture  into  space.  We  would  create  maximum  long-term  public  support  as  people
realized and appreciated the personal value of this research to them and their fami-
lies.

That  concept  was  generally  accepted  through  the  years.  In  fact,  we  had  experi-
ments  on-board  even  from  the  beginning  flights  in  the  space  program.  Even  on  our
first  orbital  flight  of  Friendship  7  whose  main  purpose  was  to  just  prove  we  could
do it successfully, I had special film for certain solar pictures as well as a spectrom-
eter and other experiments.

Gemini taught us how to rendezvous.
And  of  course  nothing  can  surpass  Neil  Armstrong’s  first  step  ever  on  someplace

other than Earth. And the lunar? samples they brought back.

Skylab  used  leftover  Apollo  equipment  and  had  varied  research  studies  on  a
longer-term,  but  was  not  a  vehicle  that  could  remain  in  orbit  permanently.  By  this
time,  the  Shuttle  with  its  fourteen-day  limitation  was  used  for  expanded  micro  re-
search. The Shuttle had much more space and capacity for research. NASA encour-
aged colleges, universities and private interest with ‘‘zero G’’ projects or experiments
to  submit  their  proposals  for  consideration  along  with  NASA’s  own  in-house  devel-
oped  research.  A  process  of  evaluation  and  review  was  set  up  to  consider  the  hun-
dreds  of  proposals.  Although  some  Shuttle  flights  had  dual  purposes,  all  manifests
were filled to the maximum with research projects. For example, on the STS–95 Dis-
covery  flight  in  1998,  we  had  83  different  research  projects,  and  Columbia,  before
its ill-fated disaster, had 90 research projects on-board. Scientific, academic and cor-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

porate  communities  had  responded  very  well  to  the  challenge  of  doing  experiments
in  micro-gravity.  Space  Station  was  conceived  as  a  semi-permanent  long-term  re-
search vehicle that could accommodate a normal crew of six. To date, crew size has
been  limited  to  two  or  three  as  construction  has  been  delayed.  The  Shuttle  would
revert to its name and become principally the builder-transport vehicle.

And  in  a  move  that  I  supported,  we  asked  fifteen  other  nations  to  become  our
international  partners  on  what  now  became  the  International  Space  Station.  Some
would  have  their  own  research  modules.  In  other  words,  this  was  envisioned  as  co-
operative—rather than a competitive—space program.

Doing the macro-micro research—along with involvement with international part-
ners—seemed  to  get  the  maximum  return  for  every  dollar  spent  on  the  space  pro-
gram and I still back that concept.

Robotics:

Meanwhile,  as  we  proceeded  with  short-range  exploration  and  research  on-board,
we  would  also  have  a  robust  robotic  program  to  learn  all  we  could  about  potential
deeper space human destinations.

The concept of the ISS and its completely unique mission was well debated many
times  in  the  1990’s  in  Committees  and  on  the  House  and  Senate  floors.  I  strongly
supported  this  concept  of  the  ISS  and  the  NASA  program  and  floor  managed  the
Senate ‘‘pro’’ debate for several years. There was a long list of ISS potential benefits
of  space  research.  The  Senate  voted  in  favor  of  that,  as  did  the  House.  The  people
of  this  country  accepted  that  direction  for  the  space  program,  and  looked  forward
to benefiting from the research results.

Research Planning:

NASA  established  an  Office  of  Biological  and  Physical  Research  (OBPR)  that
oversaw  five  areas  of  inquiry  to  receive  special  research  priority  on  the  ISS:  Bio-
technology,  Combustion,  Fluid  Physics,  Fundamental  Physics,  and  Materials
Science.

Delays:

Tragedies  and  engineering  difficulties  have  delayed  station  completion.  It  has
been  partially  manned  all  through  this  period,  usually  with  a  two-person  crew,  but
will  eventually  have  a  crew  of  six.  It  is  due  to  be  completed  within  the  next  couple
of years.

MARS (SEI):

The first President Bush (41st President) announced an intent to establish a Mars
mission (Space Exploration Initiative—SEI), but it was very controversial and never
was seriously considered or funded.

MARS (VSE):

In  January  of  2004,  the  current  President  George  W.  Bush  (43rd  President)  an-
nounced  what  was  called  his  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  (VSE).  This  came  as  a
surprise and shock to most if not all Members of Congress since they had voted the
NASA appropriations for a different purpose, to the space community and our inter-
national partners, who had not been part of the decision-making process. This time
the President just directed NASA ‘‘to do it’’—period.

The  timing  of  the  President’s  announcement  I’ll  leave  to  your  speculation.  The
new program, however, was to be a complete change of direction for NASA. It called
for returning to the Moon, for extensive exploration, and then on to Mars at a later
date.  Those  two  objectives  were  to  be  the  driving  force  of  the  program.  Everything
else was to be secondary or eliminated.

Recalling  that  decision  in  Cleveland  in  2007,  the  President  said,  ‘‘And  therefore,
we  set  a  new  mission,  which  is  to  go  the  Moon  and  set  up  a  launching  there  for
which to further explore space.’’

If  carried  out,  this  proposal  to  launch  from  the  Moon  to  Mars  would  be  by  far

the most complicated and expensive compared to other Mars mission alternatives.

Presidential  advice  can  come  from  many  quarters,  but  it  would  be  interesting  to

know just who advised the President on some of the VSE proposals.

Money:

Even  with  that,  I  was  much  in  favor  of  this  new  program  because  I  felt  it  added
a  new  dimension,  added  new  excitement  for  our  young  people  and  would  engender
new  support  from  the  American  people.  However,  I  presumed,  as  did  most  others,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

the  ‘‘vision’’  was  in  addition  to  other  scheduled  NASA  programs,  not  in  place  of.  I
naturally  assumed  there  had  to  be  a  request  for  more  money  within  the  budgeting
process to accomplish these new objectives.

My  assumptions  were  incorrect.  With  no  legislative  change,  the  President’s  VSE

had just unilaterally put into place an enormous ‘‘unfunded mandate.’’

Then  Administrator  Sean  O’Keefe  came  to  one  of  the  National  Advisory  Council
(NAC)  meetings—of  which  I  was  a  member—and  informed  us  that  the  VSE  would
come  out  of  NASA’s  existing  budget.  Therefore,  all  research  on  the  ISS  that  did  not
apply directly to going to the Moon or Mars would be peremptorily cut. To say that
I was amazed at this development is an understatement.

I  was  certainly  in  favor  of  the  Moon/Mars  VSE,  but  if  the  only  way  that  could
be  done  was  by  cutting  out  all  research  on  the  ISS—the  reason  it  had  been  built—
then that broke faith with what our people had accepted as the purpose of the pro-
gram,  what  Congress  had  debated  and  approved,  and  what  our  allies  had  been
promised from this great nation.

There had been little or no consultation with Congress before this change of direc-
tion or with the fifteen other nations involved. Just directing NASA from the White
House  into  new  priorities  to  the  Moon  and  Mars  completely  altered  the  nature  of
the NASA job. It gave NASA an enormous task with no additional funding.

The  changes  announced  by  Administrator  O’Keefe  basically  eliminated  most  re-
search  projects  with  colleges,  universities  and  corporations  unless  those  projects
were  specifically  and  directly  connected  with  the  Moon/Mars  objectives.  He  said
there would not only be no increase in funding, but there would even be a research
cut of $1.2 billion over a five-year period.

New Administration:

The current NASA Administrator, Dr. Mike Griffin, is a broad-based scientist who
headed up the space department at Johns Hopkins prior to becoming Administrator,
and  had  been  in  the  hierarchy  of  NASA  many  years  ago,  during  the  earlier  Mars
proposal.  He  is  a  loyal  person  trying  to  do  the  best  job  possible  under  the  cir-
cumstances with the directions he’s been given from above. He’s taken hard criticism
for the research cuts, both ISS and others, but the changed NASA mission he’s been
given  and  the  lack  of  funding  he  is  faced  with  comes  from  higher  Administration
decisions  to  not  adequately  fund  the  new  NASA  direction,  and  I  presume  is  being
enforced by whoever is in charge of the NASA account at OMB.

If we are to have new and expensive national objectives, then we must be willing
to  pay  for  them.  With  no  change  in  budgeting  policy,  Dr.  Griffin  has  been  handed
a near ‘‘mission impossible.’’

As someone said a long time ago,

‘‘Great plans without resources remain dreams.’’

My former astronaut colleague, the late Gus Grissom, put it in even more under-

standable terms when a cut was being proposed in Project Mercury:

‘‘No bucks, no Buck Rogers.’’

End of Shuttle:

per event.

Shuttle  launches  are  expensive,  running  some  four  hundred  million  dollars  plus

The  ISS  is  scheduled  to  be  completed  during  2009.  To  save  money,  Shuttle  use
will be terminated in 2010, leaving us with at least a five-year period in which the
U.S. will not have a human space launch capability—until our newly designed Orion
spacecraft has been tested and brought into operation. That assumes it will be oper-
ational on schedule.

During  that  five-year  hiatus,  we  will  be  in  the  position  of  buying  launch  services
from the Russians. A $750 million contract has already been signed to provide a spe-
cific number of Russian launches to ferry U.S. personnel and equipment to/from our
ISS.  We  will  not  have  a  heavy-lift  capability,  up  or  down,  as  the  Shuttle  has.  Our
astronauts  and  equipment  will  have  to  be  launched  from  and  return  to  Russia  to
maintain  ISS  access.  This  assumes  that  recent  re-entry  problems  of  the  Soyuz  are
corrected.  If  there  would  be  further  Soyuz  difficulties,  we  will  be  left  with  no  way
to get to or from the ISS.

Correcting the Problem:

Additional funding of $2.8 to $3.0 billion per year could keep the Shuttle in oper-
ation until our new Constellation program equipment is ready, and at least partially
restore the ISS research program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Workforce:

Another  major  benefit  of  that  process  would  be  the  preservation  of  the  world’s
most  experienced  engineering  and  launch  teams  who  could  not  be  maintained  with
a five-year stand-down while we develop the Constellation concept. Personnel quali-
fications, training, and experience must be of great concern.

Investments:

With completion of the ISS, we will have invested just over $100 billion—$100 bil-
lion—and our colleague nations will have spent 12–15 billion to build and equip this
most  unique  laboratory  ever  conceived.  We  should  be  doing  everything  we  can  to
maximize  its  scientific  utilization  and  extends  its  life,  instead  of  just  the  opposite.
For the richest Nation on Earth with a budget of $3 trillion, to make a $100 plus
billion  investment  and  then  not  utilize  it  may  be  viewed  as  penny-wise,  but  is
pound-foolish.

Unintended results:

There are other unintended results from the Shuttle termination decision.
Dr. Samuel Ting is a professor at MIT and Nobel Laureate recipient for his work
in particle physics. When the underground Super-conducting Super-collider was can-
celed  in  1993,  he  proposed  an  alternative  concept  that  the  Department  of  Energy
supported and which NASA put on its flight manifest. It is the product of some 450
scientists  in  50  institutions  in  16  countries  that  would  study  cosmic  rays,  matter
and  anti-matter,  with  equipment  weighing  some  15,000  pounds  and  which  would
need  on-board  launch  space  of  approximately  one-third  of  the  Shuttle  cargo  bay.  It
would then be mounted on trusses on the ISS for its operation.

$1.5  billion  has  been  spent  on  the  project  to  date,  mostly  from  European  and
Asian  researchers.  A  proof  of  concept  prototype  was  successfully  flown  in  1998.
NASA  and  DOE  preparation  teams  have  spent  several  tens  of  millions  of  dollars.
With  the  cutback  in  Shuttle  launches,  the  program  has  been  put  on  what  amounts
to a permanent hold.

Reliability:

Changing direction in mid-stream has in effect pulled the rug out from under our
own  scientific  community  that  worked  very  closely  with  NASA  through  the  years.
It  has  also  pulled  the  rug  out  from  under  the  colleges,  universities,  and  businesses
that took NASA seriously and cooperated with them. Perhaps even more dangerous,
it’s pulled the rug out from under our international partners, some of whom accord-
ing  to  published  reports  are  now  looking  at  new  space  efforts  by  other  nations  for
their cooperative plans in the future.

At  a  reception  in  Washington  a  short  time  ago,  I  met  a  foreign  official  high  up
in  his  country’s  space  program—one  of  our  ISS  members—who  told  me  they  had
trusted  that  the  U.S.  was  serious  about  the  Space  Station  and  that  they  could  not
believe what the U.S. has done to them.

Globalization:

Another aspect to this that is very troubling for the long-term. We’re into a period
of  globalization  that  will  be  extremely  competitive.  Our  continued  superiority  in
science  and  research  is  not  one  that  is  guaranteed.  Tom  Friedman’s  book,  ‘‘The
World is Flat,’’ outlines some of the difficulties and prospects.

A more recent book by Fareed Zakaria discusses how other nations are closing the

scientific gap with the U.S.

U.S. Historical Strength:

If I were asked a question about what made this country great and gave us a posi-
tion  of  international  leadership  in  a  comparatively  short  period  of  time,  my  answer
would have to be two things.

Education:

One,  we  emphasized  education,  particularly  in  the  hard  sciences;  math,  science,
technology,  with  K–12  education  that  became  the  norm  for  most  of  our  people.  Out
of that came the best educated general citizenry in the world. Though not the major
subject  of  this  discussion,  our  K–12  education  ‘‘system’’  is  actually  just  over  14,700
school  boards  across  the  country,  basically  operating  independently  and  too  often
more  interested  in  saving  money  than  in  seeing  that  their  children  have  a  world
competitive education.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

Research:

The  second  element  is  basic  research  and  this  does  apply  to  this  discussion.
Throughout  our  history,  we  put  more  effort  into  basic  research,  learned  the  new
things  first,  and  with  that  educated  citizenry  in  a  free  democracy,  new  businesses
were  created,  standard  of  living  went  up,  and  we  were  able  to  develop  an  economy
that rapidly became the envy of the world.

Results:

A  good  example  is  the  research  impact  of  NASA’s  predecessor  agency,  the  Na-
tional  Advisory  Committee  for  Aeronautics  (NACA).  In  the  early  days  of  aviation,
NACA  did  the  best  aviation  research  in  the  world  in  structures,  materials,  aero-
dynamics, power plants, controls, etc. Utilizing that research, whole industries were
formed  in  a  short  period  of  time.  We  became  the  world’s  leader  with  Boeing,  Lock-
heed,  Northrop  Grumman,  North  American,  Martin-Marietta,  and  others  leading
the  way.  They  pioneered  for  the  world  the  aviation  travel  and  uses  we  depend  on
today. That would never have occurred without the kind of research that NACA did.
Today we find ourselves in the position of still being ahead in space research, but
with the trends wrong. Our research seems to be leveling off—certainly government
research has been reduced—at the same time other nations are increasing their re-
search, so the trends for the long-teen are not good.

Those  same  basics  apply  for  the  future.  World  leadership  for  the  future  will  still

go to nations that lead in education, research and innovation.

Government Leadership:

For  many  years,  some  government  agencies—NASA  and  DARPA  for  example—
have  been  fountains  of  new  and  innovative  ‘‘free  thinking’’  type  research.  The  De-
fense Advanced Research Projects Administration (DARPA) was the predecessor and
inspiration  for  the  Internet  as  we  know  it  today.  But  DARPA,  as  I  understand  it,
has  now  been  restricted  to  only  project-oriented  research.  I  presume  that  means
fewer innovation initiatives by some of the brightest minds in the world.

NASA  has  a  network  of  some  of  the  finest  laboratories  in  the  world  with  some
of  the  best  engineers  and  scientists  anywhere  who  have  worked  for  years  getting
ready for ISS research. Now research is cut in the most unusual and unique labora-
tory ever conceived. Granted, if we were doing the ISS over again, it would undoubt-
edly  be  done  differently,  but  that’s  hindsight.  We  have  it  and  its  required  an  enor-
mous investment. We should make the most of it.

Apollo:

With  the  VSE  announcement  in  January  of  2004,  perhaps  the  President  recalled
the clearly enunciated Apollo goal that was successful, but that included an equally
clarion  call  for  enabling  funds.  In  those  days,  the  people  and  the  Congress  re-
sponded  favorably.  After  January  2004,  to  the  best  of  my  knowledge,  the  President
has never made another speech about the VSE.

Additional:

Addition of $3 billion to the yearly NASA budget is small when compared to other
budget figures; to a $3 trillion national budget, to an announced $490 billion deficit,
to a monthly $10 billion Iraq bill, and to other comparisons. But with this $3 billion
investment, there is the potential of enormous return.

Additionally, we preserve our ability to travel in space and to our ISS.
We maintain a continuing engineering and launch workforce.
We restore the confidence of our international partners.
We make possible projects such as Dr. Ting’s Alpha Magnetic Spectrometer.
Our  space  program  will  remain  as  a  symbol  of  a  great  nation,  willing  to  propose
great  projects  and  carry  them  out  for  benefit  of  all,  a  true  world  leader  defining
what the future will be.

At one time NASA’s mantra was:

to improve life here

to extend life to there
to find life beyond

We  can  follow  that  prioritization  and  still  do  the  VSE  if  we  just  have  the  will,

but—

‘‘A great plan without resources remains a dream.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Senator.  You  know,  NASA  as
well  as  this  committee  was  created  by  that  so-called  Sputnik  mo-
ment, and I think that there is going to need another Sputnik mo-
ment before we are going to have those resources you speak about.
I just hope that it is not when we have to, as you say, buy a ticket
from the Russians to go to the Space Station or follow the Chinese
back  to  the  Moon,  because  once  you  have  to,  there  is  a  lead  time,
and  once  you  have  to  start  catching  up,  you  become  years,  years
behind.

So thank you for your good advice.
And now we will hear from Norm Augustine.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  NORMAN  R.  AUGUSTINE,  CHAIRMAN  AND
CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER (RETIRED), LOCKHEED MARTIN
CORPORATION
Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the
Committee. It is a distinct honor to appear before you today at this
hearing  that  recognizes  the  50th  anniversary  of  NASA  as  well  as
of  this  committee  itself.  And  it  is  particularly  to  do  so  in  the  pres-
ence of these colleagues.

I  had  the  good  fortune  to  be  in  the  control  room  when  Senator
Glenn  took  his  most  recent  flight,  and  that  was  a  great  occasion
even to sit on the ground and watch. I probably should note at the
outset  that  I  am  here  today  as  a  private  citizen.  I  am  not  rep-
resenting any of the organizations that I have been associated with
along the way.

Some  50  years  ago  as  a  graduate  student  in  aeronautical  engi-
neering, I was passing under the tower at Princeton’s graduate col-
lege,  and  another  student  came  running  up  to  me  and  excitedly
said that the Soviets had just launched a Sputnik, and frankly, my
first words were, what is a Sputnik? I was soon to learn, and I re-
call feeling almost as if a body blow had been delivered to me. This
was in the midst of the Cold War. America was supposed to be pre-
eminent in science and technology, and the Russians had beaten us
into space. So that was unfathomable.

And  it,  of  course,  carried  enormous  repercussions,  economically,

particularly militarily as well as in the space arena itself.

That  was  a  period  when  America’s  leadership  in  science  and
technology  was  to  a  very  large  degree  taken  for  granted.  It  had
been  little  noted  that  the  underpinnings  of  that  leadership  had
been  gradually  eroding.  Our  investment  in  science  and  technology
was  not  commensurate  with  the  leadership  position  that  we
thought we had held. Our public schools were showing signs of ne-
glect  and  deterioration,  particularly  when  it  came  to  the  teaching
of  mathematics  and  science.  And  our  production  of  scientists  and
engineers was stagnating.

As it turned out as you have noted, the Soviets inadvertently did
us a very great favor. America was awakened, and America stayed
awakened throughout the rest of the Cold War.

NASA  was  formed  not  only  to  assure  leadership  in  aeronautics
but  now  in  space  as  well.  This  very  committee  as  you  have  noted
was  formed  to  assure  that  the  health  of  our  nation’s  science  and
engineering enterprise was subjected to continuing attention by the
Congress.  The  Advance  Research  Projects  Agency  was  formed,  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

the  Department  of  Defense.  Our  public  schools  took  steps  to  im-
prove the quality of the education that our children were receiving,
particularly  in  the  areas  of  science  and  technology.  And  more  and
more young people were attracted to the fields of science and engi-
neering as we set new goals and in particular the Apollo Program.
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  fast  forward  if
you  will  50  years  to  an  era  of  globalization  as  mentioned  by  Sen-
ator  Glenn,  an  era  driven  in  no  small  part  by  advancements  in
science  and  technology.  Americans  by  and  large  are  very  confident
of our leadership in these fields. After all, who discovered the laser,
the  transistor,  and  the  integrated  circuit?  Who  sequenced  the
human  genome,  and  who  invented  the  personal  computer  or  the
Internet and the GPS and the iPod and so on?

NASA’s  former  Administrator  rather  revealingly  tells  a  story  of,
and  I  am  referring  to  Dan  Goldin,  tells  a  story  of  being  criticized
by  a  citizen  who  thought  that  NASA  was  investing  too  much  in
Earth satellites, and the critic had asked, and I quote, ‘‘Why do we
need meteorological satellites? We have the Weather Channel.’’

Little noticed today is that there are almost twice as many Bach-
elor’s  degrees  granted  in  physics  in  the  U.S.  the  year  before  Sput-
nik  as  there  were  last  year.  Little  noticed  is  the  number  of  engi-
neers  graduating  with  Bachelor’s  degrees  declined  by  over  20  per-
cent  in  a  recent  two-decade  period  with  a  modest  up-tick  the  last
two years, due in no small part to foreign students studying in this
country.  Or  the  number  of  Ph.D.s  in  engineering  declined  by  34
percent, the Ph.D.s granted to U.S. citizens declined by 34 percent
in a little over a decade, again, with a slight up-tick due principally
to foreign students increasing.

Further,  our  public  schools  mostly  rank  near  the  bottom  of  the
class when it comes to international tests, particularly in math and
science.  We  are  surpassed  by  such  nations  as  Azerbaijan  and  Lat-
via and Macao.

This time there is no Soviet Union to give us a precipitous wake-
up  call.  China  may  do  us  the  favor.  More  likely  this  time  we  will
have to awaken ourselves. Once awakened, as we all know. Ameri-
cans can do some truly remarkable things.

Not long after NASA was formed Senator Glenn, of course, great-
ly  strengthened  our  national  pride.  In  a  time  our  nation  badly
needed  encouragement,  Neil  Armstrong  and  Buzz  Aldrin,  aided  by
Mike  Collins,  gave  us  the  ultimate  list,  lift.  And  soon  ten  more  of
my  friends  walked  on  the  Moon,  and  all  of  them  returned  safely.
As  Buzz  Aldrin  has  said,  ‘‘It  is  amazing  what  one  person  and
100,000 of their friends can accomplish.’’

NASA’s original charter, it is worth noting, emphasized the posi-
tive impact that space activity could have on education. In my own
experience  there  is  nothing  that  excites  children  more  than  space
and dinosaurs, and we are short on the latter.

As a person who witnessed these past 50 years and was a mem-
ber of the committee that was established by the White House and
NASA  to  look  at  the  future  of  the  U.S.  Space  Program  created  not
long  after  the  Challenger  accident,  I  think  I  have  learned  a  lot  of
lessons  along  the  way,  and  what  I  would  like  to  do  in  the  interest
of time, Mr. Chairman, if you and the Committee would permit me
to submit a full statement for the record, I have listed quite a num-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

ber  of  those  lessons  that  I  think  are  important  and  that  have  a
bearing on future space activities of our country.

I  just  conclude  by  observing  that  I  think  America  could  take
enormous  pride  in  what  NASA  has  accomplished  these  past  50
years, all of which to our nation and NASA’s great credit has been
accomplished  in  the  glare  of  the  public  spotlight.  NASA,  like  any
other  organization  that  involves  human  beings,  is  not  perfect,  but
if  NASA  sets  perfection  as  a  goal,  I  believe  we  have  a  great  deal
to look forward to in the next 50 years.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Augustine follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF NORMAN R. AUGUSTINE

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee.

It  is  a  distinct  honor  to  appear  before  you  at  this  hearing  recognizing  the  50th
anniversary  of  NASA,  as  well  as  of  the  House  Science  and  Technology  Committee
itself,  and  particularly  to  do  so  in  the  presence  of  such  distinguished  colleagues.  I
should  perhaps  note  at  the  outset  that  I  am  appearing  as  a  private  citizen  and  not
representing any of the organizations with which I am or have been affiliated.

Some  fifty  years  ago,  as  a  graduate  student  in  aeronautical  engineering,  I  was
passing  under  the  tower  of  Princeton’s  graduate  college  when  another  student
excitedly  called  to  me  that  the  Soviets  had  just  launched  a  ‘‘sputnik,’’  Frankly,  my
first  words  were,  ‘‘What’s  a  ’sputnik?’’’  I  was  soon  to  learn-and  I  recall  a  feeling  al-
most  as  if  a  body  blow  had  been  delivered  to  me.  It  was  akin  to  learning  of  such
events as the death of President Kennedy, the loss of Challenger and Columbia, the
tragedy of Desert One, the Apollo fire, or 9/11. This was the midst of the Cold War;
America was supposed to be preeminent in science and technology. That Russia had
beaten us into space was unfathomable. And it carried broad repercussions.

It  was  a  period  when  America’s  leadership  in  science  and  technology  was  largely
taken for granted . . . it had been little noted that the underpinnings of that leader-
ship were gradually eroding. Our investment in science and technology was not com-
mensurate  with  the  notion  of  world  leadership.  Our  public  schools  were  showing
signs  of  neglect,  particularly  when  it  came  to  the  teaching  of  mathematics  and
science. Our production of scientists and engineers was stagnating.

As  it  turned  out,  the  Soviets  had  inadvertently  done  us  a  great  favor.  America
was  awakened  . . .  and  remained  awakened  throughout  the  remainder  of  the  Cold
War.  NASA  was  formed,  not  only  to  assure  leadership  in  aeronautics  but  now  in
space as well. This very committee was formed to assure that the health of our na-
tion’s  scientific  and  engineering  enterprise  would  be  subjected  to  continuing  atten-
tion  by  the  Congress.  The  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  was  created  within
the  Department  of  Defense.  Our  public  schools  took  steps  to  improve  the  quality  of
education our children were receiving, particularly in mathematics and science. And
more and more young people were attracted to the fields of science and engineering.
Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, fast-forward, if you will, fifty years
. . .  to  an  era  of  globalization,  driven  in  no  small  part  by  the  explosion  in  science
and technology. Americans are once again confident of our leadership in these fields.
After  all,  who  discovered  the  laser,  the  transistor,  the  integrated  circuit?  Who
sequenced  the  human  genome?  Who  created  the  personal  computer,  the  Internet,
GPS  and  the  iPod?  NASA’s  former  Administrator,  Dan  Goldin,  tells  of  being  criti-
cized  by  a  citizen  for  investing  so  much  in  Earth  satellites.  The  critic  asked,  ‘‘Why
do we need meteorological satellites . . . we have the weather channel?″

Little noticed is that there were almost twice as many Bachelor’s degrees in phys-
ics  awarded  the  year  before  Sputnik  as  now.  Little  noticed  is  that  the  number  of
engineers graduating with Bachelor’s degrees declined by over 20 percent in the last
two decades prior to a recent up-tick, the latter mostly due to an increase in foreign
students;  or  that  the  number  of  Ph.D.s  in  engineering  granted  by  U.S.  universities
to  U.S.  citizens  had  declined  by  34  percent  in  a  single  decade.  Or  that  nearly  two-
thirds of the Ph.D.s in engineering granted by U.S. universities go to foreign nation-
als;  or  that  our  public  schools  consistently  rank  near  the  bottom  of  the  class  in
mathematics  and  science  as  compared  with  their  global  counterparts,  surpassed  by
such nations as Azerbaijan, Latvia and Macao.

This  time  there  is  no  Soviet  Union  to  give  us  a  precipitous  wake-up  call.  China
may do us the favor . . . more likely this time we must awaken ourselves. But once

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

awakened, we all know that America can accomplish extraordinary deeds. Not long
after  NASA  was  formed,  now-Senator  Glenn  strengthened  our  national  pride.  In  a
time  when  our  nation  badly  needed  encouragement,  Neil  Armstrong  and  Buzz
Aldrin,  aided  by  Mike  Collins,  gave  us  the  ultimate  lift.  Soon,  ten  more  of  my
friends  walked  on  the  moon-and  all  returned  safely.  As  Buzz  Aldrin  has  said,  ‘‘It’s
amazing what one person and 100,000 of his friends can accomplish.’’ NASA’s origi-
nal  charter  emphasized  the  positive  impact  the  space  program  can  have  on  edu-
cation. In my own experience there is nothing that excites small children like space
(and dinosaurs!).

As  a  witness  to  these  past  50  years  of  effort  in  space  and  as  a  member  of  the
committee  that  was  established  by  the  White  House  and  NASA  on  the  Future  of
the  U.S.  Space  Program  not  long  after  the  loss  of  Challenger,  I  believe  I  have
learned many lessons. Perhaps I might share a few of them on this occasion. It, for
example, has been my observation that:

• The  most  effective  space  program  is  a  balanced  space  program,  one  that  uti-
lizes  humans  for  those  functions  where  humans  excel  and  uses  robots  for
those functions where robots excel. As the aforementioned White House/NASA
committee noted in hindsight, we would not have risked the lives of seven hu-
mans to place a communications satellite on orbit. Nor, for that matter, would
we  expect  a  robot  to  have  performed  the  repair  of  the  Hubble  Space  Tele-
scope.
• Given a balanced space program, first priority nonetheless goes to the conduct
of  research.  It  is  here  that  the  greatest  return  per  dollar  can  frequently  be
realized and where fundamental new knowledge can be derived.
• The  human  space  program  is  justified  by  the  need  of  human  beings  and  na-
tions  to  explore  the  unknown  . . .  to  push  back  frontiers.  It  cannot  be  justi-
fied  solely  by  technological  spin-offs  or  scientific  returns,  even  though  these
benefits are often not insignificant. Sir Edmund Hillary standing atop Mount
Everest is simply different from using a rocket to launch an instrument pack-
age to the top of Mount Everest.
• Transportation remains the primary stumbling block to a vigorous, affordable
space  program.  Unfortunately,  it  is  very  difficult  to  justify  the  discounted
cost,  and  risk,  associated  with  developing  a  new  launch  vehicle  based  on  fu-
ture  cost  savings  alone,  particularly  with  any  realistically  foreseeable  traffic
model.  Nonetheless,  as  our  committee  noted  eighteen  years  ago,  the  nation
badly  needs  a  new,  highly  flexible  heavy-lift-capable  expendable  launch  vehi-
cle in its inventory.
• The  tipping  point  in  affordability  of  near-Earth  space  operations  will  arrive
when  space  tourism  becomes  commonplace.  Unfortunately,  this  is  a  bit  of  a
chicken  and  egg  problem  . . .  but  so,  too,  was  the  problem  faced  by  the  air-
line  industry  until  the  surge  that  was  brought  about  by  World  War  II.  Al-
though  some  years  away,  space  tourism  will  one  day  become  affordable  to  a
not inconsiderable number of the Earth’s inhabitants. That will change every-
thing.
• The  next  logical  centerpiece  of  the  civil  space  program  would  seem  to  be  a
the landing of humans on Mars, probably with a return to the Moon as a pre-
cursor. Six robots built by NASA have of course already made successful land-
ings on Mars and have done yeoman’s work . . . but, eventually, humans will
set foot on that planet. The only question is what flag or flags they will bear.
• In  spite  of  the  absence  of  a  commitment  to  a  major  new  project,  there  con-
tinues to be strong grassroots support among America’s citizens for the space
program.  It  would  nonetheless  be  unwise  to  initiate  a  new  ‘‘centerpiece’’
project without a strong national consensus for that specific undertaking, and
a  consensus  that  appears  likely  to  endure.  Any  such  pursuit  will  require  the
continued endorsement of at least six Congresses, three presidential adminis-
trations  and  twelve  budget  cycles.  When  a  new  centerpiece  project,  presum-
ably  involving  human  flight,  is  in  fact  initiated,  no  ‘‘date-certain’’  should  be
set for its accomplishment. Rather, a step-wise schedule should be established
with the initiation of successive stages dependent upon successful completion
of  prior  stages.  One  predictor  of  a  successful  space  program  is  continuity:  in-
cluding  continuity  of  funding,  stability  of  objectives,  and  persistence  of  per-
sonnel.
• Major development projects should not be initiated until at least three condi-
tions  are  satisfied:  First,  the  mission  concept  is  clear;  second,  only  engineer-
ing—not  new  science—is  required;  and  third,  adequate  funding  can  reason-
ably be expected to be available.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

• There  exists  a  critical  mass  in  a  nation’s  space  program  below  which  success
becomes  tenuous.  Unfortunately,  I  am  unable  to  define  what  that  level  is—
but space activity is much like heart surgery: it is better to do a lot of it . . .
or none of it.
• It is unwise to pursue space projects ‘‘on the cheap.’’ It is, of course, essential
to be efficient, particularly when entrusted with the taxpayers’ resources—but
space  is  highly  unforgiving;  it  is  intolerant  of  cutting  corners.  Projects  are
best  served  when  ‘‘done  right’’  . . .  that  is,  conservatively  . . .  including  ex-
tensive  testing  and,  importantly,  the  provision  of  reserves  in  funding,  tech-
nical  approaches  and,  where  applicable,  in  schedule.  To  do  otherwise  will  al-
most always increase both cost and the probability of failure.
• The greatest challenge faced in the years ahead by the industry that supports
NASA will be that of providing, and keeping, an adequate cadre of world-class
scientists,  engineers  and  engineering  managers  who  choose  to  dedicate  their
careers to space activities. The same will be true of NASA.
• Finally,  space  is  a  risky  business.  We  should  never  tolerate  carelessness  or
neglect. Nor should we accept wastefulness of any type. But, as stated in the
closing sentence of the report of the Advisory Committee on the Future of the
U.S.  Space  Program,  ‘‘If  we  as  a  nation  are  to  place  a  greater  premium  on
letting  nothing  go  wrong,  on  not  making  errors,  and  on  ridiculing  those  who
strive  but  occasionally  fail,  than  we  place  upon  seeking  potentially  great  ac-
complishments, then we have no business in space.’’

I believe that America can take enormous pride in what NASA has accomplished
these  past  fifty  years—all  of  which,  to  America’s  great  credit,  has  been  done  in  the
glare of the public spotlight. NASA, like any other organization populated with hu-
mans,  is  not  perfect—but  if  it  sets  perfection  as  a  goal  I  am  confident  that  we  will
have much to look forward to in the next fifty years.

Thank you for granting me this opportunity to share my views with you.
Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Augustine.
Now, Dr. Zuber, we would love to hear from you.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  MARIA  T.  ZUBER,  DEPARTMENT  HEAD
AND  E.A.  GRISWOLD  PROFESSOR  OF  GEOPHYSICS,  DEPART-
MENT  OF  EARTH,  ATMOSPHERIC,  AND  PLANETARY
SCIENCES, MASSACHUSETTS INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY
Ms. ZUBER. Thank you. Mr. Chairman and Members of the Com-
mittee, thank you for the opportunity to appear today at this nota-
ble event celebrating the 50th anniversary of NASA.

Exploration and discovery are human imperatives. Our efforts to
investigate  and  understand  the  unknown  found  the  foundation
upon which our nation was built. NASA exemplifies the pioneering
and  innovative  spirit  that  built  our  country  into  the  world  leader
that it is today.

We  all  know  the  story  of  the  Apollo  Program  and  our  nation’s
successful  quest  to  send  humans  to  the  Moon.  In  parallel,  NASA’s
Robotic  Space  Program  got  off  to  the  same  quick  start.  Progress
continues today.

Both these endeavors contributed to NASA’s Science Program. It
was  only  two  years  from  the  launch  of  the  first  U.S.  satellite,  Ex-
plorer  1,  in  1958,  to  the  launch  of  the  world’s  first  weather  sat-
ellite,  TIROS–1,  and  two  more  years  until  the  launch  of  the  first
planetary mission, Mariner 2, which successfully flew by Venus.

My  written  testimony,  which  I  submit  for  the  record,  details  the
extraordinary achievements made by NASA in revealing the nature
and  workings  of  the  Earth  and  the  solar  system  and  other  plan-
etary systems. These discoveries relate to the formation of our solar
system, the violent bombardment of ancient planetary surfaces, the
origin  of  the  Moon,  the  thick,  greenhouse  atmosphere  of  Venus,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

water on Mars, winds on the giant planets, and ocean beneath the
surface of Europa, hydrocarbon lakes on Titan, the discovery of an
icy world larger than Pluto, and Voyager 1’s trek to the edge of our
solar system.

And  while  we  rightly  consider  NASA  to  be  the  space  agency,  its
history  of  discovery  and  Earth  science  is  ironically  out  of  this
world.  NASA  can  claim  credit  for  the  Van  Allen  and  radiation
belts,  mapping  the  ocean  circulation,  biological  ocean  productivity,
global  wind  patterns,  the  structure  of  hurricanes,  and  measure-
ment of the direct measurement of the drift of the Earth’s tectonic
plates,  water  movement  in  subsurface  reservoirs,  and  changes  in
atmospheric ozone that led to the discovery of the ozone hole.

But what is next? Because one doesn’t know where the next sig-
nificant discovery will arise, a balanced scientific program is essen-
tial.  Opportunities  need  to  be  selected  on  the  basis  of  strategic
plans  that  are  formed  by  community  input  that  identify  the  most
compelling  science  within  the  context  of  tractable  implementation.
The  Moon  is  a  fascinating  target  for  future  study.  Apollo  pro-
duced a treasure trove of information in the lunar samples that are
still being analyzed today, but they sampled only a half dozen loca-
tions.  Many  more  scientific  areas  exist  such  as  within  dark  polar
craters  that  might  contain  water  ice.  As  the  most  accessible  plan-
etary  body,  future  study  of  the  Moon  will  provide  transformative
advances  in  understanding  the  evolution  of  all  terrestrial  planets.
Returning samples from Mars from sedimentary and ice-rich en-
vironments with well-studied geological context should be the high-
est  priority  in  future  Mars  exploration.  Such  samples  will  match
the  value  of  the  Moon  rocks  in  deciphering  that  planet’s  early  and
present environment.

The outer solar system offers numerous thrilling destinations for
future  study.  For  example,  several  of  the  icy  moons  may  have  ac-
cessible liquid water and organic materials, and they hold the pos-
sibility  for  harboring  life.  Future  study  of  asteroids  and  comets  is
of  both  scientific  and  practical  interest.  A  detailed  study  of  the  in-
ternal  constitution  of  a  near-earth  asteroid  would  illuminate  the
challenges  that  would  be  faced  regarding  hazard  avoidance  in  the
event  that  such  a  body  is  one  day  discovered  to  be  on  a  trajectory
to impact the Earth.

There seems to be a spectrum of opinion both within and outside
the  agency  as  to  how  much  NASA  should  be  involved  in  Earth
science. As head of a preeminent Earth science department, I have
a  strong  opinion  on  this  topic.  The  Earth  is  a  complex,  dynamic
system  that  requires  detailed,  in  situ  study  and  precise  global
views  repeated  over  time  to  unravel  its  workings.  No  other  agency
is capable of developing the kind of state-of-the-art sensors and ob-
servation  techniques  that  NASA  can  provide.  NASA  simply  must
play a role in the essential mission of understanding the Earth.

Science  goals  of  high  merit  in  all  fields  of  Earth  science  have
been  prioritized  in  a  recent  decadal  study  in  which  I  participated
along  with  many  members  of  the  scientific  community.  Programs
to  study  solar  and  Earth  radiation,  changes  in  the  heights  of  ice
caps, land and ice surface deformation are justifiably recommended
with high, near-term priority as they relate to climate change.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

One of the most remarkable discoveries in space science over the
past  couple  of  decades  has  been  the  detection  of  planets  around
other stars known as extra solar planets. After years of unsuccess-
ful  searching,  over  300  of  these  objects  are  now  known,  and  their
rate  of  discovery  is  rapid.  Great  challenge  in  the  coming  decades
is  to  image  Earth-sized  planets  in  the  so-called  habitable  zone  of
their stars where conditions favor Earth-like.

Investment  in  new  technology  will  be  required  to  take  future
giant  steps.  Technological  hurdles  tackled  early  in  advance  of  mis-
sion  selection  are  the  best  prevention  against  cost  overruns.  There
is  most  worthwhile  science  to  be  done,  and  NASA  can’t  afford  to
do it all. Prioritization based on community input and available re-
sources  will  allow  us  to  move  productively  forward.  A  stable  fund-
ing profile in space and Earth sciences is essential to progress.

Here  I  acknowledge  and  in  fact,  applaud  the  efforts  of  the  Com-
mittee  and  their  strong  support  of  NASA  science,  exemplified  by
the most recent NASA bill passed by the House.

The  role  of  the  Space  Program  in  inspiring  young  people  to  pur-
sue  scientific  and  technical  careers  is  often  noted.  But  evidence  is
anecdotal  and  difficult  to  quantify.  We  don’t  know  how  many  peo-
ple  inspired  by  the  Space  Program  pursued  a  math,  science,  or
technology  degree  who  wouldn’t  have  done  so  anyway.  But  much
anecdotal  evidence  exists  to  suggest  that  the  numbers  are  huge.
Many  of  those  inspired  grew  up  to  pursue  technical  careers  in
things such as computer science, the telecom industry, they are en-
gineers,  physicists,  even  biologists.  Young  people  now  fascinated
with  the  latest  discovery  from  Saturn  or  in  driving  Mars  Rovers
have  the  potential  to  take  on  the  greatest  societal  changes  in  en-
ergy, the environment, and health care.

Students  inspired  to  pursue  scientific  careers  must  then  be
trained.  In  my  own  university  students  interested  in  energy  flock
to  me  and  other  NASA-funded  researchers  to  obtain  experience  in
remote sensing chemical analysis, robotics, and instrument design.
A  stable  funding  base  to  universities,  all  awarded  via  peer  review,
is  crucial  for  training  scientific  and  technical  professionals  in  the
future.

Maintaining  the  best  technical  and  scientific  workforce  will  re-
quire  access  to  the  entire  pool  of  top  talent.  We  must  work  tire-
lessly  to  attract  and  engage  all  students  with  mathematical  and
scientific  aptitude  independent  of  gender,  race,  et  cetera.  We  must
provide  opportunities  to  top  scholars  from  the  international  com-
munity to participate in American Earth and space science endeav-
ors,  recognizing  their  potential  for  contributing  to  our  technical
preeminence.

In  summary,  NASA  is  the  federal  agency  where  dreams  reside.
Its can-do attitude and propensity for taking on tasks in President
Kennedy’s  words,  ‘‘because  they  are  hard,’’  exemplify  so  much  of
what  is  great  about  our  country.  Other  nations  emulate  us,  follow
our  lead,  and  partner  with  us  in  peaceful  exploration  of  the  solar
system  beyond,  but  I  should  say  in  closing  almost  every  space-
faring  nation  on  Earth  currently  is  exploring  or  has  plans  to  ex-
plore  the  Moon,  and  the  rest  of  the  solar  system  can’t  be  far  be-
hind.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

Will  people  really  view  the  United  States  as  the  greatest  Nation
on Earth when Chinese astronauts are walking on the Moon when
we are not?

I  generally  appreciate  the  forum  that  the  Committee  has  pro-
vided  to  recognize  the  achievements  of  NASA,  and  I  look  forward
to responding to your questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Zuber follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARIA T. ZUBER

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to
appear today at this notable event celebrating the 50th Anniversary of the National
Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA). Exploration is a human imperative;
indeed  our  efforts  to  investigate  and  understand  the  unknown  form  the  foundation
on  which  our  nation  was  built.  Our  citizens  are  descended  from  those  who  dared
to  abandon  familiar  confines  and  safe  harbors  for  the  uncertain  chance  of  a  better
life.  Indeed,  the  impetus  to  explore  is  coded  into  our  DNA.  It  certainly  is  for  me.
I  spent  endless  evenings  during  my  youth  freezing  in  my  backyard  viewing  the
night sky with my homemade telescope. Now I explore the solar system from an of-
fice  overlooking  the  Charles  River  where  it  is  also  my  privilege  to  train  the  next
generation of young people who will innovate, discover and lead our nation forward
in  scientific  and  technological  endeavors.  Today,  I  will  address  NASA’s  accomplish-
ments  in  space  and  Earth  sciences  from  both  a  scientific  and  educational  perspec-
tive, and with an eye towards an even brighter future.

Accomplishments in Space and Earth Sciences

The  list  of  scientific  achievements  in  the  space  and  Earth  sciences  that  can  be
traced to NASA in the fifty years since its inception is as extensive as it is impres-
sive,  and  my  review  must  necessarily  be  illustrative  rather  than  comprehensive.  I
apologize in advance for the numerous discoveries that I omit for brevity.

Beginning ‘‘next door,’’ the Apollo Program revealed that the Moon, and by exten-
sion  the  rest  of  the  solar  system,  is  ancient,  having  formed  over  4.5  billion  years
ago.  Moon  rocks,  and  later  meteorites,  analyzed  in  state-of-the-art  geochemical  lab-
oratories provided the evidence for that discovery. The early solar system was a vio-
lent  place;  many  planetary  surfaces  are  saturated  with  impact  craters  that  formed
primarily  due  to  impacts  from  debris  left  over  from  the  disk  of  dust  and  gas  encir-
cling the Sun that condensed to form the planets.

Impacts,  though  they  are  low-probability  events  today,  played  a  crucial  role  in
shaping  the  planets.  The  Moon  itself  probably  formed  from  the  impact  of  a  Mars-
sized  impactor  into  the  Earth.  An  impactor  larger  than  Pluto  likely  produced  the
low-elevation  northern  hemisphere  of  Mars,  believed  by  many  to  be  the  former  site
of  an  ancient  ocean.  Another  massive  impactor  may  have  stripped  off  much  of  the
mantle of Mercury leaving a core that is three-quarters the size of the planet.

NASA  missions  revealed  other  important  processes  that  shaped  the  terrestrial
planets.  The  Magellan  mission  to  Venus  penetrated  the  thick  atmosphere  of  that
planet to show most of the surface was covered almost simultaneously (in a geologic
sense)  by  volcanic  flows  about  600  million  years  ago.  The  surface  also  shows  evi-
dence of intense fracturing, rifting and folding that is the manifestation of dynamic
forces  within  Venus’  interior,  the  kinds  of  forces  that  produce  earthquakes  on  our
home  planet.  The  closest  planet  to  the  Sun,  Mercury,  which  was  first  imaged  by
flybys  of  the  Mariner  10  spacecraft  and  more  recently  by  MESSENGER,  shows  re-
markably diverse evidence for wrinkling of the surface suggesting the planet cooled
and contracted, and odd volcanic features including a fascinating spider-shaped vol-
canic center.

The  advance  in  our  understanding  of  the  planet  Mars  over  the  past  decade  can
be  counted  among  NASA’s  greatest  successes,  both  from  a  scientific  and  techno-
logical  perspective.  Landing  on  Mars  is  arguably  the  most  difficult  thing  we  do  in
the  robotic  space  program.  The  remarkable  descent  vehicles  that  execute  precisely
timed  events  that  collectively  comprise  the  entry-descent  and  landing  sequence  are
confounded  by  the  planet’s  turbulent  atmosphere  and  rocky  surface.  The  combina-
tion of observations from orbiters, landers and rovers has established firmly the evi-
dence  for  a  more  clement  early  climate  and  a  watery  past.  The  discovery  of  vast
reservoirs  or  polar  surface  ice  and  subsurface  ice  has  removed  a  major  impediment
to future human exploration of this most Earth-like of terrestrial planets.

NASA  missions  have  revealed  the  nature  of  the  solar  system’s  small  bodies—as-
teroids,  comets,  Kuiper  Belt  Objects.  In  addition  to  contributing  toward  the  inven-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

tory  and  dynamics  of  these  remnants  of  planet  formation,  NASA  spacecraft  have
landed on an asteroid, (purposely) impacted a comet, and flown through a comet tail
to  sample  the  primitive  icy  materials.  In  addition,  the  New  Horizons  spacecraft  is
now en route to the most prominent Kuiper Belt Object—Pluto.

Other discoveries in the outer solar system have defied the imagination. The Pio-
neer, Voyager, Galileo, and most recently, Cassini missions have revealed the giant
planets’  massive  cloud  systems  and  their  complex  dynamics,  as  well  as  the  preva-
lence  of  ring  systems  whose  study  has  informed  modeling  of  the  formation  of  the
solar system. The diversity of outer satellites is remarkable: active volcanism on Ju-
piter’s moon, Io, and a likely subsurface ocean beneath Europa. Icy geysers on Nep-
tune’s  moon  Triton  and  Saturn’s  tiny,  frozen  moon  Enceladus  imply  the  presence
of  underground  pockets  of  liquid  water  laced  with  organic  molecules.  In  collabora-
tion  with  European  colleagues,  Cassini-Huygens  identified  organic-rich  rivers  and
lakes  and  atmospheric  hazes  on  Saturn’s  active  moon,  Titan,  the  only  other  known
planetary body with a nitrogen atmosphere like Earth’s.

And the remarkably resilient Voyager 1 spacecraft continues its three-plus decade

journey of discovery, observing the farthest limits of the solar system.

So  many  of  NASA’s  greatest  discoveries  have  been  serendipitous.  Perhaps  the
most  striking  example  comes  from  NASA’s  astrobiology  program.  Originally  con-
ceived  to  address  the  plausibility  of  life  beyond  Earth,  the  program  encouraged
study  the  of  the  range  of  environmental  conditions  under  which  Earth-like  life  can
survive.  This  program  has  been  spectacularly  successful  in  fueling  progress  in  the
field  of  life  in  extreme  environments,  and  the  research  has  also  been  instrumental
in advancing our understanding the conditions under which life may have developed
and proliferated on the early Earth.

NASA’s  contributions  toward  understanding  the  state  and  workings  of  our  Earth
has  a  tremendously  rich  history.  The  most  innovative  approaches  used  in  remote
satellite  observation  were  developed  by  NASA  or  by  the  scientific  and  technological
community under the auspices of NASA support. Satellites and analysis tools origi-
nally  conceived  and  built  by  NASA  are  commonly  distributed  to  other,  more  oper-
ational,  government  agencies,  such  as  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Asso-
ciation  of  the  Department  of  Commerce,  and  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  under  the
Department  of  the  Interior.  Among  numerous  accomplishments  NASA  can  claim
credit for the first measurements of the steady but minuscule motions of the Earth’s
tectonic  plates,  characterization  of  the  ozone  hole,  the  three-dimensional  structure
of  hurricanes,  the  general  circulation  of  the  oceans,  biological  ocean  productivity,
rainfall patterns in the tropics, and the global wind pattern over the oceans and its
relationship  to  wave  distribution  and  height.  Efforts  are  ongoing  to  study  changes
on  the  Earth  on  decadal  time  scales—sea  level  rise,  the  surface  ice  volume,  and
measurement of changes in water reservoirs.

NASA’s  studies  of  the  Earth’s  plasma  environment  have  been  central  in  under-
standing  the  phenomenon  of  ‘‘space  weather,’’  as  well  as  the  magnetic  character  of
the Sun and the nature of the solar atmosphere.

The  contribution  of  NASA  to  scientific  knowledge  is  truly  impressive.  The  re-
spected  publication  Science  News  indicates  that  five  to  ten  percent  of  all  scientific
discoveries, worldwide, over the past decade, can be traced to NASA. I routinely tell
my  students  that  there  has  never  been  a  better  time  to  be  a  space  or  Earth  sci-
entist.  The  web  page  of  NASA’s  Science  Mission  Directorate  lists  nearly  a  hundred
missions  currently  operating  or  in  development  studying  the  Earth,  our  solar  sys-
tem, the heliosphere and beyond. With this record of scientific achievement is it any
surprise  that  the  rest  of  the  world  aspires  to  be  like  us?  Nearly  forty  years  after
the first humans walked on the Moon, nearly every space-faring nation is either ac-
tively executing or planning missions to the Moon. Many of those same nations are
planning missions to Mars. Can the rest of the solar system be far behind?

Most Exciting Possibilities and Opportunities for New Scientific Discovery
About  a  week  before  our  team’s  laser  altimeter  experiment  arrived  at  Mars  I  re-
ceived  a  call  from  a  member  of  the  press  asking  me  what  I  was  going  to  discover.
I  explained  that  if  I  knew  I  could  have  saved  others  and  myself  the  trouble  of  de-
signing and building the instruments and spacecraft. But while I didn’t know what
I  would  discover  I  knew  without  question  that  our  experiment  was  worth  doing.
Anytime  that  one  has  gone  to  a  place  no  one  has  been  before,  or  looked  at  a  place
visited earlier with a novel new sensor, discovery has been assured. There has never
been  an  exception.  Even  high  expectations  are  often  surpassed  by  large  measure.
The  beauty  and  complexity  of  the  natural  world  exceeds  our  imagination.  Beyond
that realization, however, there are some simple rules that can guide a vibrant pro-
gram.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

First,  one  doesn’t  know  where  the  next  significant  discovery  will  arise,  so  a  bal-
anced  scientific  program  is  essential.  Destinations  should  be  chosen  on  the  basis  of
decadal  studies  and  strategic  plans  forged  by  community  input.  Peer  review  must
continue  to  be  employed  to  identify  the  most  compelling  science  within  the  context
of tractable plans for implementation. A mix of smaller missions with focused objec-
tives  should  be  combined  with  flagship  missions  with  ambitious  objectives  or  chal-
lenging destinations.

The  Moon  is  for  a  fascinating  target  for  future  scientific  study.  The  Apollo  Pro-
gram  provided  a  treasure  trove  of  information  in  the  lunar  samples  that  are  still
being  analyzed  today,  but  they  sample  only  a  half-dozen  locations.  If  one  visited
only a half-dozen locations in the United States how well would one understand our
country?  With  numerous  missions  en  route  to,  or  planned  for  the  Moon,  including
the  Gravity  Recovery  and  Interior  Laboratory  (GRAIL)  mission  which  I  am  privi-
leged  to  lead,  the  next  decade  or  more  will  represent  a  golden  age  of  lunar  explo-
ration.  I  feel  about  the  Moon  the  same  way  that  I  felt  more  than  a  decade  ago  in
advance  of  a  suite  of  orbiter,  lander  and  roving  missions  that  redefined  our  view
of  the  planet  Mars.  As  the  most  accessible  example  of  a  primordial  planetary  body,
future study of the Moon will provide transformative advances in our understanding
of the early evolution of all terrestrial planets.

Returning  samples  from  Mars—from  sedimentary,  volcanic  and  volatile  environ-
ments with well-studied geological context—should be the highest priority in future
Mars  exploration.  Such  samples  will  match  the  value  of  Moon  rocks  in  deciphering
that planet’s early and present environment.

The outer solar system offers numerous thrilling destinations for future study and
I  see  the  next  steps  motivated  in  large  measure  by  information  returned  from  the
Cassini  and  Galileo  missions.  A  number  of  the  icy  moons  (Europa  and  Ganymede
of  Jupiter  and  Enceladus  and  Titan  of  Saturn)  are  characterized  by  the  presence
of  liquid  water  and/or  organic  volatiles  and  they  hold  the  possibility  of  harboring
life.  The  choice  of  nearest-term  targets  should  be  driven  by  peer  review  analysis
that  indicates  that  discoveries  considerably  beyond  the  current  state  of  the  art  are
possible within the context of current technology and affordable technology develop-
ment.

Reconnaissance  and/or  sampling  of  small  bodies  will  be  of  great  value.  From  a
practical  standpoint  a  detailed  study  of  the  internal  structure  and  constitution  of
an  asteroid  would  be  informative  regarding  the  challenges  that  would  be  faced  by
an  near-Earth  asteroid  that  might  one  day  be  recognized  to  be  a  potential  Earth
impactor.

Likewise there are numerous challenging questions about workings of Earth that
are  appropriate  for  study  by  NASA.  There  seems  to  be  a  spectrum  of  opinion  both
within  and  outside  the  agency  as  to  how  much  NASA  should  be  involved  in  Earth
science. As head of a preeminent Earth Science Department with a view on the most
challenging questions in contemporary Earth and atmospheric science and oceanog-
raphy, I have a strong opinion on this topic. The Earth is a complex, dynamic, sys-
tem  of  systems  that  requires  detailed  in  situ  study  combined  with  precise  global
views  over  time  to  unravel  its  workings.  From  the  point  of  view  of  remote  observa-
tion,  no  other  agency  is  capable  of  developing  the  kind  of  state-of-the-art  sensors
and  observation  strategies  that  only  NASA  can  provide.  NASA  simply  must  play  a
role in the essential mission of understanding our Earth.

Science  goals  of  high  merit  in  solid  Earth,  atmospheric,  oceanic,  hydrologic  and
cryospheric  science  have  been  prioritized  in  a  recent  decadal  study  that  forms  the
plan for moving ahead. The questions are of both purely scientific interest and prac-
tical  regard,  the  latter  associated  with  natural  hazards  and  climate  change.  What
is  clear  in  both  cases  is  that  collection  and  analysis  of  high-quality  data  of  global
extent,  with  repeated  observations  over  time,  is  essential  if  we  are  to  understand
the state and future of our Earth.

One  of  the  most  astounding  discoveries  in  space  science  over  the  past  couple  of
decades  has  been  the  detection  of  planets  around  other  stars,  also  known  as
extrasolar  planets.  Over  three  hundred  of  these  objects  are  known  now  and  after
years  of  unsuccessful  searching  their  rate  of  discovery  is  now  rapid.  Detection  of
these  objects  is  mostly  indirect,  by  tiny  perturbations  of  parent  stars  and  dimming
of  such  stars  as  the  planets  pass  in  front  of  them.  But  most  recently  spectra  have
been  measured  and  the  first  atmosphere  detected.  Most  of  these  objects  are  giant
planets  very  close  to  their  stars,  inside  the  orbit  of  Mercury  by  analogy  with  our
own  solar  system.  But  detection  of  ‘‘super-Earths,’’  large  terrestrial-like  planets,  is
now becoming a reality. A very high-priority challenge in coming decade is to image
Earth-sized  planets  in  the  so-called  ‘‘habitable  zone’’  of  their  stars,  that  is,  where
conditions are favorable for Earth-like life. Large space-based deployable optics and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

the  realization  of  coordinated  sensor  arrays  are  key  in  realizing  this  exciting  sci-
entific objective.

Judicious  investment  in  new  technology  will  be  required  to  take  future  scientific
giant steps. Technological hurdles tackled early, in advance of mission selection, are
the best prevention against cost overrun. A prime example of an enabling new tech-
nology  is  the  transition  from  radio  to  optical  communication  to  take  advantage  of
much  increased  data  rates  enabled  by  the  shorter  wavelength  of  light  compared  to
radio waves. Such a system would be required to realize, for example, near-real time
streaming video from the surfaces of other planets. The challenge is how to balance
new investment with transformative possibilities with maintaining current facilities
and continuing operations that have excellent return.

There  is  much  worthwhile  science  to  be  done,  but  NASA  cannot  afford  to  do  all
of  it.  Prioritization  needs  to  occur  in  order  to  move  productively  forward.  Strategic
plans  must  be  developed  and  implemented,  with  flexibility  to  respond  to  discovery
or enabling technology advances. A stable funding profile in space and Earth science
is  essential  to  progress.  Here  I  acknowledge  and  in  fact  applaud  the  efforts  of  the
Committee for their strong support of NASA science, exemplified by the most recent
NASA bill passed by the House.

Inspiring the Next Generation

In  2003  I  had  the  privilege  of  serving  on  the  Presidential  Commission  to  develop
an  implementation  plan  for  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  One  of  the  most  eye-
opening  experiences  of  my  participation  on  the  Commission  was  reading  the  com-
mentary  of  the  general  public  with  regard  to  space  science  and  exploration,  and
traveling around the country talking to citizens about space. A remarkable outcome
of  the  Apollo  Program  is  how  many  children  of  the  Apollo  era  grew  up  to  study
science or engineering because they were thrilled and amazed by the quest to reach
the  Moon.  By  and  large,  only  a  small  percentage  of  these  folks  (present  company
on  the  Committee  excluded)  grew  up  to  participate  directly  in  the  space  program.
Most of them grew up to pursue other disciplines, and today they are computer engi-
neers, telecom engineers, chemists, physicists, etc. Last week on telling a friend that
I  would  be  testifying  about  the  accomplishments  of  NASA,  he  told  me:  ‘‘Talk  about
inspiration.  There’s  no  doubt  that  I  became  a  scientist  because  of  my  fascination
with  the  space  program  when  I  was  a  kid.’’  This  individual  is  a  molecular  biologist
who was elected this year to the National Academy of Sciences.

This anecdote highlights a key attribute of the space program, namely, its ability
to  inspire  young  people  to  pursue  scientific  and  technical  careers.  But  it  is  impor-
tant  to  mention  that  the  evidence  is  anecdotal  and  difficult  to  quantify.  We  don’t
know  how  many  people  inspired  by  the  space  program  pursued  a  math,  science  or
technology  degree  who  wouldn’t  have  done  so  any  way.  Many  of  the  young  people
now fascinated with the latest discovery from Saturn or in driving Mars rovers have
the potential to take on the greatest societal challenges in energy, the environment,
and  health  care  to  name  a  few.  Students  inspired  to  pursue  scientific  careers  must
then  be  trained.  We  do  know  that  college-level  students  are  making  use  of  NASA
data to assist in their training for a range of professional careers. In my own univer-
sity  students  interested  in  energy  flock  to  me  and  other  NASA-funded  researchers
to  obtain  experience  in  remote  sensing,  chemical  analysis,  robotics,  and  instrument
design  to  name  but  a  few.  A  stable  funding  base  to  universities,  all  awarded  via
peer  review,  is  crucial  for  training  the  scientific  and  technical  professionals  of  the
future.

Attracting the best technical and scientific workforce will require access to the en-
tire  pool  of  top  talent.  We  must  work  tirelessly  to  attract  and  engage  all  students
with mathematical and scientific aptitude independent of gender, race, etc. We must
provide  opportunities  to  top  scholars  from  the  international  community  to  partici-
pate in the American Earth and space science endeavor, recognizing their potential
for contributing to our technical preeminence.

Because  NASA  is  the  agency  of  discovery,  its  potential  for  outreach  is  extraor-
dinary.  Few  can  fail  to  appreciate  the  stark  beauty  of  an  alien  landscape  revealed
for  the  first  time,  or  the  difficulty  of  designing  a  spacecraft  to  fly  close  to  the  Sun.
But there is no perfect measure of engagement. In outreach programs it is possible
to measure web hits or museum attendance, both useful indicators, but far more dif-
ficult  to  measure  when  a  child  has  been  sufficiently  inspired  to  take  the  harder
math  course  or  to  consider  science  for  a  career  for  the  first  time.  We  must  trust  in
the power of scientific discovery to motivate in its own right.

NASA does not have the scope, mandate or resources to solve all education prob-
lems  in  our  country.  But  the  agency  most  assuredly  has  the  ability  to  nudge  those
with  the  ‘‘right  stuff’’  in  the  direction  of  careers  in  science  and  technology.  There
is nothing like hands on experience on a difficult problem that better brings out the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

joy  of  learning.  There  must  be  room  for  creative,  hands-on  programs  that  com-
plement  broader  programs  with  wide  reach.  On  my  GRAIL  mission  America’s  First
Woman  in  Space,  Sally  Ride,  and  I  have  teamed  to  offer  an  innovative  student
project. Leveraged by an ongoing program called EarthKAM that Sally and her edu-
cator  colleagues  currently  operate  on  the  International  Space  Station,  our
MoonKAM  program  will  place  up  to  five  cameras  on  each  of  two  spacecraft  sent  to
orbit the Moon. These cameras will be used entirely for educational and public out-
reach.  By  decoupling  the  experiment  from  the  formal  science  objectives  of  the  mis-
sion and making everything about the experiment ‘‘best effort’’ rather than measur-
able  success,  it  is  possible  to  implement  the  program  in  an  affordable  manner  and
on  a  non-interference  basis.  Middle  school  students  across  the  United  States  will
have the opportunity to study the Moon and propose targets to image, and selected
images  will  be  sequenced  by  a  team  of  competitively  selected  undergraduate  stu-
dents supervised by trained professionals. Our collective conviction about the inspi-
rational  value  of  a  space-based  imaging  experiment  solely  dedicated  to  outreach  is
great. We are absolutely certain that the experience will extend the NASA tradition
of changing lives and motivating future careers.

In summary, NASA is the federal agency where dreams reside. Its can-do attitude
and propensity toward taking on tasks, in President Kennedy’s words, ‘‘because they
are  hard’’  exemplifies  so  much  of  what  is  great  about  our  country.  Other  nations
emulate us, follow our lead, and partner with us in peaceful exploration of the solar
system  and  beyond.  I  sometimes  wonder  how  I  managed  to  be  so  fortunate  to  be
born at a time that allowed me the opportunity to pursue my penchant for scientific
discovery in the solar system. I do believe in a bright future for NASA, one in which
young  people  with  similar  inclination  will  feel  as  I  do  fifty  years  from  now  at
NASA’s centennial celebration.

I  genuinely  appreciate  the  forum  that  the  Committee  has  provided  to  recognize

the achievements of NASA, and I look forward to responding to your questions.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Zuber.  Before  we
begin with questions of our witnesses, as I noted earlier, the noted
physicist  and  author,  Dr.  Stephen  Hawking,  has  graciously  pro-
vided  a  pre-recorded  message  for  today’s  hearing,  and  we  would
like to hear that message now.

[Recording played.]
Chairman GORDON. I hope Dr. Hawking is one of the two million
plus  watching  this  on  web  cast  today,  and  if  so,  we  want  to  thank
him  for  his  testimony,  and  more  importantly,  for  his  great  con-
tribution to the universal body of knowledge.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  GORDON.  At  this  point  we  will  now  open  our  first
round  of  questions,  and  the  Chair  recognizes  himself  for  five  min-
utes,  but  I  want  to  try  to  be  brief  because  we  have  a  lot  of  Mem-
bers here, and I want to get onto their questions.

But I do, would like to ask one question, just one question of the
Committee at large, following up on Dr. Zuber, as she talked about
the  potential  for,  not  potential,  but  the  asset  that  NASA  has  in
being able to inspire, particularly inspire our youth.

What  do  we  need  to  encourage  NASA  to  do  to  be  more  effective
using that inspiration to try to get young folks into the STEM edu-
cation  programs  and  then  hopefully  after  that  into  careers  in
science technology?

So  we  will,  Dr.  Zuber,  we  will  start  with  you,  and  welcome  any-

thing that Senator Glenn or Mr. Augustine might have to say.

Dr.  ZUBER.  Okay.  Well,  I  would  like  to  press  for  the  ability  to
pursue creative programs. Some of our most inspirational things as
I  related  to  in  my  testimony  don’t  have  metrics  of  success.  Okay.
In  my  testimony  I  mentioned  how  people  who  watch  rings  of  Sat-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

urn  swirling,  who  watch  Mars  rovers,  we  don’t  know  how  many  of
those people are going into science.

In  NASA  education  programs  there  tends  to  be  an  emphasis  on
doing things where you can measure what the success is, and some
of  those  things  are  excellent  and  keep  doing  them,  but  we  should
also  encourage  creative  programs  where  you  can’t  necessarily
measure the success but you know that the success is there.

Mr.  GLENN.  I  would  just  like  to  back  up  on  what  Dr.  Zuber  is
talking  about  here.  I  think  that  the  nation  that  leads  in  education
for  all  their  people  and  in  basic  research,  those  two  very  funda-
mental  things  have  built  this  country,  whoever  leads  in  that  is
going  to  lead  the  world  in  the  future.  We  still  lead  in  those  areas
except K–12. Our K–12 education system is not in good shape now
as we all know. But I think we should be trying to set up the best
education  system  possible  and  the  best  research  we  can,  and  that
is  the  reason  that  I  think  we  should  be  doing  the  maximum  re-
search we can on all the, with NASA’s efforts.

Their  funding  in  that  area  as  far  as  research  goes  has  been  cut.
I ran into a statement in the Aviation Week and Space Technology
of  a  year  ago,  July  20,  30  issue,  in  which  they  said,  according  to
a  National  Academy  Space  Science  Board  tabulation  NASA  pulled
the  funding  plug  on  59  percent  of  its  human  research  program  in-
vestigators, the ones who would have dealt with basic long-term re-
search concerns, as well as 88 percent of fundamental space biology
investigators,  along  with  84  percent  of  its  physical  science  inves-
tigators.  They  go  on  to  discuss  why  this  was,  but  it  is  because  we
did not provide the money to follow the presence of VSE, Vision for
Space Exploration. We cannibalized within NASA itself out of other
programs to provide the money to do that.

And that is what I have proposed to correct it. So——
Chairman GORDON. Mr. Augustine.
Mr. AUGUSTINE. I would just add that it has been my observation
that  if  one  wants  to  inspire  young  people,  one  has  to  have  accom-
plishments that they can see and relate to and are, become excited
about. But that is only half, I think, what is needed.

The other is to have clearer, longer-term programs and goals that
they  believe  in,  that  they  think  that  they  might  be  able  to  become
involved in as they get older. And when I was young, the Cold War,
that  was,  if  you  were  a  scientist  or  engineer,  you  wanted  to  help
win  the  Cold  War.  Then  the  Space  Program  drew  that  kind  of  ex-
citement,  and  it  was  the  information  revolution,  now  it  is  the  bio-
sciences, I think.

And  not  only  do  you  have  to  have  immediate  accomplishments,
but one has to have goals in the future that young people can real-
ly believe in and embrace.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, all of our panel members.
And then, Mr. Hall, you are recognized for five minutes.
Mr. HALL. Mr. Chairman, I thank you.
Senator Glenn, I am very interested in your comments about the
fact that Shuttle launches are expensive and then you go on to say
the  ISS  is  scheduled  to  be  completed  during  2009,  and  to  save
money  Shuttle  use  will  be  terminated  in  2010,  leaving  us  at  least
a  five-year  period  in  which  the  U.S.  will  not  have  a  human  space
launch  capability.  That  concerns  me,  and  it  seems  to  concern  you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

I  know  money,  you  know,  ask  us  the  value  of  money,  and  some-
body said, well, it is not much, but it sure keeps you in touch with
your  kids.  Well,  I  think  we,  that  money  is  a  matter  here  that  we
need  to  discuss,  and  we  need  to  think  of  somewhere  that  we  are
expending  money  or  doing  something  that  is  way  less  important
than it is to be, have the leadership in space exploration.

I  would  like  for  you  to  go  a  little  further  on  that.  You  know,  I
would  even  like  to  suggest  that  we  cancel  any  foreign  aid  to  those
who  would  vote  against  us  90  percent  of  the  time  in  the  U.N.  or
things like that. That has never worked before. Maybe we ought to
look at that again, but I would like your idea on some of the things
we could do without or how we could lessen it or how we could pro-
vide that thing called money that NASA has to have to make those
and  not  rely  on  Russia  or  some  fallibility  in  our  own  ability  to  get
from  here  to  Russia  or  from  here  to  the  Moon  or  to  Mars  to  wher-
ever we are trying to go.

Mr.  GLENN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Hall.  I  appreciate  that,  and  we  are,
that  is  the  direction  we  are  going  right  now,  is  we  will  be  depend-
ent  on  the  Russians  for  launch.  Our  people  will  go  over  there  for
their launch and any equipment we have will have to go up. It will
not  be  a  heavy  launch  capability  because  they  can’t  put  up  the
same loads that we can on the Shuttle. But I just thought I would
never  see,  as  I  said  earlier,  I  thought  I  would  never  see  the  day
when we would be buying a ticket on the Russian system to get our
people  to  our  International  Space  Station,  yet  that  is  what  we  are
doing right now.

I think we have already signed contracts as a matter, as I under-
stand,  some  700  and  some  million  dollars  for  launch  services  from
the Russians already. But I just think that is the wrong way to go
for the world’s greatest space-faring Nation.

Mr. HALL. And you say that additional funding of $2.8 to $3 bil-
lion  per  year  could  keep  the  Shuttle  in  operation  until  their  new
Constellation program equipment is ready and at least partially re-
store the ISS research program?

Mr.  GLENN.  That  is  what  I  have  been  told,  Mr.  Chairman,  and
you  would  want  to  flush  that  out  with  NASA  I  am  sure  and  get
the  details  of  exactly,  exact  amount.  But  those  are  approximate
amounts,  and  that  would  keep  us  with  our  own  launch  capability
as I understanding it.

Mr.  HALL.  I  am  not  only  concerned,  but  I  am  really  astounded
that  we  are  going  to  go  four  years  without  the  ability  to  visit  our
own station.

Mr. GLENN. Five. Five years——
Mr. HALL. Five.
Mr.  GLENN.—now,  and  we  had  a  one-year  slippage,  and  there
may  be  more  slippage  beyond  that.  Of  course,  as  our  new,  this  is,
that  five-year  estimate  is  dependent  on  our  new  equipment  work-
ing  out  perfectly  and  being  available  at  a  certain  time.  If  we  have
any  delays  in  it,  then  the,  our  dependence  on  the  Russians  will  go
even further.

Mr.  HALL.  I  think  that  is  one  of  the  major  problems  we  have  in

the program.

Mr. GLENN. Yes.
Mr. HALL. Thank you, John.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

Mr. GLENN. Thank you.
Chairman GORDON. Mr. Miller is recognized from North Carolina
for  five  minutes.  All  right.  Ms.  Giffords  is  next  up.  All  right.  Ms.
Edwards,  our  newest  Member  of  the  Committee,  is  recognized  for
five minutes.

Ms.  EDWARDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you  to  our
witnesses.  I  listened  with  fascination  about  the  Space  Program.  I
had  the  great  privilege  of  working  for  Lockheed  actually  out  at
Goddard  Space  Flight  Center,  supporting  Space  Lab  and  TEDRIS
and  LandSat,  and  you  know,  the  early  days  of  the  development  of
the space telescope.

And I had the benefit also of learning from engineers who, engi-
neers and scientists who started out with NASA in 1958, who were
my  mentors,  and  one  of  the  concerns  I  have  is  about  this  sort  of
resident  experience  within  NASA  at  the  highest  levels  of,  you
know,  our  scientists  and  people  who  understand  technology,  both
for their oversight role but also for the value they play in the long-
term sustainability of NASA and its resident knowledge.

And  so  I  wonder  about  your  comments  about  that,  and  then  be-
cause  I  am  out  in  a  community  that  supports  the  Goddard  Space
Flight  Center,  what  I  notice  is  that  so  many  people  actually  don’t
even  know  that  that  is  a  jewel  in  our  community.  It  hasn’t  been
exploited  in  nearly  the  way  that  it  can,  both  as  an  engine  for  eco-
nomic  development  but  also  for  the  value  to  our  schools  and  our
young people.

And  so  I  am  curious  as  to  whether  any  of  you  have  comments
about  what  we  can  do  to  really  tell  the  story  of  NASA  and  the
Space  Program  and  exploration  and  the  real  valuable,  tangible
value  to  our  communities  and  ways  that  we  can  inspire  our  young
people to get the, to reap the benefits of that technology.

Dr. ZUBER. I will address that. I used to be a Goddard civil serv-
ant,  so  first  of  all,  with  respect  to  the  NASA  civil  servant  work-
force, I feel your pain. It seems like there is always a hiring freeze
at  NASA,  and  it  is  very  difficult  to  hire.  There  are  freezes  on  hir-
ing, and a lot of expertise is brought in from general areas just for
short periods of time to do small jobs when there are engineers and
scientists who would love to have these jobs. They are not the high-
est-paying  jobs  that  can  be  had,  but  people  would  love  to  have
them.

I  am  actually  on  an  advisory  committee  to  the  Science  Director
at Goddard in dealing with improving the role and maximizing the
contribution  of  women  at  Goddard,  and  one  thing  that  you  find  is
that  people  would  love  to  have  that  job  because  of  the  quality  of
life that is associated and the prestige that is associated with work-
ing for the Space Program. And the salary and compensation, peo-
ple need a good wage to make a living, but beyond that people are
much  more  excited  about  a  situation  where  they  can  contribute  to
the Space Program and deal with their family responsibilities.

So first of all, making flexibility for family situations is one thing
that  would  be  more  attractive,  but  anything  that  the  government
could  do  to  make  hiring  more  civil  servants  there  a  possibility
would  be  great,  and  this  is  a  place  where  maybe  that  committee
could help.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

Mr. AUGUSTINE. Ms. Edwards, you raised two I think very impor-
tant points. Pardon me. I share the concern about the aging of the
workforce  and  the  talent  in  the  Space  Program,  and  I  think  the
biggest  problem  that  our  industry,  the  industry  element  of  the
Space  Program  is  likely  to  face  in  the  decades  ahead  will  be  a
shortage of engineering and science talent.

And  it  has  also  been  my  observation  that  the  Space  Program,  it
is  a  risky  business,  and  it  is  a  lot  like  performing  heart  trans-
plants.  You  either  do  a  lot  of  it  or  none  of  it,  and  I  have  noticed
when  we  start  phasing  down  people,  we  start  having  trouble  be-
cause we have inexperienced people.

So  I  think  you  raise  an  important  point.  The  only  thing  I  would
add  to  your  second  point  would  be  that  I  believe  our  corporations
and  our  universities  and  our  national  labs  could  do  an  awful  lot
more  in  terms  of  working  with  young  people  and  getting  them  in-
volved  in  what  they  are  doing,  given  the  summer  jobs.  There  are
other  organizations  I  am  sure  you  are  familiar  with  like  the  Chal-
lenger  Center  that  does  a  lot,  and  these  entities  are  there  waiting
for people to support them.

Chairman GORDON. The gentlelady’s time has expired.
As  you  know,  Mr.  Augustine,  part  of  the  COMPETES  Bill  was
to use our national labs more to bring those teachers and students
in, and we are starting to see them implement some of that.

Now  we  have  the  former  Chair  of  the  Space  and  Aeronautics

Subcommittee, Mr. Rohrabacher, is recognized for five minutes.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. It has
been  my  honor  to  be  on  this  committee  for  20  years,  and  I  was
elected to this committee the first year, and let me just note George
Brown  was  the  Chairman  at  that  time,  and  he  worked  with  the
Members,  the  leadership  that  we  had  over  the  years,  and  George
Brown and we got Bob Walker with us and Sherry Boehlert as well
today,  and  let  me  just  add,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  I  believe  that  you
are  conducting  yourself  and  providing  the  leadership  that  we  can
respect and admire of you.

To  set  the  record  straight,  I  believe  that  Senator  Glenn  was  not

a Naval aviator but a Marine aviator if I am——

Mr. GLENN. Well, both.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Right.  And  my  father  actually  served  with
Senator  Glenn  when  he  was  in  the  Marine  Corps,  something  he
talked about a lot and was very proud of.

Let me ask a certain, get to certain questions here, because I do

want to ask some questions.

Dr.  Zuber,  I  was  very  appreciative  of  your  statement  today,  be-
cause you mentioned, not only did you mention asteroids and com-
ets,  but  you  also  mentioned  the  word,  prioritization.  Those  areas
have a special interest for me.

First of all, let me ask you, and I am going to ask the panel just
very quickly can you please name one area that you would cut that
we could make a few billion dollars in cutting so that we can actu-
ally accomplish the mission that I think Senator Glenn has told us
is an important priority for us to accomplish, which is making sure
we have that capability for launch capability. Is there an area that
we can cut, and we can focus the money on that?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

Dr.  ZUBER.  I  would  be  in  big  trouble  if  I—what  I  would  say  is
new  starts,  that  you  can’t  start  new  things  unless  you  finish  what
you are doing, and I think——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay. That is fair.
Dr. ZUBER.—NASA has run into some troubles in this area.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  And  new  starts  would  be  made  for  perhaps
exploration  new  starts  and  where  you  were  saying  go  explore  this
particular moon of Jupiter or whatever, and we shouldn’t start that
until we get something else done.

Dr.  ZUBER.  Well,  we  should  be  far  enough  along  that  we  know

that we can pay for things before we start new things.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Dr. Augustine.
Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  I  would  certainly  agree  with  that,  that  we
should be measured by what we finish and not what we start. New
starts are a candidate.

The other is that the really large consumer of funds is indeed the
Shuttle, and sooner or later the Shuttle has to be replaced, and the
commission  that  Chairman  Gordon  mentioned  that  I  was  involved
in  18  years  ago  now  made  as  one  of  its  highest  recommendations
to  build  a  replacement  for  the  Shuttle.  And  we  had  forecasted  our
report  that  we  would  likely  lose  one  or  two  more  Shuttles  before
we were done. And unfortunately, we have been on that path.

So I think we have got to get a replacement to get up into space

without using the Shuttle.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Senator  Glenn,  do  you  have  one  area  you

would like to actually say is less important than another area?

Mr.  GLENN.  I  have  no  particular  one.  It  just  seems  to  me  when
you  have  a  $3  trillion  budget,  that  is  3,000  millions  or  whatever
it  figures  out  to  be,  I  just  think  this,  or  billions,  that  we  can  find
2.8  or  three  of  them  in  there  someplace  that  are  better  spent  on
maximizing  this  research  return  on  a  $100  billion  investment  we
have made. We are not doing that now. We have empty racks going
up  into  space  now  because  we  don’t  have  the  support  for  filling
them.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Actually,  I  have  got  some  ideas  where  we
could cut the budget myself, but no one ever listens to me. So, but
let me ask one other question about prioritization.

There is a prioritization on the other side, and this is where Dr.
Zuber’s  comments  on  asteroids  and  comments,  comets  come  into
play.  I  happen  to  believe,  and  I  have  been  pushing  this  as  you  all
know, that the idea that planetary defense is something that NASA
should be focusing on because there could be a comet or an asteroid
or  a  meteor  that  could  hit,  no  one  would  be  surprised  if  one  of
those  was  identified  tomorrow  as  a  potential  threat  to  billions  of
people’s lives on this planet.

Do  you  believe  that,  that  planetary  defense  should  be  a  priority

mission for NASA? And just quickly down the line.

Dr.  ZUBER.  Well,  I  think  that  defense,  the  role  of  defense  is  in
the Defense Department, but I do think that there are things that
we  can  do  in  the  study  of  comets  and  asteroids  that  are  scientif-
ically important but that would contribute significantly to the ques-
tion  about  how  to  take  action  if  action  were  ever  needed  to  be
taken.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  And  the  action  should  take  place  at  the  De-

partment of Defense? Is that——

Dr.  ZUBER.  Well,  the  actual  defense  part  should  be  done  by  De-

fense but——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay. Dr. Augustine.
Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  If  history  is  any  precedent,  this  will  be  a  prob-
lem  at  some  point.  Chances  are  it  is  in  the  distant  future,  so  I
think  it  is  something  that  NASA  should  be  concerned  with,  but  I
don’t think it gets the highest priority of what they might do.

Mr. GLENN. I don’t know that I would assign that to the Defense
Department.  They  have  their  plate  full  right  now.  It  would  seem
to  me  that  the  Defense  Department  normally  deals  with  Earth-
bound  threats  to  our  country  and  our  security.  This  is  a  little  big-
ger than that. I would think that—and the question also arises, let
us  say  we  do  find  a  trajectory  that  is  coming  toward  Earth.  What
do  we  do  about  it?  It  is  going  to  be  very  interesting,  but  you  are
probably going to increase church attendance considerably, but that
is going to be about it for awhile.

It  would  seem  to  me  unless  we  have  some  means  of  defense.
Now,  I  know  people  have  proposed  that  in  something  like  this  we
might  be  able  to  actually  go  out  into  space,  implant  or  take  with
us  nuclear  or  powerful  weapons  of  some  kind  that  would  be  able
to alter the course or destroy that asteroid on the way in or comet
or  whatever,  or  asteroid  on  the  way  in.  But  I  think  it  would  be,  I
would  like  to  know  that  something  like  that  is  headed  toward
Earth certainly, and we can make observations of that.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  let  me  just  note
that in the next 50 years if we do, indeed, see an object headed to-
ward  the  Earth  that  could  cause  millions  of  deaths  of  people  and
maybe  even  extinction  of  the  planet,  that  maybe  the  most  impor-
tant thing that NASA will ever do will be to determine that object
and to be able to help deflect it from its course.

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman GORDON. The gentleman’s time has expired.
The gentlelady from Arizona, Ms. Giffords, is recognized.
Ms.  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  While  I  was  basking
in  the  brilliance  of  our  panelists,  I  got  called  out,  and  I  beg  your
forgiveness, to attend a meeting on homelessness from the State of
Arizona, and it is sort of a reality check. I was thinking about how
great  it  is  being  on  this  committee  and  how  wonderful  to  have
these panelists and then you have to step out to a meeting and talk
to  folks  who  represent  your  community  of  people  that  don’t  have
enough food to eat and don’t have shelter.

So it is a real challenge. I mean, I think about Dr. Hawking, who
I  had  the  chance  to  meet  last  year  when  you  were  presented  the
medal that was flown on STS–123, over at the Royal Society, which
was  amazing.  Senator  Glenn,  you  are  an  inspiration  to  all  of  us.
I mean, the private and the public sector, and Dr., excuse me, Mr.
Augustine,  for  everything  you  have  done  in  the,  with  your  work
with  the  National  Academies,  of  course,  and  in  the  private  sector,
and  Dr.  Zuber,  thank  you.  We  love  having  particularly  women  in
science,  as  a  woman  in  a  non-traditional  field  as  well.  It  is  really
important that we have everyone represented.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

So  I  guess  my  question  is,  and  I  just  want  to  cut  straight,  you
know,  down  to  it.  How  are  we  going  to  do  this?  Over  the  weekend
I had a chance to present a state of the economy to a lot of people
in  my  district.  I  talked  about  where  we  were  in  terms  of  debt  and
deficit, and I also wove in there a lot about math scores in Arizona
and  the  country,  fourth  grade  math  scores,  eighth  grade  math
scores, twelfth grade.

I  mean,  we  as  a  nation  have  to  get  going  right  now,  and  for  the
smartest  people  on  this  committee  and  our  panelists,  how  are  we
going  to  do  that?  How  are  we  going  to  say  to  the  next  generation,
we  are  going  to  keep  the  standard  of  life,  the  beauty,  the  vision  of
this country, headed in the right direction?

And  so  I  know  we  don’t  have  a  lot  of  time.  You  only  have  five
minutes to answer those questions, but I turn it over to our panel-
ists to tell us how we are going to make this happen.

Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  Let  me  begin.  Great  question.  I  guess  I  would
begin by observing that 96 percent of the workforce in this country
are  not  scientists  and  engineers,  but  the  four  percent  that  are  the
ones  who  create  the  jobs  disproportionately  that  help  solve  home-
less  problems,  provide  the  money.  And  so  I  think  your  question,
what is it we should do, I will offer two highest priorities.

One  is  we  ought  to  greatly  increase  the  science  budget  in  this
country  so  that  we  have  new  discoveries  that  would  create  new
products,  create  jobs  for  people.  The  second  is  that  we  need  to  get
teachers in our classrooms all the way down to first grade who un-
derstand math and science and who have a primary degree in that
core  field,  so  that  they  can  answer  the  questions  the  children  ask
so they can inspire them, so that they can tell them why what they
are doing is relevant.

I  think  those  are  the  two  highest  priority  things  that  we  should

do.

Thanks for a great question.
Dr.  ZUBER.  Okay.  Well,  NASA  itself  can’t  solve  all  of  the  edu-
cation  problems  in  the  country,  but  they  can  certainly  contribute.
The decision kids have to make and I think it comes when they are
between  elementary  school  and  middle  school  is  do  they  keep  tak-
ing  the  harder  math  courses,  or  do  they  go  the  easier  route.  And
they  need  to  see  something  out  there  that  gives  them  the  feeling
that  putting  in  the  extra  effort  to  take  the  harder  math  course  or
the harder science course is worth their while.

So  in  that  sense  keeping  discovery  in  space  science,  Earth

science, and in fact, all science I think is key in that endeavor.

And  I  just  want  to  echo  Mr.  Augustine’s  comment  that  having
teachers  in  science  and  math  who  are  actually  science  and  math
majors and who understand those disciplines deeply and who have
opportunities for career enhancement in summer programs, that is,
you  know,  one  of  the  best  investments  that  this  country  could
make.

Mr. GLENN. This, it is a very good question, and it always comes
up about whether we should solve the problems that exist now be-
fore  we  put  money  into  research  where  we  don’t  know  for  sure
what the answer will be, is that wasteful, and that is basically the
questions you asked, I think.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

It  seems  to  me  that  our  research  in  this  country,  if  there  is  one
thing that we have learned throughout our history it is that money
spent on research has a way of paying off in the future, usually be-
yond  anything  we  see  at  the  outset,  and  not  every  aspect  of  that
research is productive, but enough of it is productive is that is how
we moved ahead.

What we are saying by research is curiosity, and every single ad-
vance  that  humans  have  ever  made  has  been  because  somebody
was curious about how could we do things a new way and do them
differently  and  whether  it  is  a  microphone  or  whatever  it  is,  can
we  improve  on  this.  And  somebody  had  that  kind  of  curiosity  in
looking into the unknown.

An  example,  you  mentioned  the  problems  of  the  homeless.  I  am
very concerned about that, too, back in my home State of Ohio, but
we,  an  example  of  this  might  be  in  feeding  the  homeless  even  in
look  what  has  happened  in  agriculture.  In  the  early  days  of  this
country  we  had  95  or  96  percent  of  our  people  involved  in  agri-
culture  to  support  the  population.  We  are  down  now  to  about  2.8
percent  of  our  people  give  surpluses  that  are  enormous,  so  much
so  that  we  pay  people  not  to  produce.  And  that  was  because  of  re-
search  on  hybrids  and  on  soil  and  on  fertilizer,  seeds,  just  the
whole, across the whole panoply about eight or nine things that go
into  that  consideration  in  agriculture.  And  people  thought  maybe
at that time it was goofy. Why did we have to do that kind of stuff?
We  were  looking  into  fertilizers  for  heaven’s  sakes  on  the  farm.  It
has  always  been  okay,  but  yet  we  improved  them  enough  that  we
have  more  increased  production,  and  that  does  benefit  the  home-
less now.

So it seems to me taking a long-term view of what may come out

of research is the way we should go.

Chairman  GORDON.  The  gentlelady’s  time  has  expired.  And  let
me  just  point  out,  Ms.  Giffords,  in  response  to  your  question,  I
think  there  was  concurrence  that  we  need  to  be  able  to  help  edu-
cate  our  educators  in  terms  of  their  core  knowledge  in  the  math
and science areas, as well as make an increased investment within
our science research.

Well,  this  committee  and  Congress  has  passed  that  legislation.
The  President  signed  it  last  year.  We  have  that  authorization  in
the  COMPETES  Bill.  Now  we  need  to  fund  it.  We  have  got  the
roadmap.

And  the  gentleman  from  Washington  State,  Dr.  Baird,  is  recog-

nized for five minutes.

Mr.  BAIRD.  Thank  you,  Chairman.  What  a  treat  to  be  here  with
such  distinguished  individuals.  Thank  you  for  your  service  here
today and for your many years of service to the country.

I  am  in  a  bit  of  a  conundrum  in  that  I  share  with  great  passion
the  belief  articulated  by  Dr.  Hawking,  by  the  panelists  today  that
part of our destiny is to explore and that I think part of our human
destiny is to leave our solar system. We have to do it. Our curiosity
drives us there, but our desire to preserve the species does as well.
So I believe that. I have followed the Space Program avidly since
I was just a little child, but my concern is I am also on the Budget
Committee,  and  we  have  a,  we  are  approaching  a  $500  billion  def-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

icit. We got a $9.4 trillion debt. Our present value of our long-term
commitments exceeds $52 trillion over the next 75 years.

And  I  look  at  pictures  of  the  Mars  Mission,  and  you  know,  here
are  sort  of  geodesic  domes  with  astronauts  walking  about,  et
cetera,  et  cetera,  and  you  know,  those  of  us  who  watched  the  Star
Wars  movie,  I  sometimes  wonder  who  the  heck  built  those  things,
you know. You watch a Star Wars movie, there is these giant artifi-
cial  planets  that  people  live  in.  Somebody  has  got  to  be  out  there
building  this  stuff,  and  where  do  they  build  it,  and  how  do  they
fund it?

So my real question is this. We can make or revise laws, but we
can’t  revise  the  laws  of  physics,  and  this  notion  that  we  are  going
to  just  put  these  big  manufacturing  plants  on  Mars  somehow  as-
sumes  that  we  have  got  the  launch  capacity  to  move  a  lot  of  junk
a  long  ways  at  enormous  expense.  And  who  is  going  to  say,  Mr.
President, that is a dandy vision, but here is what it is really going
to cost.

And  can  you  talk  to  us  a  little  bit  about  what  it  would  actually
cost  this  country?  I  think  maybe  we  should  do  it,  but  we  are  not
prepared  at  all  to  make  the  sacrifices  that  it  would  require  to  do
that. So can you talk to us a little about the realistic cost of putting
these  kind  of  stations  up  on  Mars  or  wherever  else  to  make  this
a reality?

Nobody wants it.
Dr.  ZUBER.  Okay.  Let  me  start.  First  of  all,  nobody  knows  that
cost.  Okay.  Nobody,  we  looked  at,  when  I  was  on  the  Presidential
Commission,  and  we  looked  at  the  cost  of  returning  to  the  Moon
and going to Mars, we used the analogy of the cost to cure cancer.
Okay.  Nobody  when  we  decided  in  this  country  that  we  needed  to
attack  cancer,  nobody  knew  what  it  was  going  to  cost.  They  only
knew that it was worth doing.

Mr.  BAIRD.  When  we  decided  to  attack  Iraq,  nobody  knew  the
cost, and they told us it would be less than $100 billion. I am very,
with  respect,  concerned  about  that  beginning  point  for  an  argu-
ment. I have seen the movie.

Dr.  ZUBER.  Okay.  I,  so  we  don’t  know  what  it  costs.  Okay.  But
what  I  can  say  is  that  in  the  robotic  program  to  study  Mars,  we
have  learned  an  amazing  amount  about  Mars  in  the  past  decade,
which is providing the enlightenment needed to move ahead toward
trying to understand what the costs would be.

And  let  me  give  you  two  examples.  First  of  all,  we  have  under-
stood the structure of the atmosphere and the variability of the at-
mosphere, which is going to come into the issue of how do you land
on Mars.

The  second  thing  that  we  have  learned  is  that  sensors  both  on
the surface and in orbit have detected vast amounts of frozen water
in amounts that are so great that it can’t be tied up in the mineral
structures of rocks. And that means that water, ice in frozen form,
exists in great amounts within a meter of the surface of Mars, and
we know where.

So the most expensive thing you are going to take with you if you
go  to  Mars  is  water.  Okay.  Now  we  know  there  is  water  there,  so
you don’t have to take your own. So that discovery in itself has de-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

creased  the  amount  of  launch  capacity  that  is  going  to  be  needed
to go, for humans to go and stay. Okay.

Now,  these  are  two  small  examples,  and  there  are  a  thousand
other  things  that  we  currently  don’t  know  that  we  would  need  to
know before we send humans to Mars. But I think that within the
last  decade  of  exploration  of  Mars,  you  know,  those  questions  are
being  addressed,  and  the  technical  questions  are  being  addressed,
and  it  is  going  to  take  a  lot  more  study  to  try  to  figure  out  what
it is going to take.

Mr.  GLENN.  The  question  is:  Is  our  objective  to  go  to  Mars?  If
that is our ultimate objective on this, then it seems to me the Moon
is  questionable  as  a  way  station.  The  President  made  a  statement
as  I  read  into  the  record  earlier  when  he  was  in  Cleveland  about
a year ago, we go to the Moon and launch from the Moon to Mars.
Now,  if  that  is  what  we  are  doing,  which  I  don’t  believe  it  is,  but
if that is what we are thinking about doing, that is enormously ex-
pensive.  We  are  talking  about  taking  thousands  of  tons  of  equip-
ment literally from, with all the energy required to lift it off Earth,
put  it  into  Earth  orbit,  accelerate  it  on,  go  up  and  fall  across  this
equi-gravisphere  point  where  it  then  falls  toward  the  Moon  and
then  carry  enough  energy  along  to  actually  set  it  down  to  zero  it
out  again  on  the  Moon’s  surface.  And  then  start  all  over  again  on
a  launch,  granted,  with  one-sixth  the  gravity  of  Earth,  that
launched  from  there  to  Mars  and  check  out  spacecraft  and  do  all
the things that Cape Canaveral does right now, and do it in a vacu-
um on the surface of the Moon.

That  is  an  enormous  order,  if  that  is  the  direction  that  we  are
going.  Or  are  we  going  to  go  into  Earth  orbit,  build  up  our  vehicle
to where it has, we have it built up to go to Mars, could be a good-
sized vehicle as far as that goes, and then accelerate it out of Earth
orbit.

It  would  seem  to  me  that  that  would  be  the  cheapest  way  to  go,
but  NASA  has  done  studies  on  all  of  these  things,  and  you  could
get definite information from them on that.

For  me  to  stay  in  Earth  orbit  or  for  anything  to  stay  in  Earth
orbit  you  are  talking  about  4.8  miles  per  second,  almost  five  miles
per  second.  I  believe  I  am  correct  that  Neil,  when  he  went  to  the
Moon,  had  to  get  up,  his  escape  velocity  was  around  seven  miles
per second. Then falls up there, slows down, goes across that equi-
gravisphere  point,  falls  towards  the  Moon.  To  go  directly  from  out
of  that  Earth  orbit  to  Mars,  as  I  understand  it,  is  about  7.4  miles
per second.

So  you  have  most  of  your  energy  expended  in  Earth  orbit  here
and  go  and  don’t  do  all  this  complexity  of  going  into  the  landing
on  the  Moon  and  then  have  to  put  your  launch  sources  together
again  and  once  again,  launch  from  zero  up  to  whatever  speed  you
want to go to go to Mars.

So  I  think  we  need  a  better  definition  on  this.  I  don’t  think  it
is real clear right now, and I am sure that Dr. Griffin and his peo-
ple and Shana here can give us good information on that, but that
is  the  way  it  appears  to  me  right  now  in  answer  to  your  question.

Chairman GORDON. The gentleman’s time has expired.
The gentleman from Ohio, Mr. Wilson, is recognized for five min-

utes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Mr. WILSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
First  of  all,  thank  you  all  for  being  here  with  the  Committee.  It
is an honor to be able to discuss the issues that are going on today.
My  question  would  be  specifically  to  Senator  Glenn,  especially
dealing with NASA Glenn and NASA Plum Brook in Ohio. Senator,
I have been concerned for a long time as to why we don’t get more
credit  for  all  the  good  work  and  the  amount  of  jobs  that  are  cre-
ated,  the  economic  development  throughout  the  State  of  Ohio  and
the surrounding states with what goes on in Ohio.

So my question would be is how can we ratchet up the attention
on  the  good  work  that  is  done,  and  I  am  sure  it  is  done  in  many
other states, but especially in our State of Ohio.

And  then  secondly,  and  I  would  be  interested  in  comments  from
the  other  two  members,  too,  Mr.  Augustine  and  Dr.  Zuber,  that  is
what  can  we  do  in  Congress  to  help  foster  this  much-needed  eco-
nomic growth from the NASA Program?

Mr.  GLENN.  Good  question.  I  think  it  goes  back  also  to  Ms.  Ed-
wards’  comment  about  the  appreciation  for  Goddard  out  here.  The
NASA centers around this country are amazing centers of scientists
and  engineers  and  very,  very  capable  people.  Many  of  them  really
free-thinking  on  some  new  ideas  that  are  really,  will  redo  the  fu-
ture  for  us.  Our,  the  center  there  in  Cleveland  is  a  good  example.
In  some  of  the  areas  of  propulsion  in  particular,  they  have  led  the
way,  and  they  have  some  of  the  finest  engineers  in  the  country
there.

They have an outreach program, but I don’t know. The press just
doesn’t seem to pick up on this. I don’t know whether the complex-
ities  of  science  get  beyond  the  average  press  person  pretty  fast,  or
that  is  probably  not  a  fair  statement  to  make.  But  we  need  some-
thing like that, and I think is it going to require another Sputnik?
I hope not.

But  that  may  be  the  answer.  I  don’t  know.  NASA  up  there  in
Cleveland,  though,  has  a,  they  have  a  program  of  outreach  for
schools. They have a lot of visits by schools and trying to encourage
our  young  people  into  math  and  science  and  technology.  But  it  is
a  jewel.  It  is  a  fountain  of  information  for  that  neighborhood,  par-
ticularly in this area of energy and energy use.

They had a program there some years ago called REDOX, which
I was quite taken with, and we got some money for it through the
Congress  when  I  was  here,  but  it  involved  large  amounts  of  elec-
trical  energy  storage.  If  we  could  make  one  breakthrough  in  en-
ergy,  that  might  be  the  one  we  would  wish  for,  because  you  could
then  take  all  your,  every  force  of  nature  that  we  know  how  to  put
into electricity, we could then store it so we could bring it back on-
stream during that 6:00 to 10:00 time in the evening when we need
it most. And it would, the theoretical part of that program was that
we  could  get  back  about  70  percent  of  what  we  put  into  it,  and  it
would  take  the  output  of  1,000  megawatt  power  plant  in  non-peak
hours.

Now, that would be enormous.
Mr. WILSON. Sure would.
Mr.  GLENN.  We  lost  funding  for  that,  and  there  were  some  com-
plications  with  it,  but  those  concepts  are  the  kinds  of  things  that
our  NASA  labs  work  on  all  over  this  country  and  do  a  great  job

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

in  and  should  get  much  more  recognition  for.  Goddard  you  men-
tioned earlier, Ms. Edwards, and the others also.

Thank you.
Mr. WILSON. Thank you, Senator.
Mr. AUGUSTINE. I think your point is very correct. In this country
we  tend  to  undervalue  science  as  compared  with  most  other  coun-
tries  in  the  world  that  I  have  visited.  The,  for  example,  in  China
today of their nine top leaders eight are engineers, and they under-
stand what science can do and the importance of it.

There is no question in my mind that one of the highest returned
investments  that  this  Congress  could  make  is  at  basic  research.
There  are  many  studies  that  support  that.  When  it  comes  to  get-
ting  a  public  that  recognizes  science  and  its  importance,  a  lot  of  it
comes  back  to  our  young  people  and  trying  to  inspire  them  and
help them. It is a long-term undertaking, but there is a great deal
of  anecdotal  evidence  that  suggests  that  children,  very  young  chil-
dren  as  I  said,  are  very  excited  about  science,  particularly  about
space.  There  is  anecdotal  evidence  that  we  lose  them  by  about
fourth  grade,  that  early.  Usually  for  two  reasons.  One  of  two  or
both.

One  is  it  is  a  father  that  tells  their  daughter  that  girls  don’t  do
math, and the second is that you have a physical education teacher
who has been told to teach math or to teach science. And that, un-
fortunately, is the majority of the cases, not the minority. An over-
whelming majority.

And so those are the things I think we have to solve.
Mr. WILSON. Thank you.
Mr.  GLENN.  Mr.  Chairman,  could  I  add  to  that  just  a  moment?
Chairman GORDON. Certainly, Senator.
Mr.  GLENN.  Secretary  Riley  was  Secretary  of  Education  back  in
previous  Administration,  and  he  was  very  concerned  about  the
TIMS  Study,  Third  International  Math  and  Science  Study.  And  it
showed that our kids up to about the fourth grade, which is the fig-
ure  that  Norm  just  used,  up  to  about  the  fourth  grade  are  in  the
top two or three nations in the world of 41 nations that were stud-
ied over a three-year period of time.

Now,  these  figures  are  about  eight  or  nine  years  old.  They  are
about almost 10 years old now, but I think they are still applicable.
The,  by  the  time  our  kids  get  out  of  high  school,  we  are  two  or
three from the bottom of 41 nations studied. And what happens in-
between there is exactly what he was talking about here. What we
found  when  we  had  our  commission,  I  headed  that  commission  for
over a year, what we found was that 25 percent of the math teach-
ers  in  high  school,  just  average,  across  this  country,  were  never
trained  to  teach  math.  They  are  teaching  out  of  field  as  they  say
in  education.  And  20  percent  of  our  science  teachers  are  the  same
way, teaching out of field.

Even  more  disturbing  perhaps  was  the  fact  that  30  percent  in
both  categories  left  the  profession  within  three  years,  and  50  per-
cent  were  gone  in  five  years.  They  are  off  to  AOL  or  Verizon  or
somebody  that  will  offer  them  a  lot  more  money  than  they  could
make teaching.

And  so  that  is  something,  and  what  we  are  faced  with  is  trying
to do something about it is, the thing is overseeing, we call this an

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

education  system  is  not  a  system.  At  that  time  we  had  about
14,700 school boards in this country, each independent, each doing
their  own  thing,  with  not  much  direction  from  above.  And  so  until
we solve some of those problems and get the, get that gap that oc-
curs  between  the  fourth  grade  and  getting  out  of,  and  graduating
from high school, until we solve that we are going to have big prob-
lems  I  think  enticing  people  on  into  engineering  and  math  and
science and the scientific studies we would like to see some of them
entering.

Chairman  GORDON.  Well,  Mr.  Augustine,  through  the  Rising
Above the Gathering Storm, brought that information up to the cur-
rent,  and  unfortunately,  things  have  gotten  worse.  It  is,  I  think  it
is  over  50  percent  now  of  the  math  teachers  in  the  middle  schools
have  neither  a  certification  or  a  degree  in  that  subject,  and  it  ap-
proaches 90 percent in the physical sciences.

And  so  as  good  as  those  teachers  might  be  in  teaching,  if  you
don’t have the core knowledge, it is hard to communicate that. And
the  reason  it  matters  on  a  larger  scale,  Mr.  Augustine  said  that
only  four  percent  of  the  public  goes  into  the  sciences.  But  not  that
that  other  96,  though,  need  to  have  that  kind  of  background  to
work  at  a  higher  and  more  efficient  level.  And  so  to  get  the  jobs
for  today  and  tomorrow,  so  that,  you  know,  there  are  6.5  billion
people  in  the  world.  Half  make  less  than  two  dollars  a  day.  We
can’t  compete  that  way.  We  don’t  want  to  compete  that  way,  and
so  that  other  96  percent  has  to  be  at  least  the  base  education  to
compete at a higher level.

And my time is expired. Your time is expired, and now Ms. John-

son is recognized.

Ms.  JOHNSON.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  apologize
for  being  late.  I  had  another  emergency-called  meeting,  and  I
would  like  to  ask  unanimous  consent  to  have  my  statement  put
into the record.

Chairman GORDON. Yes.
Ms.  JOHNSON.  And  greetings,  Mr.  Walker.  You  served  this  com-
mittee  with  tenacity  and  leadership  as  Chair,  and  to  our  distin-
guished guests.

I  believe  that  space  exploration  has  offered  us  more  through  its
research  than  any  other  research  that  we  have  ever  been  involved
in,  with  breakthroughs  and  products.  And  I  am  very,  very  sup-
portive  of  that  continuing.  And  if  I  had  to  make  a  choice  between
research  and  immediate  food,  I  think  I  would  choose  research  and
ask  the  churches  to  help  us  with  food  for  awhile  until  we  found  a
substitute or something.

I  truly  believe  in  research.  I  am  so  aware  of  the  shortage  we
have in talent right now to help to continue it, and in my area we
have some excellent schools. Texas Instruments has made that pos-
sible  with  this  extra  funding.  And  they  do  well.  There  is  only  20
percent of the total student body in the district, and I wonder, Mr.
Valentine,  or  is  that,  am  I  saying  that  right?  Mr.  Augustine,  what
does  Lockheed  Martin  do  to  further  education  and  invest  in  your
own future frankly. That is what I tell Instruments they are doing.
Invest  in  your  future  when  you  invest  in  education  of  our  young
people and our teachers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  I  want  to  be  careful  when  I  answer  that  ques-
tion,  because  I  have  been  retired  from  Lockheed  Martin  for  11
years,  and  so  I  can’t  speak  for  them  today,  but  let  me  tell  you——

Ms. JOHNSON. What were they doing back then?
Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  Yeah.  Let  me  tell  you  some  of  the  things  they
were  doing.  One  is  the  company  established  with  the  help  of  the
University  of  Tennessee  a  program  where  we  could  award  fellow-
ships to teachers to come to the University of Tennessee, work with
the Oak Ridge National Labs and other organizations, summer pro-
grams  to  bring  teachers  up  to  speed  with  the  latest  developments.
And this was all paid for by fellowships the company gave.

The  company  also  has  a  number  of  local  programs  helping  the
boy  scouts,  the  Challenger  Center,  the  girl  scouts,  and  community
organizations  of  that  type.  The  company  is  particularly  able  to  do
that  because  it  has  plants  or  some  kind  of  facility  in  almost  every
state.

Ms. JOHNSON. Yes.
Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  So  and  in  fairness  I  have  to  say  that  Lockheed
Martin  is  not  unique  in  that  regard.  There  are  a  large  number  of
companies that have contributed a lot in that same respect.

Ms. JOHNSON. I am so aware that we have so many teachers not
really  prepared  teaching  in  these  areas,  and  I  believe  that  if  some
of the companies would offer some type of summer program for our
teachers so they could see the environment and have an idea until
we can find enough teachers that major in these areas.

I  am  critically  concerned  about  this  area,  and  I  have  spent  a  lot
of  energy  trying  to  see  if  we  could  change  it.  And  I  don’t  see  the
progress  I  would  like  to  see,  and  I  don’t  think  that  the  public  un-
derstands  the  value  of  having  these  minds  ready  for  this  research
and activity.

And if I could elicit your volunteer service in helping to speak on
these areas, I would appreciate that. I am very indebted to Senator
Glenn for his contributions, and so is this nation and the world be-
cause  of  the  contributions  he  has  made.  And  I  know  that  he  con-
tinues  to  speak  out,  and  I  appreciate  that,  Senator  Glenn.  I  thank
you so much for what you have offered.

But  my,  I  know  my  time  is  about  up,  but  I  am  getting  my  ser-
mon done here, my concern is our future, because I really do think
that  it  is  our  homeland  security  and  maintaining  our  competitive
edge  that  is  going  to  cause  this  country  to  survive  as  an  inde-
pendent  nation.  And  we  can  do  it,  but  it  is  going  to  take  a  lot  of
public education, along with the students so that the public under-
stands  this  need  and  have  great  expectations  for  our  teachers  and
our  students,  because  our  students  are  not  given  that  instruction
to have those expectations. They take the easiest courses they can.
It  pains  me  every  time  somebody  tells  me  they  have  a  degree  in
political  science  if  they  are  not  going  to  get  a  Ph.D.  or  sociology  if
they are not going to get a Ph.D.

And  I  think  that  my  time  is  up,  but  America  COMPETES  has
addressed  some  of  this  and  law.  We  didn’t  get  the  funding  we
wanted, but at least the President signed the authorization of $33.6
million, and that will help as the money comes. I don’t see us com-
ing out of a deficit until we have the skills to bring this money in.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

And  I  hope  that  you  will  spend  time,  all  of  you,  preaching  my
sermon  on  my  behalf  and  the  Nation’s  behalf,  that  we  really  do
need this talent, and you have been in very key positions to under-
stand what an important thing it is to have it.

And I thank you very much. My time is up. I could ask questions

all day, but I mainly wanted to get that out. Thank you.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Johnson.  I  think  we  can  all
say amen, and I think it is appropriate that we complete our hear-
ing  with  the  last  question  from  the  gentleman  from  Texas,  who
physically  represents  the  Johnson  Space  Flight  Center,  Nick
Lampson.

Mr.  LAMPSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  apologize  for
missing some of your testimony earlier, but we are certainly proud
that all of you came today and help celebrate this 50th anniversary
of this committee and NASA and all the accomplishments.

And one of the questions that or one of the things that I certainly
remember  was  1957.  I  am  one  of  those  that  is  old  enough  to  re-
member  listening  to  the  beeps  on  the  radio  and  to  see  what  re-
sponded  to,  and  there  are  a  lot  of  people  who  are  starting  to  say
today that we are hearing similar kinds of beeps, but they are com-
ing  in  different  forms,  accomplishments  of  other  nations  and  their
successes,  and  in  some  of  those  instances  perhaps  we  should  be
more  frightened  with  those  successes  in  comparison  to  our  own
leadership capabilities and technological advances.

Let  me  start  with  Senator  Glenn  and  just  ask  how  should  we
view  these  growing  space  capabilities  and  plans  of  other  nations,
and  then  for  everyone,  what  are  you  views  as  to  whether  we  are
on  the  verge  of  another  space  race?  Can  we  make  ourselves  enter
another space race, and how do we respond to it?

Mr. GLENN. Thank you. There is a recent book, I haven’t read it
yet  by  Fareed  Zakaria,  the  international  expert  with  Newsweek,  I
believe  it  is,  and  his  theme  in  that,  the  summary  I  read  of  it  the
other  day  was  that  the,  that  we  haven’t  laid  down  our  mantle  of
leadership  yet,  but  the  trends  are  all  wrong  because  other  nations
are  now  seeing  what  led  this  country  into  our  successes,  and  they
are  putting  more  emphasis  on  education  and  research.  While  we
have  leveled  off  in  some  of  these  areas,  they  are  coming  up.  And
that doesn’t portend very well for the future.

And so I think we are warned that we should get on with it. Ear-
lier  in  the  hearing  China’s  efforts  were  mentioned  and  other  na-
tions,  too,  and  we,  on  one  of  our  trips  to  China  back  some  years
ago  we  met  with  Jiang  Zemin,  who  was  the  President  of  China  at
that time, and I asked him then if they had considered joining our
program  with  these  15  nations.  And  he  told  one  of  his  staff  people
he wanted to look into that more. Well, nothing ever came from it.
But  I  think  we  can,  we  were  the  world’s  leader.  We  are  the
world’s  leader  in  this  area,  and  if  we  by  lack  of  support  for  these
programs and for doing the research that is going to be the benefit
to everybody here on Earth, I don’t want to see us just seeing how
far we can go in space, coming back, waving a Styrofoam finger in
the  air  saying  we  are  number  one  or  something.  It  seems  to  me
that  the  basis  for  a  Space  Program  on  a  long-term  basis  support
of our people comes as they see research returns coming back that
benefit them and their children in many, many different areas. The

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

five that I mentioned earlier that NASA had special, the OBPR Of-
fice  had  programs  set  up  within  to  look  in  those  areas.  They
seemed to be the most likely to be productive at that time.

So  I  think  that,  it  is  not  so  much  that  we  are  just  laying  down.
It is whatever we are doing is not enough to keep us ahead of other
people, as I see it, developing into the future.

Mr. LAMPSON. Mr. Augustine.
Mr.  AUGUSTINE.  My  belief  would  be  that  we  are  not  just  in  a
space race. More importantly I think we are in a science and engi-
neering race, not with any one country, but with a number of coun-
tries.  Certainly  the  developing  countries  are  committed  to  this
area.  You  think  of  China  and  India  and  Brazil  as  leaders.  We  are
all  familiar  with  what  China  has  been  doing  in  space,  including
military space, and it is very impressive.

I  think  that  today  we  are  benefiting  from  the  investments  that
this  committee  brought  about  10  or  15  years  ago,  investments  in
basic  research.  And  it  is  always  a  question  as  Senator  Glenn  said
when you have a lot of problems today, it is very difficult to invest
in the future.

But this nation could double or triple the investment in basic re-
search. When you look at the overall curve of spending by our gov-
ernment, it wouldn’t be the width of the line. That is the good news
is we spend so little today that we could greatly increase it without
an enormous impact.

So  my  highest  priority  would  go  to  investing  in  basic  research.
Mr.  LAMPSON.  Thank  you.  I  wanted  to  bring  the  issue  of  inter-
national  cooperation  and  particularly  a  project  that  we  have  been
working  on  called  the  Alpha-magnetics  Spectrometer,  but  I  am
going  to  run  out  of  time,  and  I  want  you  to  comment  in  another
area. So we will save that one.

But  if  you  will  both  comment  or  discuss  how  NASA’s  aeronautic
achievements have influenced the U.S. commercial aviation, maybe
talk  a  little  bit  about  what  areas  of  aeronautics  that  you  believe
hold  the  greatest  promise  for  advancing  the  Nation’s  aeronautical
capabilities  in  yielding  future  benefits  for  the  U.S.  commercial
aviation industry.

Both  of  you.  If  you  don’t  mind,  Senator  Glenn,  would  you  start?
Mr.  GLENN.  Let  me  respond  first  to  your  AMS,  Alpha-Magnetics
Spectrometer  because  that  is  one  of  Dr.  Zuber’s  colleagues  up  at
MIT,  and  it  is  a  very  interesting  thing  I  think  the  Committee
should  be  aware  of  that.  When  Dr.  Ting  up  there,  he  is  a  Nobel
Laureate, and after the superconducting supercollider was canceled
in  Texas  back  some  years  ago,  he  picked  up  the  idea  of  doing  this
same  kind  of  research  on  the  Station.  And  could  we  put  a  huge
magnet  up  there  about  15,000  pounds,  and  they  worked  all  this
out. It has been over a period of time. He has put together a group
that  has  raised  one  and  a  half  billion  privately,  450  science  engi-
neers,  50  institutions  in  16  countries,  and  they  were  promised  on
NASA  that  they  would  put  up  the,  they  would  put  this  up,  it  goes
up  on  the  Shuttle  and  then  is  mounted  on  the  Station  and  makes
its observations over about a three-year period.

This would be probably the most advanced particle research that
has  ever  been  done,  and  now  he  has  been  told  that  because  of  the
cutbacks  and  because  we  have  to  stop  the  use  of  the  Shuttle  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

that project is now on, I guess you would call it a permanent hold.
It  is  at  least  being  held.  They  won’t  say  the  thing  is  canceled,  but
there  is  no  place  to  put  it.  It  requires  about  a  third  of  the  cargo
bay  and  is  about  15,000  pounds  to  put  up  there,  but  it  has  some
of the greatest potential of our scientific community.

And  it  was  backed  by  all  the  scientific  groups  that  I  am  aware

of. Dr. Zuber probably is familiar with that more than I am.

Dr. ZUBER. And it is basically built.
Mr. GLENN. Yeah, and it is built. It is ready to go.
Dr. ZUBER. It is built.
Mr. GLENN. And they even put up a smaller version of it in 1998,
very  successfully,  to  prove  that  this  could  be  done.  The  tresses  is
already  there,  and  NASA  and  Department  of  Energy,  which  is  the
administrator  of  this,  have  spent  many  tens  of  millions  of  dollars,
I don’t know exact figure, getting ready for this. Now it is canceled.
Chairman  GORDON.  Senator  Glenn,  let  me  just,  I  will  point  out
if  it  is  all  right,  in  the  authorization  that  this  committee  passed
that  is  pending  in  the  Senate  now,  we  authorized  one  additional
flight for the AMS.

Mr. GLENN. For AMS? Okay.
Chairman GORDON. So hopefully we will——
Mr. GLENN. I wasn’t aware of that.
Chairman GORDON.—be able to proceed with that.
The gentleman’s time has expired, but if the witnesses would like
to  make  any  closing  comments,  we  would  welcome  that  before  we
will adjourn.

Mr. AUGUSTINE. I would just say that it is my belief that invest-
ments  in  science  are  of  enormous  importance,  investment  in  our
children, particularly in math and science, K through 12, this com-
mittee  has  taken  a  leadership  role.  Your  Chairman  has  been  ter-
rific  in  supporting  these  things,  but  you  know,  unfortunately,  you
can’t spend authorizations. And that is our challenge now.

Dr.  ZUBER.  Yeah.  I  would  just  like  to  close  by,  again,  thanking
the  Committee  for  all  of  their  support  on  the  scientific  side,  the
technology  and  education.  It  has  been  crucial.  We  have  fantastic
young  people  in  this  country  who  have  very  bright  futures.  These
are going to be the people who solve our problem in the future, and
we need to get them engaged and get them going.

And  so  if  you  could  keep  continuing  your  support  of  these  en-

deavors, we will be a better country for it.

Mr.  GLENN.  My  view  is  that  the  Nation  that  leads  in  education
and  research,  basic  research  in  the  future  will  lead  the  world.  I
think it is that simple.

Chairman  GORDON.  Well,  thank  you  all  the  witnesses.  This  has
been  a  very  thoughtful  hearing.  It  is  one  that  we  are  going  to  be
able  to  ponder  and  be  able  to  probably,  not  probably  but  we  will
try to incorporate into our future efforts here.

And  let  me  just  close  by  saying  that  the  record  now  will  remain
open  for  additional  statements  from  Members  and  for  answers  to
any  follow-up  questions  that  the  Committee  may  have  of  the  wit-
nesses.

And this hearing is now adjourned. Thank you.
[Whereupon, at 11:55 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:38 Nov 01, 2008 Jkt 043687 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073008\43687 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

